      "identifier" : [
         "8_06912_171"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "PAGES MISSING",
         "WINNIPEG, CANADA MARCH, 1914",
         "AI$1O Have you $rîo that is n o in If you can answer \"yes\" to thatrnoney should flot be put away be safe. 8INJVESTM E NT use? Or canm you save $uo.eVery three months? either of these questions, can you give a good reason why where it will earn 10 per cent instead of 3 per cent-and stili METRQj'OLIS SECURITIES -LIMITED earned last year 18 per cent and paid a 10 per cent dividend. Next year it xviii pay more. Besdesreceiving big dividends, your shares will gradually iiicrease in value. This is flot a specu- lation but a sound- investment in which you may safely place your savings. Every dollar invested bas nearly two dollars, worth of security behind it. If Interested, send me a postcard for particulars.. i. Bc. MARINi* Westue-n Ciane cd xi n veet ments 612 Mointyre Bloclk, Wînnig\u003eeg- NOT MEELYTHE BESI VALUE Or The Best At A Price, But Positively THE BEST At Any Price Buy a Pound packet and if you do n d it.superior to the tea you have been using you can retùn it and your grocer wil refund purchase inoneye",
         "\\nhipeg, March, 1914 The Western Home MOnthlY' doyicdI an Why soak theman pare them? It brings -only brief relief. BIu.-jay will stop the pain -intantly, It wilI end--tho corn-- completely, and in 48 hours. It is doing tliat to a million cog= a rnonth. Tho chemiat who lnvented Blu. \u003eay solved the whole con problons. Apply it, a.nd the cora la for-, Cottn. It will neyer pain agan. Getly the Blu..jay thon orons the cota, and in two days the cota cornes out. No pain, no soees o noy. suce. And that cona Îdi vrnod treatnt agala. Old-tlmo meiQ willInet do thia. Lot noone dim they wlll. But Bue.-jay does it, anddbas don* it for axty million corna. Prove this to-night. Blue -jay For Corn\u0026s 15 and 25 oet-at Dvuggists Duer \u0026 Dl1ac Ocêe Md New Tâ\u0026 2A BROWNIE Price $3.00 JUST thethag lm ned on the fart to take picturos of stock, crops, tc.-you can use it to ad- vantago in your business. It 15 very simple teo, perate aâd works like its big brother the Kodak. The film cartridgeocf six or twelve exposures can be put in or taken ont by daylight, and ycu can do the developing and prnting ycurseif without a dark-room, or send it to your dealer. Takes pictures 21 by 41 and you cau make as many printt as you want. Aalc yur dealarfor catauet wrteuaend wo willn:2tf CANADIAN KODAK CO., Limited 610 KING STREET W.. TORONTO THE WESTERNfl HOME, MONTRLY Vol. XV .P u blalhhe4 monthlyU..5 By the. Home Pubâtihng Co., MeDermot and Arthnr Ste., Winnipeg C anada. T\"u SUESoIPorN PRI( of The. Western Eom. Xcntb là tSI a lmr or thre yeszs fur S2 to sny addyossla Canada. r Britbsh hum. The subsciption pue Wtaforggli couWt lfiA io syeand wtU\"ln h. OfQWnniPeg limitaand I th' nhted tatas8128ayear.or more ji would b. POSAGEM~Âflrdab. eoive 1h aae eab oib frctlnalpate r adolar. sad ln any aiount when l AIS TOPTEE APT ai ii.expiatin oflb.limepal foru _\u0026m Arenowa1 of ubecriptlon là 1h. cney10 py fnt aothepea. atte tuîrformer m won sa uew addroma Iiie Oomncons relative to chu\"geof aiea nutb.rcev D ynnot latin h the b.2M1hof the Prediuig MOUtb. WUMITOU aEmEw b. sure 10 sgn pour naineayte uIm mn uIl Mayseuuath@lb.label cf pour paper. 1f IbIs là Bcl donsft lesds 10oonfusion. If pou bave rsentlp changeS your addren Mad thé. pape bas b. forwardedte pou. bee mtolet us know th. addnm au yepur lbL A Chat with our Raneaders eaeh one a eart of a great body of loyal frieuds, res.îding in almoat every eity, towu and village of this great country. We-count you a,1ll as friends -because you are loyally supporting us iu a good cause-an endeavor te place before the great mass of the goodliterature-loving public, the best in reading that eau pos- sibly be given for a very moderato sum cf money. To. this end our efforts have been devoted for more than thirteen years, and the names cf thousands of you have been before us for ail that time; somes for only half as long, and many of you have just recently been welcomed to the fold, but are our frieuda nevertheless. Your loyal sup- port, stretching back over this long period of years, bas enabled us to build up a great organization here in the heart of the Western metropolia cf this great country cf ours, and the sincere efforts of every mem\u003cber of this host cf faithful workers around us, is exteuded in one direction oly-te give to you, in The Western Home Monthly, the beet that your money can buy. Every one of our loyal workers is im'bued with this spirit, and their hearts are in the work from morn until night-yes, and from niight until moru, with many cf them. We have a great ambition for whieh, we are ail striving. We hope some day te see The Western Home Monthly by the fireside cf every single home- leving family circle in this land. It is a constant visitor te thousauds uow- over forty thousand. Mauy experi- euced publishers tell us that in -The Monthly we are giving the publie more good reading iu proportion to the sub- scription prie than auy magazine in the world. Many cf you are contiuuaJlT writing us sud telling us the same thing. To be frauk, we believe it, toc. Such being the case, The Monthly cught to have easily a hundred thousaud sub- scribers instead cf forty thousaud. We hope to continue to build up through the kindly efforts of our frienda _--ur subseribers and our club.raisers. Now, our friends-ana this mneans every single ene of you - will you do this for us within the neit few weeks? Will you, each and every coecf you, send at least one subscriptiou? The next time one of your friends cail, will you not show lier your copy of The Monthly, and tellllher cf opir ambition, and ask bier if she would not like te have it for at least a year? Thon, will you ask your ueigh'bor next door, or dowu the street a ways? Or 'haven't you someone dear to you, perhaps, to whom YOU would like to send The Monthly as a gift for a year 7 Surely there is oue persea, or maybe two or three, or even more, whom you could get te subseribe with scarcely any effort on your part. Wîll you do this for us?'tIn return we promise yen that, as we near the realization of our ambition, The Monthly will grow bigger and btter; we will give you more and more for your money. Even though it is now the best investment for the money in periodical literature, it wilI become ten-fold more so. Kindly Appreciatiolîs Corne Daily Markinch, Sask. Pear Editor,-'! bave been a subscriber to The Western Home 'Monthly for the past five years. The coluimus are in- teresting and also ediîcating, and, as for the magazine, it should be found at every fireside. C. E. Sandercock. Guelph, ont. Dear Sir-Il have been a reader of your paper for about a year, and of al the papers I have read there is not one 1 would rather have than The Western Home Monthly. Miss R. McWilliams. Vlscou»t,, iB Dear Editr-I an itili a subseriber and a very interested reader, and as for cur Western Home Monthly, I don't think there is a better paper printed anywhere. I like the Young Man's Problein very much, and thînk it would be (benefii for any young man to read it. E. O. Ramstead. Whitebeae'h,, Sask. Dear Editor-I think you might head my letter \"A Case of Necessity.\" Why? Well, I've been a subscriber to The Western Home Monthly just one month. Ir\u0026 my wanderings in this Land of the Maple I have had the pleasure of read- ing it in different homes, but now, Mr. Editor, I arn a homesteader and need it. Yes, need it. Harold Picker ing. From Our Contomporarles The St. John (NAfl) Globe. - \"The Western Home Monthly is an ample magazine, desigped as its namne indicates, for homeê readmrig. It has,,4a,,. valth of wholesome literature' And fs in every way indicative of Western progreas and enterprise. There are numerous de- partmnents devoted ta stories, the home, the farm, to music, to fashion, aud, in fact, to ail the interests that would centre about a welI ordered home with a broad outlook upon life. The maga- zine is wel edited, and would seem to ho what it clsims, a healthy Western magazine, edited aud planned for the hoalthy Western home. Published by the Home Publishing Company, Winni- peg.\"p Thle Melfort Moo.-«Tu The Western Home Monthly many interesting fea- turcs will ho found in several illustrated pages indicative of the marvellous growth of Western cities and towns, and altogether this magazine will be found entertailliug.\" The Editor, The Western Ilome Monthiy, Winnipeg. Sir,-Your magazine is a splendid one, brimful of valuable information, and we assure you that we appreciate it greatly. Yours sincerely, (Miss) Raiphia StiR, Editor, Woman's Departmeut, Dipper Office, Ottawa. Dilke, Sask., ?eb. 5, 1914. The Western Home Monthly, Winnipeg. Kind Sirs,-Your Iovely premium (set of dîshes) receivod last night, and I hasten to heartily thank you, for I was more tlîan surprised to find they were se niee. Again thanking you, 1 arn, very respectfully, MNrs. L. M. Dart. Any one mailing us seven subscrip- tions can have the beautiful set of dishes that so pleased Mra. Dart. Forty- seven pieceb Lu \u0026ll. If Foods were placed in order of menit, you would place Benger' s Food ffrat because it is retained when a rejccted. Altbough Bengers Food, wken prtedi Contains a ilth,'o necS sr to sus* tai Mi liEelnl 'digestedthat thé weakliest infant or invagldmer befed Bengers Food fora». wlth ma.~ a deliclous focd creata, moot 1hw nourisbing and quit. fre- r particles wliich r Infantsetbriyonct \u0026N'For INFANI INVALIDS ýand the s obtainablo fr-om ÎU- St««o, Gro)dm, etc.. in meled tins prie 6occ. and pz. 1 A mample wth IsinPveE oki oiS em u B3ENGER'S FOOD, Ltd., Ma!!e r mw or from their Wbolembl Agentela Cadaifb *Ué 4in h hauleai 00. et Osalà\u0026di, usatrhalor sav ait. John. N.S. Reiniton. Ont la. Vlnnpeg.ai~. Victda. C. IDUIFIIN8\u0026 CÔ.9 LTD. imiiort«esand D«e ler photo Supplie hoth Profesions land mteu 472 Main St., Winnipg B-1-8 je. frtsds/WtQquau.,. BRANDON, MAN. A Live Progressive School devoted to practical education..1 SEND FOR OUR CATALOQ Ir. A. WOOD, Prinoip\u0026L Eau Larmwed Slae i u A Oemm u tadeg. xansa.Ciy New YW on ..Fyaneco",
         "TheA Wntern *Homo.e Monthl3' Wi\"apeg, Maroh, 1914. W!~TRN OME ONTLY~ REELIBRARY, Tii. t UVgiu! andi2t«reSËEboks Wlli e glia away, P 1.te oour ukscibera. W. difii. them Into two (2) dfemit org. -You may 0110 gthe t» Z SUbut -yen are not perM*t-tpick boks front the. dirent offers to mie UP anY One set Or et er.Oreno hetefat ~OLTe d7 miyeuOwn ubmclptli or g«et orne frima to subacribe. The. paper cmale smnt to any addreas you dssire and the. boks to you. PLASE ORnER TOURI sooKrS-BY NuMxRtONLY. Offer- No..i Your colce of ANY SIX BOOKS from this list will be sent ~opMlpd to your .addreus FREE if you send in one yearly sub- Ûitpdmo to THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY. FAMOUS NOVELS,,, POPULAR AUTIIORS' LEISURE MIOUR LIBRARY T\" %fUfe\"i lManentimelY ne'w lit, juat published, cf standard and pepular vo«k Of ,aton by well-known authors. 4eh -book is complete in itaeîf, and is weU prijted f rom readable type on goed paper. The mie in convenient fer read- M luid i the lat are the Most popular wcrks cf some cf the mont cele- bruted uthons of America and Europe, and each bock is pubiishcd complete, un- chmged and unabridged. Look the liet over, and wc are sure you wil find theeicn a eociiderable nimber that yen wculd like to, rend and cwn: B josiah Allhna sWlf e gO Miss Jones' Quilting U19 Our Joncaville Polka 97 Tirs. Jane G. Austin g14 Tic Cedam Swamp Mystemy gO The. Twelve Great Diamonds g8The. Wreck of the Kraken By Emerson Beniett g11The.Kidnapped Heirese 'Tl he àMiçnight Marniag. 97 CWarotte IL Braeme gO lady Gwcndolinels Dream gl10 Bewuty's Marriage 9 Oralie gIS On Her Wedding Morm 934 MY Mth.r's Ring it41 Tli.' mytery of Birchal g47 meàio' .1 Ighs Penance \u003c59Tii SorycfTwo Pietures g«4 The.'Tragedy cf the Chain Pier \u003c6 The. Coqitte's Victim By Mms.Frances HRodgmon Burnett g30 The Tragcdy cf a.Quiet Life g56 Pretty PolIy Pemberton t 97y Mary Kyle Dallai g15Ocbra Hastinge \u003c33 The Mystcry cf Mordauîtl Man- Sien g73 The Devil's Anvil 97 A. Conan Doyle U12 The. Secret cf Gorestiiorpe Grange B7 \"The. Ducheas\" \u003c5A Maiden Al Porion 31A Little Irish Girl g48 Sweet is Truc Love gb7t A Little Rebel j By Alexander Dumas g«4 Oto the Archer \u003c55 The Corsican Brothers 9TIrs.m May Agnes Fleming g3 ilîton Hall glO The. Child cf the Wreck g20 The Rose cf Emistein g45 The Mystemy at Blackwood Grange 97 Mni Kathenine Green g56 Twc Men and a Question g60 Three Women and a Mytery g65 The. Oid Stone flouse g70 The Dector, Hie Wife and the Clock By Marlon-Halani g13 Lois Gant's Reward g50 -Stepping Stones By Tirs. Mary J. Bolmes «I~ The Gabicd Roofcd flouse at Snowdon g17 The Old Red Hous. Amcng the Mountains g39 Rice Corner g61 The Brown flouse in the Hchllow 960 Tom and I g7l Kitty Craig's Lif e in New York By Etta W. Pierce g22 The Biacksmith'e Daughter g3l A Mad Passion g52 The Hein of Brandt By Effit Adelaide Rowlands g62 The Power cf Paul Latrobe g72 A Love Match BY Tirs. Emma D. B. N. Southworth g2 The Crime aid the Ourse g5 The Wife's Victory g8 Trhe Little Rough-Cast flouse giS The Refuge g29 The Phantom Wedding g42 John Strong'e Secret g68 The Fatal Secret 97 Tins. Ani S. Stephens \u003c2O The Bride of an four g37 The Love That Saved lilm gàI The Charity Seholar COUPON WÊS NHO E NIPG. Gentlemen:WINPG ... . . . . . .. . . . . . . . 1914 Enclosed'find $1.00 for which send me The Western Home Monthly for one year and the following bocks, postpaid (order by nuniber)....................... Yours truly, -offer No.: 2 Your choice of ANY FOUR BOOKS from this List will be sent post paid to your address FREE if you send ini one yearly subscription to Thé Western Horne Monthly. Eiach Book consiste of a Handsome Octave Volume of 64 Lawg Double-Column Pages, Neatly Bound in Attractive Paper Covers. No. h52. M'feen Complet. Novelettes, by such weIi known authors as Mrs. Southworth, Charlotte M. Braeme, A. Conan Doyle, Mrs. May Agnes Fleming, H. Rider Haggard, and others. N. h30. Modern Etiquette for a\u0026l Occasions. A excellent work ¶i;on thîs subject, the rules of depcrtmnent for ail occasions, bot for ladies and gentlemen, as observed by the buat society. No. h41. Famous Dlalect Recitations. A large collection of humorous and other récitations in the Irish, Dutch, Negro and Yankee dialect, both in prose and verse.: A compilation of some of the most popular récitations, both o14 and new, ever written. . Ne. b23. The. Wldder Doodle's Love Affair, and Other Stories, by Joshiah Àiien's Wife. This book contains flfteen complete stories, descriptive of the laughable doings cf the Joneeville fèlks, by that incomparable humoriat Josiah Allen's Wife. No. h26. Popular Plays and Farces for Amateur Theatrlcals. Contains those sterling comédies: \"Turn Him Ont,\" \"Box and Ccx,\" \"«Popping the Ques- tion,\" \"That Rascal Pat,\" \"A Kise in the Dark,\" \"A Regular Fix,\" \"My Turu Next,\" and \"The Loan cf a Lover\"-in ail, eight, complote plays. No. h35. ,The. Ladies' Guide to Beauty. This bock contains minu~te and meatical instructions\u003e accompanied by many valuable recipes for securing a handsome form, a clear and smocth Ekin, a beautiful complexion, beautiful hair, etc., etc. .NO. b7. TMrs Partlngton's Grab Bag, thc contents of which are very, very funny. The last and best bock written by B.' P. Shillaber, the original Mrs. Partington. No. h40. Spoopendyke Papers. By Stanley Huntley., An entircly ncw edition cf the famous Speopendyke Papers, containing a full account cf the laugh. able sayings and doings cf Mr. and Mme. Spoopendyke. Onc cf the best and most popular humorous bocks ever published. No. h58. Modern Entertalament., By Mms. Effie W. Merriman. bescribes numerous forms cf entertainment for evening companies. WilI. enable the hostess te entertain her friends and acquaintances in a manier thcroughly ei- joyabie. No. h57. How Women May Ban Mouey. .. ByMre. Effie W. Merriman. A valuable treatise, pclnting eut numerous ways whereby women may eamn money i homes, without interfering with their regular duties. No' hGG. Cblromancy; Or, The Science Of Paliltry. A. conceisei exposition cf the principles and practice cf the art cf reading the. band, by .whieh the pagt,. the. présent aid the future may b. foretold. No. hI3. Thc Young Authom's Assistant and Guide. \"This. bock is a cern- plete manual cf instruction for Young authops, pciflting out thée- wy by which YOU MaY become successful writers for the press. It tells ail about the prépara- tien cf manuscript and the methode cf disposing cf it te publishers, and telle you how te judge cf what you are beat fitted te write. No. h15. How te Secume a Business Education at Home. By the aid cf this book a complete knowledgc cf the rudiments cf every branch cf business may be secured. It was writtcn by the principal cf one of our ,Iedin'' business colleges, and contains full and complt. instructions in Penmfanahip, Bokep iîg, Général Business aid Business Law, with Commercial Forms, etc. -kkep No. hlO. Famouis Comlc Recitations. This bock contains one hundrcd and ten cf the very best humorouis recitations, embracing recitations in the Negro, Yankee, Irish and Duteh dialecte both in prose and verse, as well as humorous compositions cf every kind aid cbjiracter. No. h14. Thc Reliable Book of Outdoor Gaines. This bock contains the latest officiai ules governing the game cf Basebaîl, aise full and compléte ini- structions, together with officiai ules for playing Cricket, Handball, Football, Tennis, Croquet, Lacrosse, Archery, etc. No. h29. The Practical Guide te Floriculture, a compléte practical guide te the culture cf flowers and plants, by Eben E. Rexford, one of the leading authorities upon all matters pertaining te floriculture. 1 No. h25. Home Amusements, a splendid collection cf Games, Puzzles, Tricks, Diversions, Pastimes, Experimente, Tableaux Vivants, Shadow Pantomimes, Act- ing Charades and Proverbe, for social gatheringa, public and private entertain- ments and eveninge at home. No. hg. The Family Doctor Book, containing plain and simple directions for the treatmcnt of every known disease or ailment of the human frame, and suggesting simple home remedies which usually effect a cure without the. neces- sity cf emplcyiîg a physician. Ne. h2. The National Handy Dictlonary, a conmpleté pocket dictionamy cf the English language, coîtaining 30.000o words, with their orthography, definition. and pronîciation, and 237 illustrations. No. h45. Everybodyy'Law Book. The object cf this volume ie. te impart, in a simple, concise mianner, the fuilest information regarding légal matters. In ail ordiîary emergencies it will save employing a lawyer. No. h43. Lessons in Shorthand, on Gurncy's System. A complt. instruc- tion bock in the art cf phoîography or shorthand writing, showing how any onle inay acquire and become proficient in tliis valuable art. No. h6. The Modern Hoyle, contaiîing the latest official ules for playing whist, euchre. chess. crîbbage, dominoes, poker, drauglits, bezique, backgammon, Xapoleon, solo whist, ecarte, etc. SENRD IN TOUR STJ3SCRIPTION AND AVAIL YOURSELF 0E THIIS REMARLAIBLE OFPLI TO-:DAY - g\u003e ~g' ~,' .............................. ......",
         "Winip4M arch, 1914. The. Wne~ omeeront hry The Youth. of the Cityr MI be early If 18 qulte evident that in out cities, the ~oung bien and youhg women just bçgin- t P W in l the factories,: the sliops and the oces do not havé a fair chance in life. 'isis. .particttlarly true of thoq\u0026.who are wlthottparents or friends. Tbree naturjal lotgigsthese yo;unhg People hawe-for the joys of ilfe, for companionship and for a gliîmpse into the idéal world. Under exist- rzig conditions theré is small likelihood that these longlxtgs will be satisfied in a normal inanner. 17his being truc one can welî un- d erstand how neglccted nature ebels against enforced starvation, and bow it seeks comipensationi in unnatural extravagances and dissipations. The Longing for Variety A young man enters a factory. He is put at a lathe. All day long and cvery day for a year or more lie is kept shoving pDieces of wood into a great machine. The grinding, buzzing sound is ever round him. It dom- inates his ýthoughts, his feelings and bis action. It becomes part of himself, or more .properly he becomes part of it. Hé loses his identity, his personality; he is but part of the machine. How bis whole soul revoîts against the monotony 1 It is not that he dislikes work. The chances are fie would glory in work suited to bis -nature and ca- pacity; but he abjects to servitude. He is but a youth, and as such demands some- thing of the joy of feedom. This is why he rebels. This is why h *e \"quits the job\" and seeks another. A census in New York showed -that one-third of those who entered womk'at fourteen years of age changed their occupations six times duing the fimst year. Such. la the.,attitude of youth to inotony. Hear the testimony of one who speaks from full expéience. \"I r ecaîl a boy who had worked steadily for two years as a lielper in a smelting establishment and had« conscientiously brought home ail his wages, anc night sud- denly announciflg to his family that he 'was too tired and too bot to go an.' As no amount of persuasion could make bim alter bis decision, the family finally threatened to bring him into the Juvenile Court on a charge of in'corrigibility, w.lereupon the boy disappearc d and such efforts as the family have been able to make -in the two years since have failed to find him. Tliey are con- vinced that lie is trying a 'spel1 of tramiping' and wish 'that they had let himn have a va- cation the first summer when lie wanted it so bad.' The boy rnay find in the rougli out- door life the healing t-at a, wisc physician would recommend for nervous exhaustion, although the tramp experiment is a pemilous one.\"y How is it possible to better conditions? In any modern factomy ecd man must do bis own fractional part of the wbole. The aid system of manufacture can be tolerated no longer. A workman mnust bÇ content to co-operate. Surely so, but yet there are conditions under which co-operation is in- toierable and conditions under which it is joyful. The employer in a modern factory, or store or shop does not always consider this. Hear again what this woman Who knows lias to say :, \"If a clild goes into a sewing factory with a knowiedge of thc work she is doing 'n relation to the finished product; if she is in- formed concerning the inatemial she is manipulating and the processes to which it is subjected; if she understands the designM she is eiaâborating in its historic relation to art and 'decoration, hem daiiy life is lifted from dudgery to ane of self-conscious activity, and lier pleasure- and intelligence à-s registered ini her product. \"I remember a.. littie colored girl 'in this New Vork school who was drawing for the patteim she was about ta embroider, a care- fully 'elaborated atanthus. leaf. Upon nj- inquiry as to the design she replied; 'It is what the Egyptians used :0to onIevery- thing, because they sa'w lt so much growing ini the Nile; -and then the Greeks copied it, and sometimes you cati find it now on the buildings down* town.' She ad.ded shyly, '0f course I like it awfully well becaýu se it was first -used by people living in Africa where the colored folks corne from.' It is because no care has been taken in most modern factories to do the very thig suggested here that.young mnen and womeri *gow4isatisfied.- They-are flot aliowed--to feel the joy of proluctioni, which after al is tAIe true joy of living. With the inivention of modern machinery and the consequent division of labor there was found in industry a place for groWing boys and girls. We musté'e careful lest we sacrifice the human to the material. If we q.uenich the fire of youth- we not only destroy- life, but imperil the future of industry itself. The Longing for Copnnbl Longing -for variety of occupation la flot the only longing of the youtug mani or th e young woman of the shoP or the littory. There is the longing fort ônlpa4loship- first, for those of, similar sex and then for those of the opposite sex, Cities -ave jro- vided schools, but as yet theyh*av~e provlded few recreatian centres for young people. All this is- left to private enterprise. The young giri canno ne youhg man Ili her h-omý_or often she has flo home. If she -Joins the Y.W.C.A. she meets no younk inmen at all, if she goes to a church ohé fins'tbat she is flot like the other girls who have homes of their own, and the youing men 'are flot usually of hier class. Sa she goes to the rinks, to the- picture shows, to the dance halls. She picks up companions. She bas hier fun anyway. Whiat is the remedy for these conditions? The community and the employers of labor must leamn that their responsibility to yroung people does not end with getting them a position and paying them even a liberal wage.' Opportunities, must be sprovided -for social intercourse under wise supervision. \"Already some American chies are mak- ing a beginning toward more adequat.e public recreation. Boston has its municipal gymnasiums, cricket fields and golf grounds. Chicago lias seventeen parks witlh playing fields, gymnasiums, and baths, which at present enroli thousands of yoinng peopl 'e. These samne parks are provided with beautiful halls which 'are 'used for many purposes, rent free,, and are given over to any group of young people who wis\u0026x to ,conduct dancing parties, subject to city supervision and chaperonage. Many social clubs have deserted neighboring saloon 1hals for these municipal drawiîng rooms beautifully decorated with growing -plants supplied b y the park greenhouses, and flooded with electric light, supplied by the park power bouse.\" The Longing for Ideals The third longing of the city youth is for glimpses into the ideal world-the wold of the, -imagination. It is because the theatre, the moving picture show and the sensationai novel help the imagination in its quest of ideals that these are so well patronized by both sexes. Some young working girls endure the hardships of the day only be- cause they'are looking forwamd to the pic- ture show s -aï niglit. Theyî prefer the society of one young man ta anot.hcr because he is more generous writh, cheap theatre tickets. T'liey.. frequent the bookstores .nd libraries and revel in fiction because lt Ïin- isters ta their appetite. If thceplcl\u003eure show is m ore popular to-d;%y than the theatre or the librgry it4s flot onîy because it fürnIshes cbap- enteërtaln---ent,-b.-_ bea-s U_ pot are worked out .in short time, and-btcause tbey make a strong. appeal to thle, imagg»- tion. The pity of it ail is that theoa~ of the pictùre shows are not alwayi-' cened .with the moral effect of their proditc- tions. Tliervare first of ahi concetnëd, with money making. To thein, audiences are flot -primamily to be educated or héel\u003eed to bette. things. It la. for this reason -that the coin- tunmty sqhould operate -i.o There is a gloious possibility'ln the 'vûÜ picture. A few good theatres under W i mnun ity control and operated ta provide amusement and instruction wouldbe of t1We higbest possible value. In this Uatters. ý7 in the matter of recreation centres,,thç cona- munity, and the factory owner could, well co-operate. We look. for -the day\" whén cities wihl feel thé responsl-bilityc tr edutating liheir young people during t\u0026 .impressionable years. Inthe words -of Mis Jahe Addams who lias been quoted so fie- quently: \"«To fai to provide for'the recreation c0f youth is not only to deprive al of thein of their natural formof expression# :but i-cep-. tain to subject some of tliem ta the -ovtït wbelingtenuptatidn of', âicit \u0026and sou1- destmoying pleasuree. To insisi;t, is young ipeople shahl forecast their rodse-c6lored« future oniy in a bouse of. drcïanis îto des- prive the real world' of, that wawmtb and re-assuratice -which it.so soreiy nee4w an~d to whlch lt is justly entitled; tjn* we are heft outside witb a sensé of ness, in company with thut shadow wl~ already lurks only amounid the::corner f«* Most of us- skeptioism of life' value.\" 'the Modern Church \"The Churcli, if It is to retain its h Id on the masses of tbe people,, must mat resume the lead in everyday life **hich, under chan ing standards of tho glt aàd life, it bas to some extent loat. Temýis tremendous need for the \"w'ls direction of its minisWes In the practica$ probicins oftW community and the State. Th ~eiWh now go out froni aur theological colèges P \u003e out far Ibetter equipped for this task th*,h did their predecessomf. Is this side.,ofi heu.- licence d enounced as materiaiistic .? It was not outsie of the Saviour's mission to ho known to -the common folks as the good' physician, and to reach thein in that w\u0026y. Matemialisin is th.c enemy to be fouglit. The Modem School There is an oId tbeory that it is difficult to uproot-\"ýtbe theory that thé $t'bàr4 rudiments of an edlucà-tion are ail that le1 necessary for the fariner!\" \"T-his muai beý discarded in favor of the theory that. f!M sliould bècoméeien. cf te4ahci~ir educated classes of the *coutry- men and women of clear thougit -and possessed, ofý scientific knowiedge and insighit For thist reason the- rural sohool miust -bt - trans-4 formed. It mu st become an educational and' social centre, and the means of deveioping an apprýeciatiQn for modemn agriculture. Transformation wili be effected wlien, the majority of flic people in any communityi wish for it. A few strong intelligent souls can soon gather amound them a majority. One man of high purpose and sound in- telligence and possessed of a little tact can mould the sentiment of a whole countryside. -iîlyon be one of snch menà un this lemen, ta and prose h o14 oehith \u003ef the Josiaht uitains Ques- Turu and ing a 1 -hair, very Mrs. iiew [augh- SMost cribes e the ýy en- n. A iôney Bition past,. com- which ýpara- tells f this May ýinees keep- 1 and Tegro, orous 3 the ;e in- tball, de to ading rieks, ,Act- .tain- Mtons ,and teces- .-y of Lition ýpart, ILters. truc- r one Lying mon,",
         "The Western Home Mdont bu' Wlnldpeg, March, 1914. .i'8c O-o$aIî' 1:. '.f pian makers wM lte a-re he -but «made. Som, ~ff~ laiso. But, aq Wod,?.bushiesspropootion ther sre oly -a 1ev reasiygros \u003eia\"oe maufoued-thei fflun -pauts«0 deztica in:rooopmhed s ene ocf tzOMI. .erei a another re- mar#kable fgct:. A competitou *IgbuMtd our slogan.. After Oiudyint our instruments he dcl\u0026red: The BSherlock-Mafr. PIAO tALUE\" Yiou -.can.ot buy- a botter ,piano- than the Shorlock- .*ganilngpay whatZprioe you 'w*ill,'and when you do buy a 'Uher1ockMDig you can rot.uaurd thiàt'yourinstru- 'menti --one of the. fow goat pianos niade -th t i lanrlvafedi, brlflancy of tons 1-thait igbuilt to endure, andIYOU saie $100 by our 4Iffeet and botter way of idoing business.' tDon't you *tbi## that it would layyou weil tocornsider'our iîproofs of these dlaims ? Write to-day for our handsome kit Cataogue. And the pr-oofs 1 43 PIANO CO. (No atret addrems necessary) LONON *COAN A The Fisher Writtm for The. Weetern Hop§ Monthly By W. IL Gilbert mý-la the fisher or pnant marlou «of the Canadi.au foresta. Th ino err csnnet Ab though there are few other thinga hi. caunot do,-As a a\"; terribe jfltRter he. hae no -Rot eves -the aqurrel and thé n*xten cncompare -with hlm: hoe au orit-run th ekirabbit intii. open--in fact, ho la thre flbrcest aud mostwonderfully eqmppod deanon of maughter, uaturt fia t W imffict upon ber ,otudeh. Browidr1 inlcoïor, bearS lkabout tino- esde iana déouk1ir- hie eneri.l Wýme1-lleLhuiId gives nW impression au hflikiMeý,twhie in size hlinlaabout -equ@l- th ,theo rdi.nury îoenestic est -. wE aligwby heavlor cf buidd. Thre inher inbabits the . great pin. forests of-,Nortineru Canada *sad thre eabtern Sttes. Re is by, no means a eoenmoo nimai, but 18e .umly «te 'hob il found ln well wtereà disftricts where tino pioneers axe Im. not yet penstrute4. t1 On thre prairie hMrs hire i.uknown.' e Theogh theo Lainer has been classified au a9 S, amten, i. Poommany cinarac- teniaticeswhicii eem liddf inhm aî re ir IË 7ie disposition the 1* is oUtterly feurie\"a, sâd in site oe- his dinineuve size, tiieve.are very few animale ln the. Canadian forests tint he will not read- ily aftack-the .hoar, tihe wolverine, and the Vimber Wou ,ar, lmleedthre onlIy thiMe iion appear àIflfro te ruy- agos of tin dreadful little kille. Trop- pers -have munmy tinies reportedl cases oif a fieher running duwn and killing the. florcesand -powerf ni lynx, a heast double its 'weight and eo large and form- idable that it bas actually been known to attack Indian womaen and cblidren. Whe q- nmaide by aide, ame would not imgine for a moment tba4 a flaber would stand a ghostly dhance iu comn- bat withb the. ly- x, and, the idea of the em\u0026R1er animal making en unproyoked attaek upon li.huoge a seema utterly ahaud.Y thte flsber isy an exception to a\u0026 i nes. Moe wild ani- Male are at ail times reuly te avoid a srmip with a fonuiaabdle fao, but theo figier lbas been Luovu b go .9Mefdhia way in search of trSvbk lEveryoue knows binat the comunon fox is a claver and formidable fighter, agalu6t- whom aveu, a big foxhound G.T.P. Steel Girder Bridge. more nearly relaw o te rwolverne- the dreded glutton of thre urhern woode. lke tine wolverine ho wiIl rob the trappers deaïlfals uass b ntino latter ean eet them, reaching -the hait from the top log, ae that, when. the catch le sprung, thre fuMng of it, cannaI injure him. Tinue ire springe trap after trap, follewing lunVine truppers f et- steps, and it is only hy akili and strategy thMi the woodsmau stands a chance of eutwltting hlm. ' mnng theo treme lsflher la entfrey at -home. The. conmon mnarten eau catch the squirrel 'witih ase hy Jumping from tree to tree lu pumit, wiile ln the mime manner the fisher hais no diffi- cuIty whatever lu catching the maTten. It is said hoe will jump ta, the ground fromn a heigiat \u003cd forty feet, whie Ihe wll actually elear a horizontaé distnce of eighteen feet, neyer failing teo laap the bra.nch hie has aimed for. I once witneSed a marten elng ;a squirrel, and neyer saw a more wonder- fui acrobatie performance. The squirrèl was up and away lu surprising short time, but a2most lmmediately the mar- ten was on his bcd.s, when they both pagsed from view. For any animml ta, bave avertaken Viral marten seemed, thie ,Very hpiglit of impossibility. When- hunted with doe, tho flsher wil1 iurn at bay ali est immedately, and 'e betide the ilrt baund sbrould it corne along singly and open an at- t ack. Coon humters often fluSh a fliher hy maistaloe, but ivhen this 1hirppen the. aid and experienoed hound ha.s more serise thon ta.open 'an attack before bis sup- porters arrive. Gathering round the obstacle, at the hbase of which the fisher la crèuchlng, tire dogg wait tliitie~y see an opening ln t .e def once, but vcry often the dogs are extirely heoted, and put b rout before the huniter eau ar- rive. would stand a poor elmuce flgbting slngly. Tihe figher b» b een known ta folIow ir h trait of a singie fox for days, u)timately rnlnng its quarry to a standtii sund despatchlug it with- ont effort. 1 knew a trapper, whIo one day »tum- 'bled upoti eue of bins trapes unexpectedfly. The trap hadI been dragged f ront its place, and lin , held hy ane paw, was a fisher. The tr\u0026pper alnost trod upon the imnprisoned brute, wheroupon it turneti upon him with. snob fury that he was cwnpelled ta retreat a few pae. Tihe ferocity of Vthe brute, lie said, was almost ineredible, and il w-as not until ite eye were glazed i death, that its jaws released their grip upon the trap. The raccoon le a powerful, flghter, Whicii few dogs eau outmnateh iu single combat, yet whero \"coons\" are plenti- fui they form the staple diet of the fisher. Deer lie las been known ta kili by drapping o-1 tlem \" m the branches, «and biting at them 50 savagely thet eventually Ihey dropped from iosa of blood. Wlien fighting, the fisher ima no ides. as te when hie is beat n. Rle may be blindcd, or bave one of bis eyes actually torm out, but stililihe will continue ta figlit ta a finiFgh. Fi\u0026hers have been cauglit so dreadfully battered about by their encounters tba.t the fui was value- less. Il bas been stated tiiat ne a nimal wil-l attack't:ie porcupir on accaount of i.s formidable armament Of qui1ls.ý Each quilli s equipped witb a thousanj tiny barbs, and these barbs beconing fast in tire flesb of an animal cause tire quili to work inwards, snd this sPeedily causes death. But the fisher will attack the porcu- pine without eonipunction, while, cur- iously enougli. the q'ills that enter bis :flesh do hiçi no bari. itime (ýtiev wark out again W*itlhoutt causing the leas' Wfpe . Re Diet- K \"~ t' 's t' 1-' Health,. cleanlinessa and econiorny ail de mand a'wall covering that you can keeli immaculate without wear or tear on the material. The use of Sanitasome the walls o! every interior--especially in homes-is part of the great national movernent for clean'i- ness. .Wipe Sanitas with a damp cloth. Every, particie of _dust and dirt--every \u0026tain- every- finger-rnark is instantly removed. Sanitas is made on a strong cloth foundation finished in ois. It cannot fade, crack or chip off. Looks as bright and fresh as new after a long period of uise. Sanitas cornes in every soft beautiful tint. In perfect harrnony with the most luxurious surroundings. There are Sanitas designs for every roorn in the house-the Decorative, Tinted and Glazed effects. The. niost exquisite tapestry designs are Ver- fectly reproduced in Sanitas. Write to us. We wiil send you the newest SANITAS designs with bookiet, and tel you whcre you can get SANITAS. M IERITASgis e Gaaletheidt eisld \u0026raidZyal Ihekadiz gDry G.,ds Standard Oil Cloth Co. 320 Broadway New York City Depariment 12 The Way to Buy -JEWELRY- UwMflSave money, get the «\u003emost satisfaction and have te- Oliable goods if you make vour selection from one of the thousands of catalogues we are now distributing. Our yearly business runs inta hun- dreds of thousands of dollars, so we are buying- for inuch less than the small stores-and you get the benefil., especiallyin Diamonds. Reniember, if goods recelved are not as desired, y ou return goods at our expense and we refund your money. A post card brings aur Catalogue and particulars about aur 025.00 Diamondi Ring D. E. BLACK \u0026 Co., Jewelers Caigaiy 7heHouseof QaidiIy.. Aiberta isetrn Mo or ur # s Don t a anyone W.r cuage ho oemnijuains. Write tadsY for F. Bflietin-lt viii DRY Youbig. qATG¶L FUR An wow ce.., DeptZ 57t. 1-u».. Xc, w wumff ww",
         "'Vei'innipeg, 3Maroh, 194. The Western Home Monthly inconvenience, and old. fishers bave been when occasilon arises vilii courseu erb caught with their.bodies cboked f n\" of bitpuratling it over lakes, th at ent quille.tpe rabbit losea ita heads and falis an' The average veiglit of the fisher la eaY victim. 1-ba wile'4h t he lynx usuaîîy çThe fur of thbe fisher, -like that of the 81/ce'2 l.,Wbeth f wolverine, la used by the Indiana for ex~ceds22 b..coat. trimminga, as these are the on4y Though re\u003c4ll,'*a tree dweller, tte f.sher furM on which the bre,ýh ill not con- la PoaI d'of coniderable speed, andl dense antd cake into ice. [~\u0026 Plce aies iiiWestern Canada By Max. McD. TE. red mn's contribution to place names in Canada, and particularly Western Canada, makes a con- ,siderableIýody ilu-the aggregate. It is a sound policy and but a mneakiae of justice to the original inhabitants, that eeeks amnong the naines of Indian tribea, sorne now alxnost extinet, for the tities of provinces aud cihies. Moreover on the score of beauty alone the debt la on our aide. 00- The capital of On'ario vas iormerly known as Yrk. ]ly the adoption of the cognomen. o'f au Indian tribe, Tor- ornto bas gained, a naine of sonorous beauty, acarcely to be mmtcjhed. amang ail the cities of the vorld. By 'a imilar proceas, Ottawa bas gained vastly by the change from its original name of By- town. Strong and virile, il not always eu- phonious naines, are Assiniboine, On- tario, Winnipeg, Manitoba, Sasfra*che- wan, Wisawasa, Niagara, Muakoka, Mus- quash, Mississauga, Metabetchouan, Ksm- ouraska, Athabaska, Maultoulin, Okana- gan, Temiacoutat, Wasbimeaka, Aswa- nan, Restigogohe, Nipissing, Algonquin, A-woju, and Shequindali. Pleasin namea to be found in the Oan- ainGazetteer are Hiawatha, Minne- baba, and Nokomis, but these, perbaps oeaegàance to Longfelawrather thon to the red mari, f rom- vhose language they were taken. Speaking 0f Lunch the wife said, \"Bring home a package of Post Toasties Toasties àre wonderfUfy good at any meal, and somnehow seem to match the appetite cf both home folksa and glkests.. Bits of selecteci Incian Corn, deficately seasoned, cooked, rolied thin and toasted to a rich golden brown-that's Post Toasties. Fresh, tender and crisp, ready-to-eat direct from the package..,, With cream and a spninkle cf sugar- «The Memory Lingers' Toasties sold by grocers -everywhere. Canadian Postum Cereal Co., IAd. Windadr, Ont. But in the nemes vhich Indiana 'have themselves given to places ini Western Canada is the ouriosity of the Easterner aroused. When such localities as Whiakey Cap, Leavings, Pineher Creek, Porcupine Hilla, Robber's Roost, Stand Off, Slide Out, Slide In, Freeze Out, Bull Morn, Jumbo VallIey, etc., are'spokea, the stranger in te West begns to ask how the selection vas mode. The most iluteresting storles connected with place names in Western Canadia centre ,around «Wboop Up,»\" ai. aid trader's fort midway between Mazleod and Lethbridge, ln Southern Albertt.. It vas in the early seventies that the monopoly of the Hudeon'. Bay Company ceased, and te Dominion Governnent took over judicial igbta in ail that vast territory which lies between the Inter- national boundary and the North Pole. The enôing of the mnoaopoly vas a. sig- nai for an inruah of adventurers. Gain- blers, smugglers~, iimnals, of every. stripe, struck acroos from Montana and other northern states-into the Canadan tenritory at tlie foot of the Rocîies. Without a white population, these nif-- raf adventurers could noV- ply. their mmual wide-open traffe. The- only' way to wealth, vas by Lb. fur trade; anê :tbeý casiet' vay to obtilu the furs -vas ,bYý mugging -vrhiskey -into the cou~ntr, in smalquantities, oiluting \" sand trading 1V te Vhs natives -for pelti. Chances of interferene vers nil. 't-he Canadian Governm»ent offilcials irere thousanihof milesisitant witdhait' cither t.legratph or railway connection. But the game vas not vithout ita dangers The country at te foothilis w»s inhabited byt a confederacy of the Bl\u0026cideet Indian \u003e-Bloo(b., Peigans and Blackfeet-.\"itigera of te prairie»\"viten sober, and vores than tigers viien drunk. The Montana v'hiskey amugglera found hey mnust slther organize for defence, or psy for their fun by being exter- minated. How many vhtee vere killed in these drinking frays vill neyer be kuowa; but ail about the Blly and- Old Mon Rivera and Fort Macleod, arc grue- some landmarks known as the Places wbere such and audIt parties vere exter- minated'in the seventies. The upshot vas that the Montana smugglers emuloted h oldi fur traders, and bufflt themaelves permanent farts; Robber'a Roost Stand Off, Freeze Out, and mot fanious of ail, Whoop-Her-Up, vitase noms for respectability~s îke bas reeently been changedi ta \"Whoop-Up, with an innocent suggeativeness Of same pactie Indan titie.W1boop-Up vos paliuaced and Ioop-boled for musketry, with bastions and cannon, and an alarmi belL The fortifications of titis place alone, it la said, cot $12,030, aiul It at once became tue imetropalia af the whiskey amugglers. HUcncefarth only a few Indians were allowed inside the fort at a time, the rest being aerved through the loop-bolee. But the Blackfeet, who loved a man btter thani a bufalo hunt, vers nat ta'be bàlked. The trait by viticli the whiskey smugglers came from Fart Ben- tan zigzîcgÈed -over the roffing prairie, mainly foltowing 4Ve bottoma of te preipitous coulees andl ravines for a distance of two bunidred miles ta Whoop- Up. Heavy wagons with canvas tops andl yokes' of flfteen and twenty oxen, drew the freiglit of liquor througli the devious passes ~,that connected ravine with ravine. The Blackfeet were prob- ably the beet harsemen 'in the world. There were places where the defiles were exception-ally narraw, where the wagons got mircd, and where ox'eû and freight THE LABEL on your. paper wilI telli you when your -subscription expires. e.SIND IN YOUR RENIEWALNOW -x Rl de' tee the e te- vour anda ting. hun- 0 ve i the aefit., e not SOur ey- fers BrIE Warm Winter ýWear- \"The wise wear wool-4or comfort and for health protection. The list of Jaeger Pure Wool articles specially suited to our climate and our needs ia a most attractive one Jaeger Pure- Wool Goods, include Blankets, Cardigans, Sweaters, Dresslng 9 owns, Slippers, Shirts, Pyjamas, Rugs, Sleeping- . Bas and scores of other necessary articles. -Cal at a Jaeger Store or Agency and see thegra variety cf lift 6ail sget comfort sis nt. Cathurine nt. Wet, Nv~ml m EW nt. Vus, TrSul.",
         "o irbe .WeaopeiHome MontIDI7 at h--e u iL o f ~ ibeef ii ha dyreadily-popaed qs~dm.~d fo,. il sa, ' wo*iy wAimgwpter riý' u and Wgîea L ~LA[SPORK \u0026 BEAN$ 10 grecients,« in a appl!ances., 'flic value of BMANS as a strength producing f ood needs no demonstration. Their preparation in appetizing form is, however, a matter entailing considerable labour in the ordinary kitchen. CLARK'S PORK \u0026 BEANS save you the time and the trouble. They are pre- pared only from the finest beans combined with delicate sauces, made from the purest factory equipWd with the most modern THEY -APlnECOOKED - \"ADY-SIMPLY WARM UP THe CAN BEIFORU OPERNINO -wClarlk Montreal BLACKWOODS PICKLES ARE THE-BEST eAsk your -dealer for BLACKWOODS Chow howSour Pickles, Sweet Pickles, White Onions, Worcester Table Sauce, Mustard Sauce and Sauer Kraut. THE BLACKWOODS LTDO WINNIPEG. had to be rafted' acrosa nain sw'ollen streama ..Wesougha. With ayellinijof incarnate fienda that 'would have etath- peded more sober brutes than oxen \u003cra.w- ing kegs of whiskey, down.-awooped the Blaek.f.et et just hese bard apotsa Some- timea the raids took place at night, ilhen tethers wouid be eut afd-the oxen stam- peded with the b.llowing e$a fright.ened buffalo herd. If the smugglera made X stand there wasa a figlit. If they dnew off, the savaeà capturéd the booty, and thene was aise a fight; but in this case the victime were the Indians killed lun their ôwn drunken brawls. Proteste from the tur compau7 de- frauded of lawful tradie, and. petitions frem the. missionaries, call'ed the atten- tion of the Dominion Govemment te thie outrageous etate of affaira at the foot- hill cf the Rockies. An act waa passed for the. formation of a mounted constabu- lary. The spice, of danger, devilry and adiventure ln the dutite of tée new force a.)pealed te tii. populer mdad. Men of all ranks tumbled oven each other lu tleir eagerness te enliet. Three hundred mcen were enrol'led and drilledb and lu July, 1874, the. Monted Police began their famous mmrch of two thouoandi miles gcrosa the. prairie te tthe foethillas, twe divisions stniking off northwand, one oniy 1eoming te\u003e Oldi Man's River, the emug- giers strengbeld, wbere Colonel Maeleod et once mark..I off the square for a fort, and hoiste\u0026a British llag in opposition te the. amuggier's regime. The goodwill of the Blaekfeet was soon Sained, and a frieihip establisbed between the. Moiited Police and the Blackfeet tiiet bas lasted te tihe nresent day. The emuggler» were too wary te eall down atte.ck from thei entire Mounted Police force by attenipting armed re- gstance. They piayed the well-known gamnes of sinuqglers the workb over. Whoep-Up lay in the bottom of a dcep ravine. Ou eue aide was a dcflinl the his ekwown as \"Slide Out!' On the -other aide waa a narrow pass called \"Siide lu.' When the red coata rode clan kingr through \"Slide In \" the mnugglers quietly sHippcd away threugh «Slide Out,\" Patrols scoured the boumdary lin. te the south, pasaing aîon'g the Fort Benton trail, and found. their smuggiers with the koaJs of whiskey in a gap in the Milk River Ridge which bas sunce been knowu as \"Whiskey Cap.\" At another point up the Belly River the. smugglers lhad whiskey in a \"cache\" and were attackcd by the confederacy of Blackfeet. Alter a stubboru figh.t the Indiana wcre beaten off and they caiied the place \"Stand Off.\" At \"Freeze Out\" a similar incident occurred,, but'tih. Leige of the attacking party waa of àe long duration that ti.e smugglcrs were coin- pelled te surrender, hence the name \"Freeze Out.\" \"Robber's Roost\" bas whiskzey connected with ite na. idn.g aise. The booty was. stolen, and for this reason and probably somte other Dot known, the appellation \"Robber's Roost\", wa.s appliedj to the place and district. The' compylet., gainut of smugggler's wiles had soon been exhausted by police vigfilance. In a f ew years the smuggiers lhad either witlhdra,,n f ront the country or taken up more lawful ii \"thods of bar- ter. Somne of tue old nMmnes given te places in tie days of unlawful wh-ik-ev sclling and Indian encounter, have bee'n changed te those befi 'n the position the places have taken in thic agricultural and induatrial world. But \"Whskev Gap\" la atili \"Wliisl-ey Gap,\" and \"Stand Off\" is \"Stand Off.\". Similarlv \"4Siide Out,\" \"M,001p Up,\" \"Bull florn'.\" and \"Jumnbo Valley\" have flot changed thej nameý by ivhich they were first knoIwn. WIUn$PM XMe, 1914. GOi1ng prlo There once was a theory, cherished by fond and fussy mothers, that going barefoot casd childréal's feet t» \"espread.», cTlhe eworthy mmmas had a ývision of a foot Iaýteied ont like a buckwbeat cake, whlch would in later years require- a mnonstrosity of-a shoe to covee ita hideouaneas. Sometimea they permitted thefr littie 'boys to cast off thefr shoes and stoekinga, for masculine pedal beauty ina not an altogether neces- sary thing. But their.little girls were compelled to confine jtheir pretty tocs as saerqdly as the tortured maidens of China. The prospect of corna and bunions and deformities were as nothing in comparison with the borror of \"spreading\" feet. It ia fortunate for Young America tha t tusfoot s'preading fetish bas been cast down. Nowadaya it la really a aigu of -menit for a mother to have bare- footed chikiren. It indicates\" that she han regard not only for the pleasure and happineas of ber youngaters, but also. for their health and hardiness. Even in the eity she permits ber children to wear sandais, with or without stockings, which in the next beat thing te going barefoot. A merry party being gathered in aeity fiat madè such a racket that the occupant of a lueighbonl -apartment sent hie servant down with a olite mese aaking ifIt would be \" le for tbJtparty to make less noim, sinoe, as the servant 1announced, \"«Mr. Smith, says thnt ho 1cannot rend.\"p \"I arn verï .orry for Mr. Smith,\" replied Lthe hest. 'Please present my compli- mnenta te your master, mny that 1 arn aorry he cannot read, and tell him I could when 1 was four years old!\" AFRAIO TO EAT Girl Starving on Poorly Selected Food. \"Several years ago I was actually starving,\" writea a girl, «yet dared not eat for fear of the. consequences. \"I had. suffered indigestion from over- work, irregular meals and improper food, until at last my stomach becamne iso weak I could eat scarcely any food without great distress. \"Many kinds of food were tried, ail with the saine discouraging effects. I ateadily lost health and strength until I waa but a wreck. of my former self. \"ýHaving heard of Grape-Nuta and its great merits, 1 purchased a package, but with littie hope that it would help me- I was so discouraged. \"I found it not only appetizing but that I could eut it as 1 liked and that- it satisfied the craving for food without causing distress, and if I may use the expression, 'it filled the bill.' \"For months Grape-Nuts was my principal. article of diet. I feit- from the very flrst thiat I had found the. right way to. heaith and happiness, and hny anticipations were fully reaiized. \"With its continued use I regained my usual health and strength. To-day I amn well and can eat anytbing I like, vet Crape-Nuits food forma a part of MY bill of far-e.\" Naine given by Canadian Postum Go., Windsor, Ont.- Rend \"The Road to W'ellvilc,\" in pkgs. \"'There's a. Reason.\" Ever read the above letter? A new one appears form time to tirne. They are genuine, true, and f ull cf himmun interest. ,.1 (~ ~ -.'~-. A t 'At, Mounted Polie Wagon and E.cort",
         "Wi4gMareb, 1914. The Western Home- Monthly Wild LoveEWN*S Vi Written for The Western Homie Monthly by Roy North. E I i HE mthermome auj quietly down T the bank and steo ed epi ths cool water. The calves, only a wee1 old, lingersd timaidly on the brink, afraid, to talcs the plunge. Thse mnother'a great nos.e tretehed up te, tbem, breathing ecoeuragement, and presently they atepped forward, plant- ing their unsteady feet gingerly in the soft black mud' of the siope. At iast the deseent was accomplished and they etood by her aide. it' was their *lirst acquaintance with eoid water, and they shiverl as it flowed, around their tender bodies, for the ice bad only just gene frein the lakes. .Suddenly the mother' was galvanized iute alertnese by au unuusal aound. Witb cars erect and noesniffing she gazed at the bend in the river, Once befors éhs bad heard that steady tapping-ths sound of paddlee on the aide of a canoe. iV wa long'ago, but she had cause te, remember, for a rifle bullet 'had *torm through the fleshy part of her neck and barsh criee bad pursued ber as ahs sought the ahelter-of the woods. Now ber firat thought was for her young. With desperate haste ahe urgsd thera cook and generally frollicked with ev«7-y %one. In the eveninga of the bot sum- mer they roamed the. lake shbestogether, and sported in reeu-y baye, returning te, the camp at dark. A stail was provideds for t'bem, and at night tbey were brought in.qide, tied up with the* teain of herses and fed with, oats from the manger. One man sione did net talcs kindly te them. This wasa Lihtning- Jim,\" the. teameter, a surly fellow wbo lhad earned bis nick-name becaus. be had neyer besu knowiù on\u0026sn.y eccasion te lis- stir hijuseif witb alacrity. Many a curs did Jim betew ou ths camp pets, thereby bringing upon himsf ths dis- favor of the men and the. deflant re- sentment of the bull maoose. Instinct toid the animal tbtit Jim disliked him, and oesday *when the teamater had faiaely tempted bini with an empty bueket, and tiien dealt kir#. a biow with the same, in wrathful di8appointment the young bull sent the can high in the. air and with lewered bead charged the offender. Fer once ini hie Ife 'Ligiitning' fled witl a apeed wbieh fuliy justified bis name, and the watobing miners, rearing witb iaughlter, chaffed hum accordingly. Inl future, both the moose were treated Canyon Lake, Aita. sabore and plunged paet them up the bank. IHardly was as b idden in the thick willews wben the bow of a canes rounded the, bend. Tbe keen eye.eof Rsddy Patterson., the. -'bowsman, were quick te notice the tell- tale signa of fresbly ohurned mud; and the atray moose baira flo4ting on thse water. It was the work of only a few seconds te tie the craft te, the wiiiews and Wincbester in hand tart in pursuit. Tbe branebea'érsbecl in front of him a tilb\"uge animal broke tbrough them in ita fligbt, and there, rigbt in bis patb, stood tbe twe calves, their retreat bnrred by a buge fallen log. Reddy drepped bis rifle, flung himscîf upon tiieux an.d shouted lustily for bis companion. The calves, exbnusted by their recent efforts and terrified by the. îuddennesa of tbeir capture, offered but feeble re- îistance as hey 'were carried te thie canes, and, witli legs firmly tied, de- posited on the. top of some sscks of fleur. 11 recken the beys 'Il be qlad te bave these youngsters as pets,' said Reddy as hie loeaed tiie canes and bent te tihe paddle. Reddy'a surmise proved correct; 'the men ef Gold Rock mining camp extended a benrty 'weicome te ths twe young captives. Cana of condensed milk were opened witb unwonted frequency b ythe. cook, and their content%, suitably diltuted, were lavisbed -upon ths calves. For Iiseir part, tiiey toek te their new diet iun a ianner wbich surprised everybody. -A week inter even t'ise most pessimistie mian in can\u003ep was fain te admit tbat thiey mnigbt ive. NoV eniy was tis prophesy fulfilled, but the. moose grew and even. thrived, in tiseir new surrounil- inga\u003e. Ail remetubrance of tbeir motiier fadedý and crs tbres mpnths bad passed tbey had quite adapted them.selves te the life of a mining camp. Every day Vey foliowed the me:? te 'wÔrk, rambisd in and out ef the stables, received tit-bita frein the bauds of thse by ««Ligbtuing Juin\" 'with a deferentiai respect higbly amusing te thos whe had wituessed bis discomfture. He was a prudent amsu, not given teoeurting dan- ger unnecessrily. .A year later, wbeu ewing'te ftnanciai difficultis, mining eperationa st (ield Reck weres uspended and the camp cioaed down, thers was net a man among thes minera who di\u0026 noV, feel sorry te, abandon Vhe two tains moose., Reddy Patterson iparticular cursed ths luck, aud swore he weuld net part with both of thein. Fiually it was decided tb4t the cow ahould accompany the party out tote raiiway, but -the bull ahould b. 1sf t te fend for bimsecf. At thia deciaien even Ligbtuing Juin epened bis heart, and filled up the man- ger with a liberal feed of oats for the. peer beast that must- remain. When preparations for departurs were complets, the door ef thée eupty stable was tbrewn wide, and the. young bull was 1sf t there feeding contentedly, aIl uneenscieus of tiie desertion. Âf er a turne he became restiess at thes unaccustemed silence, aud walked eut te ascertain the cause of iV. Tiie cabins wers; empty sud silent, sund net a soul was te be seenm Smokestaili issued frein the steve pipe of the cook-shack, and tiie acrid odor of burning wood assiled bis neatriis. Ou the. full trot he made bis way over te the cabin, clattering over the, piles of empty cana wbich lay in h is' path. H. wns confronted by a door ]ocked nnd barred against hum. Turning, be swung up by the. steep trail among tihe is Vo thse shaft moutis, but fniled te find any trace of bis human frienù;. Ail was sulent at tihe pit moutb, and h. returned àiscensolntely te the camp. Standing in Vhe clearing there among tbe deserted shacks, wbich already seemed te bave taken on an indescribably foriorn ap- pearance, the bull moose threw up hie head sud caiied loudily for bis maate. Tiiere wa.e ne auswer.. Lied by going et to ta had ike a later hoe to 9 they tst off lculins neces- i were oes as a of and itbing or of nerica, Sbeen lIly a bars- Lt bs -e and so0 for ýn in îWear kings, going RELUABLEL SPREAD -put before you two ,. packets of, say, lettuce seed. They are *as 1ke. as' tvo peas3\". 'Yet the. seeda from one packet are live, fresh, sure te grov Into crisp, 'delIclous heads- while the other zseeds -mnay b. old,- mot of themn dead, azàd*the others capable of I produclng only inférlor lettuce. You can't tell the differonce -you must rLsk. your gardený crops on the. good f aith and skili of the Seedsman. That's vhy It pays io buy Ewlng'a Reliable Seeds, whose umbeat.n record for sure grawth, and for bumper cropa ef superlor quality, 'extenda back oY«r 40 years, Write for Our Landom.i Mm. trat.d Catalogue, aI2d if your D«ere haWnt Ewingts Seea oder from us dàrect. M WILIM EWINGCOl, LUIUtE S..d Mehat32- MeGiilStr..% MoanmL »SL1avGoueSSuL PLANTEI OOtM 0 1 IM M-ERS', 'Limi \"ý IotoNTQF c m Rennie's Nei Seed Annual for. 1914. W\"L RENNIE Co., Tszwtbo*k.bornai a tthagin»m-rn1 1 momt euiable]Novdt..la Yv«aouum l UmmS1 w\"ic«nm.be obtatuM ed y dWIroebou m. Ma im -. WiterS.evm.ala c enl pteu #t*,*-~lamg Limited S ! AV EEE mftsfla1 calis moli , me at uucatd%,Mdibeaus the tbru uotmaibn.. : uce 0 l Mu couWheu w7itlrng, advertimers pieas.,mentin e. The Western Home Montisly. À. b ho plied rapli. E am )Ould ?Ood. iaily neDt )Ver- ,oper mse food",
         "Tii. Weste~n Home Monthly SAOLi FOUNI ing witer You want a wrtes$te\u0026anad id that wM I ot sip. w 09i your ingeRa.Sui an\" aksolutelyan rMaie hc . f nngl. action. iremntse aoveand b\"lw the apltdypeu pintmspplies a regulated flow of ink-juthei riglit amoant t. write meadlil ~rdot skP43\u0026 .T60e \"Srw-dowa cap Au aitiaoncts auJjewelors, in my syleor mieat $2.50 aid uet ir -Little Wiws' th si how mw nin a'm yor Pmu. at $3350 and up. Wznte f« àflvustd foicdu. Mabie, Tocld \u0026 Co* 124 YulSk ., TORON'TO. 17 Muiha Lum.. NEW YORIC. CHCAGO. LONDON PARIS BRUSSELS %lbit e u nue Jui1\"h. tuu, mmad fitas .aalAitW. md wont wilt or Crack \"Chmlknu\u0026Col-m scau Le lmaed wih a tub fumat clouli. Alwmys ummat mpysm\"n. I crde\u0026Wmie, doui uflrand seud mm 3 fo cuHamic 50Cf e faOU N\u003cew SyeooSet Free on Requsaet The Arlington Co. of Canada, Ltd. 54-M Fraser Avenue, TORONTO F-16 The Keoplng of a Queen's Wardrobe Fromib he days of fairy stonies up te the tins. of old age there is a peculiar fascination for wornen* in the m-ay queens dress, from whorn tley purchase their gown.s, and low they look in thern, but penhaps, even More interesting, be- eause so little knowii, is the inantier in wvhichi the wardrobe of a queen is takzen care of.1 Wliile Queen «Mary of England is said to be rather a dom\"dilv dressed person- age. and not at Ail uodisîr in appear- ance, being rather w-edded to old fash- ioned notions in regard to personal ado\",nmf,nt. vct zl4 !,i n - ' -ni 1%,ardrutbeu utail :',of \"t o' . or- For sevet ldays he liugered lu the viinity, hoplng she might return to hlm but a\u0026\u0026turne' paem and she did no eoin. hg aought for ber in the. deep woode, audw adOr\" furtiier a\"d further afield. Winte et in coki and pitiles., amd thre now lqy deep on the groun\u00266 Food alone' wg.s q Importance now, and it -Ued hlm sorely te fin\" sufilcient. Noth- ing was obtainable but the tels -Of the young birohès, and to get te hehowas drivm-iràlte the burut country wherq second peowtb w88 plentiful. At niglits h. wandered down into the. muskege to gain siielter from the bitter winds t -ut ewept roarigaros the upland iieights viientreA jte bhzard blew'. Thero, in thre thieket, lonely and cobi, ho slept, among the sombre aprucs. Hia former life became te him 'but a dim meinory, an almoet fore on paut. Then came summer, sud h. revelled lu' thre oo lakes and drew Up thre Miy pade Item the. soft MM\u0026 neH was almoet ful-ren ow a great, long-legged cr 7m = cieaid powerful, C'arryîng on Uni massive head a pair of Tapidly developiig bons. One moonlit October night, while wan- derig restlessly thrreugh the. wood9, ho came out on wbat bail once been a large clearing. Hif hidden ln the. nrk growth of grass aid young trsa etood a hittle row of esnpty log cabine. Soe- tuing strazrely familiar in the. scone awoke a sleeping chord in bis memory. 1ausing, ho rubiiel his borne against the corner of oie of the abacks, and ýstrovo vaguely te recail the past B]llow him lay the stili lake, gleaming white and peaeeful l ntire.moonligiit. On the. far-i tirer ubore the forest\u003e rose gloomy andi impenetrabàe, its glat t pruces standing« out drarply againat the â ky-line like teetb ofia gigantie aaw. 8uddeniy float- ing char andd \u0026,tiuot on thre stilles Came a long plaintive ceil. Thre bull stood spellbound, trembliig h 'er bre of bie being. -Ris big, sensyiivean mated forward, lsteuing eagely for a repetition of the. sound i Aanitu came, a low, mellow grunt,1 intensely appealng la itetous. It'wss, 1k. no other souMi on eartir. It wast th. love cal\u003e. It appealed te tthe primai instinct of bis nature, and his whole bodyi tbrilled in ropons. to it. Xveryting was clear to hlm now. In a \"ld came biack theo ld day. at the eamp--baMip days-daye wben lie hsd a playmate. What if it eroul4 ho she talu- ing îow? With a rush ho was ini the lake, aid the water Ilew fiashing in the Moouigbt before bhis swinging stride. Soon b. was eut of hie deptb,ud s.wim- 'Ming towards the spot from 'which the. Call camne. Hfis great boly cutting tbrough the calm, water left two long linos of silver ripples widening lu bis irak.. Would she eil again ? Yes; once more came thre inviting note, urging him to posater àpeed. Presently he reached the dim shadoir cast by the bush, and found footing. Here he pansed, standing belly deep lu the irator, with the. light playing eoftly on bis huge iret body An in- defluable fear assailed hiin. e Stood irre9olute, eniffiug the air.9 Suddenly frein the darkness in front came a blinding flash, and a heavy missile atruck him with the stunning force of a sledge-hammer. Hle was dimly conscions of a loud report, and the ex- cited cry of humai vo--ces. Thon ho stumbled, bruisinq 'hie kices on tIre3 rock bottein. Risiug, he plunged hlindlyt forward a feir paceà and fell face for.r irard among the rushes. 'Sport had tri umphed aid wild love lsy dead fort ever.t \"For msny years I hsd used colfe and refused te ho convinced of its bsd offeet upon the. humai systexn,\" writes a voterai sehool teseher. (Tea. la just as bsrrnful because it contains caffeine, the same drug found lu coffoe.) «Toi years ago I iras obliged te give up my mucii-lovcd work ln the publie schools sfter, years of continuons labor. 1 iiad developed a well deflned case of., chronie coffee poisoning. \"Tiie troubles irere constipation, flut- teninga of the heart, a tiiumping in the top of my hesd rand varions parts of My body, twitching of my limba, shaking of my iicad and, at tirnes after exertion, a general \"gone\" feeling, with a toper's desire for very strong coffee. 1 iras a nervous wreck for years. \"A short tirne ago friends came té visit us and they bronght a package of Postum iritIr them, aid urged me to try it. I1iras prejndiced because some years back I had drnnk a cup of wesk, tastelesa stuif called Postum which I did not like at ail. \"This timo, however, my friend made the Postum according to directions on the package, aid it iwon me. Soon I found xuyself improving lu a most d- cided fashion. \"The odor of boiling coffee no longer' tempta nme. I am eo greatly benefite4 by Postum that if I continue to improvo as I arn now, Fl1 begin to thunk I have found the Fountain of Perpetual Youth. This is no fancy letter but stubborn facts which I arn glad to make known.\" Narne given by Canadian Postum Co., Windsor, Ont. Write for a copy of 'Tie ]Road to WeIlville\"1 Posturn now cornes in tw.o f'orms: Regular Postum-must be well boiled. Instant Postum-is a soluble powder. A teaspoonful dissolves .quickly in a eup of huot water and, with erearn and sugar. makes a delicious beverago in stantly. Crovers q «ell hoth kinds. IThere's a 1Rcaso,\" for 1'osturn. 's; '*'~ I i unoohly blot oy the \"Swiu is asurcd nary govie aMd wraps and thoir acces. sories, ail of whioh are kept in Bucking- ham Palae, London. The robe room, as the apartmaent con- taining the queen's wardrobe je called, is one of a suite' of rois aituated im- media.tely over the dreusing.rooms occu- pied by the. queen's dressing maidg, and is in charge of the. Chief dres.ing maid. Rtis a Yery large apartrnent, the walîs of Whiich are Iined with big m nahogany- wardrobes and drawers, that hold a full length skirt. Al1together,. tiiere are ton large warcirobee, and in thie tlire largoat are kePt the quee's state robes and gownas, and in the otiiera ber ordi- nary evening- aftermnon street and bouIse dressea. Several maids keep these dresses in repair and in perfect condition, and, over- night, the. ehief dresser is informed. by the queen's secretary, mistrçs. of the robe., or some othor peréona atten- dant, which dresses the. quoen will require the following day, and the. tiuie wieh ée. will need\u0026 thiou. 1The . flrst gown to be wor i takento.the q-yeen'a dressing roomn by one. of the maide, -who goos witii the chief dresser 1W ssist iu the toilet. The next dreàs.- in thon taken to thbe dressing room at. tbe hour the. chief dresser ha., been instrueted to have it ready, and go on, during each part of the day. .Thora is a pèrfect system, too, for keePing the. gowns, bats and wraps, for eaah gown and its accessories are placed togethor, and each bears a nurmber, and this number and particmlars of tii. gown s to trimMings, time of purchase, ker, and geo 094 are entered in a book, which in kept in charge by the. chief dresser, whIo cani, at an instant' notice, turn to tuis book to find ont just wbei the dres waapurhesu~and from whou. Queen aryil ratiier economical in regad teberClothes, and it- in said IIVe Or six tbousand dollars a year 'will cover 'ber expenditure, not only for ber Ordinary gowns, but for ber state gowns as well aid many of ber walking dresses have pot «o»t more tiian 30 dollars, while Inany an evening gowu. bas not exceed!od one bundred dollam'rs.er atate 90w» aand robes necessarily cont ]much m'ore, but even at that the queen doos SCHOOL lEACHERS Also Have Things to Leamu Wbolpm mumb 1914. Irbe. Westepn Home Monthly lýewý q., 1",
         "winiùme, Mari, 1914. acces. cking. t~ Con- Malied, id imn- Occu- 1, -and aid. walls agany Id a *e are tiiree robes ordi - bouse es in over- bd. by .the Ltten- 1 iii time .first Meen'e , wbo, iet ln then t tihe been 0 on, , for 3, for Ulced ,and gown .ker, wbhieh mser, rn to dres ai in said r ber owne esses Bars, net state much doos The Western Home Mon thly tails no dutiee, the real duties being per- formed by the cbief dresser, and the ouly work-if auch it be--to sucli a potition is te ýstand beside the. quecu on state occasions, and control the maids of honor. The. present migtress of the robes is the Duchees of P~ortland, that state .nd wenderful duaheâse ef an ,oid and -prou\u0026~ line,-fer the miÙstren Q~f tihe -robes must necesarily always be a ducbess in rank, ne other being allowed te stand beside the. queen. linfortunate Expression not pay Out hîIf oS ber clothes that msn~y milIionahres vives apend on theirs. ,The, too, eh. westa lier gov». a long tins., £fld eeme of her serge and walking dresses remain ini her var\u0026dobe for a yea. or more, and are often wora. iler evening gwe»te w il vear a dozen di 'jiiore time, before they are put out of -tha royal-wardrobe, and- sbe viii vwear ,fterlioof or semi-evening gowns frein a dosen, te twenty times before ebe will ai- low tiicm to.be taken put of the robe room. l'ie queen bszdiy ever orders an exact zeproduction of a model gev», prefer- ring te have bers made on ratiier simple ,sUa old-fashionied ideas, and ber dTesses ae tried on at Buckingham Palace, and tb. modiste is expectedl neyer te, require more thami eue ftting s a Demi ftting would be a breech of queenly etiquette. For instance, the modiste Wbo je te be honored with thie queen'. ew~tom lie ne- tiffld that -the. royal person viii eall at ber shop at a certain heur on. a certain day, when, of course, every arrangement mut, be made te, receive the queen. The modisl gowns are then ehowu on mani- quin\u0026 or living modela ef about tbe queen'. figure, and vihen. a style is ciiosen directions are given as te the color and how tbey muai be made up, and as soon as ready \"ornea thie on. fittipg at Buckingham Palace. Tbree or four gowne are usually ordered at one time. AunAlberta Threhing Uons Wile the. dowager queen, Alexandra, la iu tii., habit of diecaidiug two pair of g loves' or sometimea mere each day, Queen Mary ha- even bee» knevu to h ave bers cieaned a.nd weara tbem severai tizuee. Thon, tee, se buys al of lier gewne and accessories, poesible, in Eng- land, wble the former queen preferred te aend te Parie for biers. Princees Mary, daughter of the. queen, 'bas now a dress allowance of $250 a year, sud je eue of thie meet economically attired princesses ini the world, ber dress bille being less than mnuy a youug girl of the middle ciags. Up te a fow years ago the princess vere dresses made f rom the queen's cast off gowns, Mise Con- pa.nce Selby, the. queen's ciief dresser, dbing the remodelliug. Even her evening frocks are nov for the most part made over f rom ber mother'e gev»., a.tbough for aomie very formai occasiones mie bas been alilowed, lu the. past tire years, to have a really new oue. This royal inaiden, too, je not allowed kid gioves except for drese occasions, andi quite commoly wears white tbread gloves, costing j0 cents a pair. Se very plainly and economicaily is the young princew econamonly dressed that even the. ladies of the royal bouse- hold, wbe follow tise queen's lead in uiany tisings, wmli net dres tieir daugis- ters in the nsonnçr in mbich the princes is attired. The. queerr wmil net alleir, save for evening wear, collarless dresses on hier daughter, and net long since, be- cause thie daughtere of the London smart set attending Mr\u0026. Marghall's fashionable dancing school wore iew cut dresses, withdrew ber deughter from the class. She aIse refuses te allow ber daugliter t-t wear any jewelry, and aise insists 11pon full skirt.3. Ilowever, in spite of the qucens old- iashioned ideas and economies, thse posi- fin of mistress of the royal robes is one ûQi-erly sought for, as newadays it en- beautiful, being of vihite marbie, with iliver hardware; a. musid-box vas con- oealed ln the roomu Af ter completion of the. home an Englishman came te visit tise dt\u003e-tor. Now the. Engliph always show great respect for their sovereigu and their country, and thia one vas no exception., After showing (hie home te tthe English- man lthe doctor rememubered the fond- nese English people bave for tise bath, a.nd escorted his guesit tbte batiiroom, and wbile there turned\u003e on tise musie- box, wishing to give bis guest a pleasant surprise as ho bathed. Tien he lef t bis f iend in the batbroom. About an heur later the. Englishman jeined is host ini the drawing room. The dooitor Irnmediately azked viiot bis. guest thought of the bathroom.» The Englishman replied, \"It is beau- tiful, beautifuL. \"WVell,\" .eaid the doctor, \"bow did TOU like xny music-box?\" gaid bis guest with great disgust in his, tones: \"Bah! That nusic-box!- The old tbiug played God Save the King and I bad to stand up the. wbole trne I vas trying te bat.be.' OnIy A Lion-laMer He was a giant of a man, and brougit lus nieek-looking littie wife before the magistrate on the charge of cruelty. lie described ber to tihe court as being uncontroilable and incorrigible. He seemed sincere, A writer in the Nemi York Times têlIs the story. The magistrate looked the big fellew over carefully, and glancing at his slip of a wife, asked the husband: ,,Miat line of business do you f ol- low ?\" I am a lion-ta er,\" he proudly re- lplie,. Stengtliens. EDWARDS' desiccated SOUPS ai strengthen wealc stews, they impart the fine fresh flavour of Irish garden-grown vegetables to tasteless soups;- they make' the gravy much more savoury ; they, improvo. nearly ail the recipes in the ookery book ;,-these handy. 199Jacks -of aIl Dishes,\" these Ed wards' dcsi=cted Soupe. The food bills will bc smaller, the appetites larg e Me noigt tero and the. work easier, ywith Edwardsi' -Soups w help-y-om t e ki.tchcm ---- liportant: Remember to lot thoan boil for iat least1ii\"Lihout. *w But YON MUS T boil dagisfor Aaeaaor -war\u0026f Idwarde'Soup is good n sIoup bY itSCIfit le good esa obestregl. - cner of other soups ; good ne a thickener cft gravies ; good for kath\"h good fog sîcws - too good te bc poilcd by insufficicut boUuîe ros varlotl-ms-'wUTmoa Mi1 18048=4 of au whek\"l a tti ros~os To b. bai from Wholeuale ami Rtafl Groeffl Ywre W. B. ESCOT-. \u0026 Co, LIXITBD# WINNWE# Rtepresutatives for Maultoba, Baac.a m 3ot Ask your neighbor to take The Western Home Monthly I Write for special clulbing offers 4- .That fruitbful source of minih, the mixed metaphor, ie ever vith us. It illustrates on alimoat every appearance the trutuh of tbe sayng that the. sublime and the ridiculous are but a stop apant. In a book on the laboring man, con- taining smre excellent idiss there .ap- peared the following sentence: \"Whatmmnner of ven is she wbo would turn ber eyes tevard otiier things, whieh would become asies on ber very Iips ?\" The flippant anever is, ef course, \"A cross-eyed voman.» An American doctor buit an elegant home, saya the «\"San Francisco Ciiron - ici..» JE\u0026 batèroom vas exceptiena,11y offée bad rritee mest reine, give se of fini- itiiç f My king rtion, per'S Wa a e té ,e of e te ome veak, I did nade S en n I Sde- unges' fte4 nove have rth. brn Co., MTise",
         "àThe western Home Monthly lWinniPeg, Ma.rch, 1914. UNION BANK 0F CANAA\" - - - - - -i , - HEAD OFFICE -WINS-IPEG Pl ÏCapital ........ .... 5.000,000 I.eserve Fuad and Undivlded Profite 3,400,000 Total Asseta, -over.................. 80 P00.O0 HON. P RESVflENit-mwM. _PRICE. ESQ. PRESIDENT-JO)fN OALT, ESQ. VICE-PRESIDENTS ILR T. RILEY, Esq. G. H. THOMSON. ENq. DIRECTORS W. R. ALLAN Es.C M.P. S. BARKE ., HON. M. BUL, Esq. LIEUT.-COL. J. CARSON E. L. DREWRY, Esq. E. E. A. DU VERNET, Esq., K.C. S. HAAS, Esq. F. W. HEUBACH, Esq. F. E. KENASTON, Esq. W. SHAWEs. B. B. CRONYN( Esq G. H. BALFOUk, General Manager. H. B. SHAW Assistant General Manager. F. W. S. CIÙSPO, Superintendent of - Branches. -llud Office, Winnipeg. London Eng., Branches: 51Threadneedle Street, E.C, and West End Branch, Haymarket, S.W. Branches andi Agencies West of the Great likea Manitoba-Baldur, Birtle, Boissevain Brandon Carberry Carman, Carroll, Clearwater Crystal City, Cypress River, bauphin, beloraine, éflenboro, \"Hamiota, Hartney, Iollaid, Killarney, Manitou, McCreary, Melita, Minnedosa, Minto, Morden, Neepawa, Newdale, Ninga, Rapid City, Roblin, Roland, Russell, Shoal Lake, Somerset, Souris, Strathclair, The Pas, Virden, Waskada, Wa- wanesa, Wellwood, Winnipeg .Saskatchcwan-Abbey, Adanac, Alsask Arcola, Asquith, Assiniboia, Bounty, Buchanan, Cabri, Canora, Carlyle, Craik, ëupar, Cut Knif e, Dinsniore, Dummer, East End, Esterhazy, Estevan Eyebrow, Fillmore, Gravelbourg,, Guernsey, Gui! Lake, Herbert, Hugliton, Ïiumboldt, Indian Head, Jansen, Kelfield, Kelvin- hurst, Kerrobert, Kindersley, Landis, Lang, Lanigan, Lemberg, Loverna, Lumsden, Luseland, Macklin, Maple Creek, Maryfield. McRorie,' Melfort Mey- ronne, Milestone, Moose Jaw, Moosomin, Morse, Netherhill, Neudorf, ôgema, Outlook, Oxbow, Pense, Perdue Piapot, Plenty, Prince Albert, Qu'Appelle, Regina, Rocanvi!le, Rosetown, 9askatoon, Scott, Sceptre, Shaunavon, Sim~pson, Sintaluta, Southey, Strassburg $wif t Current, Tessier, Theodore, Togo. Tompkins, Vanguard, Veregin, \\iceroy, Wapella, Wawota, Watrous, Webb, Weyburn, Wilkie, Wndthorst, Wolseley, Yorkton, Zealandia. Alberta-Airdrie, Alix, Barons, Bashaw, Bassano, Bellevue, Blackie Blair- more, Bowden, Bow Island, Brooks, Calgary, Carbon, Cardston, Carlstaât, Car- stairs, Cereal, Chinook Claresholm, Cochrane, Çonsort, Cowley, Didsbury Ed- monton, Empress, Fort kaskatchewan, Grande Prairie, Grassy Lawe, Hanna, Iligh River, Hillcrest, Innisfail, Irvine, Lacombe, Langdon, Lethbridge, Macleod, Medicine Hat, Okotoks, Passburg, Pincher Creek, Seven Persons, Standard, Strathmore, Swalwell, Three Hills, Wainwright, Winnifred. British Columbia-Enderby, Glacier, Hazelton, Lillooet, Nanaimo, New Hazelton, Newport, New Westminster, Prince Rupert, Smithers, Telkwa, Van- couver, Vernon, Victoria. This Bank having'over 310 Branches in Canada, extendini front Halifax to Prince Rupert, offers excellent facilitiez for the transaction o! every descrip- tion of bankîng business. It bas correspondent. in ail the cities of importance throughout Canada, the United States, the Continent of Europe, andi the British Colonies. Collections matie in ail parts of the Dominion, anti returns proniptly re- niitted at lowest rates of exchange. Two Central Offices in Winnipeg-Main St. and William Ave., D. M. Neeve, Mgr. Portage Ave., cor. Garry St. (atjoining Post Office), F. J. Boulton, Mgr. Other Branches in Winnipeg as follows :-Corytion Ave., Logan Ave., North End,- Sargent Ave., Portage Ave. anti Arlington St., Sargent Ave. and Arlington St., 490 Portage Ave. TO INDEPENDENT GR AIN SHIPPERS The railways have now plenty of empty cars for farmers to load with grain to be shipped to Fort William and Port Arthur. Ship forward any- time now and meet the sdvancing market that seems certain to be coming. If possible use the loading platform and load direct into car and so save elevator charges and dockage. We are not track buyers. We do flot buy the farmer's grain on our own account. We look after and dispose of carlots of grain on the usual commission basis-of le. per hushel, rtrictly as agents for those who employ us, always endeavoring to do the best possible for the farmer's advantage. We make liberal advances at 7 per cent interest on ail grain consigned to us for sale, and carry it in anticipation of higher prices as long as our cliente consider it advisable. Write to us for shipping insrtructions and market information and advice. Thompson, Sons \u0026 Co. Grain Comiso Merchants 700-703 D, Grain Exchange, WINNIPEG, Canada EDDY'S WASHBOARDS HAVE A SPECIAL CRIMP THAT MNAKES WASHING VERY EASY SAVE TIME AND TEMPER w A s H B O A R D s ARE EASY ON HANDS AND CLOTHES The open hand of f4ýý Ias I photographed it yT had long been the desire of my *heart to possess a hand-camera, and Sthe seductive announcement that its owner had only to, \"press the but ton\" end an obliging coinpany would \"do the reat,\" seemed to promise albums filleti with delightful studies without any great amnoun't of trouble. Alas! the truth proved very different, as the sequel will show. I diacovereti that it was one thing to stroli arounti with a camera, and quite another thing to take photographs. 1My camera was a fairly good one of the usual type, five-by-four size, antd carrying the plates in double backs, of An ealy attempt co pnotograph Kung Henry VlI's Chape! a! Westmiinster, England which I aecured a suffiient aupply to bulge out my aide pockets in a somne- what conapicuous fasîtion. Elated, I set forth with a dozen plates in the double backs and 'proceeded to take my first series of photograplis. Thie flirt anap-shoit was an irresistible figure study. In a slîady nook, under a dense clumip of shrubs, sat a charming littie girl dressed in red andi îursig a black terrier in the moat affectioîîate manner. I set the instantaneous shutter of the camera, carefully adjusted thte focus, dIrew the slide, anti cautiousl 'v approacli- ing My Ufsispectilig victiîn I tiuly pressed the button anti' retired inh triumph. It will be conivenient to state the result at once. Lite in the eveninv' whien the ligbt hati fadeti sufliiently t( eniable me to mniake luse of iny bedr:oni as an extemporisedt dark-rooin, 1 pro- ceeded eagerlY to thie task of deelopinig iny firat plate. After getting nvfing-ers '11rare îess, anti rocking the d islî -hakkards andl for- 'varda for a consii!irahle tne, tile reýýjjî sleered to be rallier less tuit 1111 ing Finally sollîe -aguje, i] yturil. patcli sapilareil, andtilte fa intest possible gliost of a ýface cuuild be madie out. Tlîat w-a ;all i n!, flho rest was siinlîpix a bla nký. Then ii1 lea rned that !n '-i:înftaini -, siîa1î -b Il 'hould only be ta k n ilbil,îliglit a ný! Do not place your itter bef ore the wimdow whon you ta ke hier portrait! When I first attempted to'phiotograph a church a new difficulty presented it- self. Try what' I could, the top of the steeple would not corne into the ]ittle picture shown on the finder. The width of the atreet would net allow one to get any farther awvay, and of course a pic- ture of a chiurcli minus the upper tijird of the steeple wvould be a thing to laugh at. Hlappy thoughit! Tilt the camera a littie anti the steeple will corne into the field of vit-w adiîably. No soonier said than done, and the next moment the pliotograph w vas taken. But when the negative w-as tieveloped and a prinit matde, the etifying spectacle wvaa pre- sented of a church in an adivanced stage of intoxication! The entire front of the building - steeple and ail - was ap- parently reeling 'and threatening to fali backwards. Evitlently, tilting the camera Th Ce t'ir-ra exaggcrates the size of the oi.-ýlts nearest toit Y' -~ pi 4 t I i 'i. s, t y. 4 .1 1-- -",
         "Winnipeg, M\u0026arOh, 191f4. would not do, and as My Camera had no rising front or swing back, the offiy way of negotiating a tail building was to take the pbotograph from some elevateti position, stuich as an upper winidoewr roof, I bad not done miich witJi tbe camera bfore meeting with a mishap with wlich Miost amateur photographers becine familiar. 1- had set, the shutter, patiefitly rstalked -tha obWet-it W-as a-rather rest- less cow grazing in a field-got it veili in the centre of the finder andimade the exposure. Then I went to close the slide, only to discover that I had forgotten te draw At and se, in spite or ail my ail! The effect of *drying a ne.-ati ve before the fire My first attempt at the production of a meonlight photograph resulted in a very curious picture. Knowing tha't a long exposure would be necessary in or- der te secure any effect at ail, T placed the camera in position, opened the shut- ter and lef t it for about an heur. But on developinent a long white rib. 'bon appeared in the sky instead of t.he expected imagc- of the moon! The fact was - I had forgotten that the moon travels across the aky! Very often, in rnaking a hasty anap- shet, I missed the object entircly or only got part of it on the plate. On the other band 1 sometimes ýgot tee much, especially Iu trying my 'prentice banid at portraits, len the size of the sitter's Unda and feet was apt te cause very unfiattcring criticismns te be passed botît on my apparatus and myself. 1 T'hé most terrible pictures of ail wcre produced on one occasion wlien I was pressed for time and tried týo hasten the drying process by putting flhe negatives near the fire. As a conséquence the films partly melted and ran over tFe glass, and the photegraphs when printed showed buildibgs and people zig-zaggiilg about in every stage of inebriatien! Not a Canadian Band To tue leader of a lîand in Omahia, je\u003eculariy speken of in that locality as \"theworst in seven different states,\" there onceecarne a niait with a request that the band play at a- cousini's funerai. 'Is it a niitary funeral'1\" asked thte leader. \"Net at ail,\" -as tlie reply. \"My cousn-as ne -militai- - nlitfact, lie \\as iever even interested lininatters nulitary., LNevertliîees s, it ivas ]bis ex- ]H'ss m-islh that your band siouid play at bis funeral.\" The leader was surprised and flattered. \"Is that so?\" lie asked. \"Yes,\" respeonded tlie otiier. \"Tle rnid lie wiiîîtedl evcriie{1)l% in Onalîa te be sorry tîtat lije dicd.\"-ILrper's Wcekly. What we want A Sniday Scl:el class -%as istening, te a lesson on patience. TItis mvas ývh.t e;mie of it. at Ivast iii tlie minds of thc more litvra1-ini(ed. chiidren: Tfhe topie liad been carefully expIa in- ed. and as an aid to unidcrst4anding,. the tea ehler hnadgiven eaclc pupii a card, bear- il, dite pture ef a boy fishing. \"Even pleasure,\" said sie,\"rqre tl- exercise of patience. Sec te blrn Hiiiî! le nmust sit andI wait itdl Har. le must be patient.\"' liaving treaied the sibjcct veri' flly, 1 Iquestion: -And now \u003can annvlittle 1)0v telll'e \\%I ;t m we nut-euj o-t.*Vhiimiwv ,,(; liiiig 'leiý amsîer xvas shouted w ith oeue Voice, Written for The Western Home Mlonthly by Charles Dorian rj ,lEapplicant looked capable. H1e j ad a broad, proninent chin. Bis e9ves did have a tired look and he- -Va0 ti, 1 ut11tVe foreman sized hirmup to lis advantage. \"Good -constitution?\" he asked. \"Not bad-sometimes I get an attack of indigestion, but inm generally al riglit. Think a land job is best for me. Before I was chief engineer on the tug, 'Emily' ran a little1farm of My own.\"ý \"Married ?' \"Yes, three girls.\" \"Sometipng te work for.. Yeu eught te make good. Start at seven to-niglit.\" \"Thank you, sir.\" A bucket hoist or \"whirley\" is a simple piece of rnachinery. Alertness is the main qualification for the runner, q)ý engineer, te, possess. To lose control of the levers ivhile a bucket ia being raised, swung or Iowered would be disastrous for the human machines below decks. With'the riglît hanid.,he. operates the lever that throws in the lutch for hoisting; at al- most the saine,.time.jie..bandles the steam tlirottle, and *with' tNo, left band operatesl the swûigingiAeFer, while his right foot rcsts oi the brake pedal tg, keep the bucket suspcnded. Some bc- come se expert at handling a machine of this kind that't7aking up a f ull bueket of coabfrorm the'hoId of a vessel, swinging and -lifting- to--a car-ttirty icet p-and~ forty feet eut from the vessel is ail one eperation. Ail this, McParland learned in a night. In a year he was an expert few could equal. In three years he was chief en- gineer on that ceai dock. In the fifth year changes were made. A new dock foreman wvas appointed. He cailed the chief engineer, \"McParland,\" and -watchied him stcrniy as he wvent about his work. As chief, his werk liad beçome more ardueus. H1e was cempelled te run a hoist ail day and make repairs in overtime. Urgent repaira during thie day were supervised by him. 11e began te walk with a steop; the angles of bis frame shawed prominently; bis jaws became cadaverous - be grew gaunt. 11e laid off two days with in- digestion. Tie work piled up. WThen, at last, the season drew te a close and arrangements were being made for the next he went te the foreman and cenfided: \"This werk is beginning te tell on me. Standing, at thein levers and bendin' my back for three, four and five ji I.' Imore is runnin' me do,%wn. I was thinkin' this job should support a man on repairs ail the time. What about it ?\" \"It would keep yeu goin',\" cdnfessed the foreman. \"But I ain't autiorized fo grant no0 sech concession. Better istay's you are and sec what turne up on the new plant.\" «'H'm,\" grunted the foreman at MePar- land'a disappearing back. \"«Keep 'ma goid'~? - He½i ma*e -tthree -hoùrm'--work~ last ten. He kmn run ail around thefi other histers and do it blindfolded, but on repaira he's a loafer. Gueàs he's ga.t the 'steamboatin\" fevér agin.\" At the beginning of the eighth season, McParland- broached the subjeet agamu: ' been 'with tItis company eight years now and I think I'm entitled te seme- thing easier. What about that repair job this year?\" \"Same as las t, McParland, but if it's an casier job you want, why don't you get a transfér to one of t'bc coal chuteà on the line as fereman ?\" And MParland book a chute foreman. ship -that winter. The travelling inspecter found him one day, morose. \"What's th~e natter, Jack ?\" he asked. \"Oh! this isn't the place for me. It'a a worry ail the time. Tbere's nothing to learn at this work and the livin' is high. Say, when is -the new plant goin' up ?\" \"Ready in the spr¶ng, Jack, ready in the spring! Get you transferred .if yen like. You're second man on the Depart- Every puff of P. A. is a wallop! Get that punched into your systeml Neyer was such jimmy pipe tobacco, because no other tobacco but P. A. ever was made by'the patented pro- cess that c uLs oui ,the bite and the parchi1 You, and every other man, can smoke a pipe ail you: want if you'll only get wise and stick to iRlNCE ÂA the inter- national Jo It's true blue sport to open the A. M. with a jimmy pipe packed full of p. A. So fresh and pleas- ing and so fragrant that the songs of littie birds and puifs of joy smoke just put the music of the early sunshine right into your system 1 Getlthe idea? R. J. REYNOLDS TOBACCO Winston-Salem, N. C., U. S. A. The western. Home Mont hey, cd anti photo- rai titre. Léwif- of the able in 'e lady 1 neyer ut ab- y light ,wn îgraph ed it- )f the little width te get a pic- titird latigh era a ýo the r said ,the n the print pre- stage )f the s ap- 3 fal Lmera ccts . 1",
         "10 urt4 r,â ad I gos yen stand a, Srun nul'eeoetthe nov daimas.\"1 prouuid job?\" \u0026 -caa't promise, yeu now utelili. *. take it, but I'dbe we:e j\u0026liýtwain't a year round job.» eutof.tskit the inspce ýrýx» èb toanother - \"mbâat-~ be b4at wu athe Word!1 *6 xI' luh year John MePariand s imhe l hrd man ou the DOW pIa~That la, ie vas to be senior dlamn z.ui, w*bu ho learned the vork Ho, Wa\u0026)Put oun.a mothly saary'. ' îe.tloe1It over with the Dock Super- \"Ny~h1thlanBoue tec, geod and I May. *èt.t otAlou\u003e, ny tee vol lier. as the bou a: log.l'y. been with the cern- ~uy~uo yarunov aMd I thluk they ~ smotinge\u0026aslr-seme- - 'I1iiu le, a , very unsentimental .conoer, I\u0026 -\".-ML. mzad.:wem PA pre tobni cIf :l soweiOdy eiso.-coid do it botter ve'd have 'to ý tep dowu. The longer or luthi ervffice -the morework ve're pe*qd ýte do-ne»,t' leOO Wube tli.y ero talking a brlght-ey ed lad At' tvept-two ame up nd nodded to Swykces, the. foeou, that ho wanfed \"Get a a e fr.yme .1e'te \u003cI have,\" aeknowledge Swykes. 1'Where ake you, from?Il 'Tm Juat eut oft'the Sehool'of Scieilce and miy name i18 Andy Sheffield. .I1 wai4t togat a practical educatien .an4l I'd like nothwng btter than te learu hQw to run eue et those edams.\" \"Càn:yenoustart right away t\" \u003c'Sure,,I'v gSt my overll lu,.-this parel\"ý «\"Ail riglt-ge up - into -number two tower and look on-l'il'b. up. there ini hait-au-hour' tolintràduce yen to the work\" * McParland vas learning.to run num- làir ,two deami. -Shèffieid --watçbed ihim.- tMtheariandtud hth h e lever\u0026- were nt tesm aonth\"whirleys.\" The foot bréké 'ou'the \"-whirley\"- vas the steim. throte of the clam engine. This was dangerously confusing. Hie took haif-h'oiir easons three or four times a day- te, avoid holding the work back, tee mi40b. Sometimes- ho wouid'miss a hali- boum. -Sheffield vas getting- ouý gepd terms with the. runner, and during these hait -heurs b. took. a trial at ILt, In three days he vas a botter runner than McPamland. McPiA.and told hie experiences at home. RÉosie, his eighteen-year-oid daipghter, vas au eager listener. The tlr-ed ieok'lu bnis eyes called forth ber Pity. jHo vas a young man, grown stiff. Someone crueliy said that be vas get. tmgossi\u0026fd..y .Eight babblinq youngsters crowded'the roôm and interrupted the. stornes he'toid, of the. day'Work. Their cbattering sounded harsh te hlm. They weie getting ou b is nerves-everything was-geâiàg on'his nerves. rit. H~oatoj~p Homo Mffl~tI1Iy ~~. y' -4 -t Winnlpegi Mareh, 1914. 1 Nemit day b. bandied the machine noe' ciumily.It was a 'day et disaster. Litti accidents bappened 'ail over tii. plant and ho.- crewned the disastrous spell by a miscalcuiatiou iu releasing a cabIe.ý It siackened quickl\u003e 'ferreda loep, and caught the. blov-off cock onL the boler. A sudd.en-jerk ot the cable lyanked eff the.çeock and\"shot a ebgargç,of-- àtem-inte the -faceoutAÂndy Sheflield, who, putting ceai into the bunkers had just then straightened up, receiving the full force of the sudden exliaust. Blinded with pain, ho groped for his fir- ing-hee and banged at the hoiler, front until he had the fire-box door opened, raked madiy at the flaming coais, sereamed whiie he worked, yelled for water te kili the fire \u003eý- and fell un- conscious acresa the lurid coais. MeParland, wbo vas eunting on an explosion, ieaped back frem. bis 1ook-out windew in time te catch Sbeffield before the ceaie baal burned through his ciothes. A streani et vater shot up tbrough the ladder-way, flooding the floor and at the -came time bringing the sealded youtÈ--to - sensibility. He breke away trom MePar-' land and greped toward the iadder-way, slipped tbreugh and dropped lu a heap on the trestie below. McParland fol- Iowed quickiy, and with hclp carried the suffering lad te the hospital. \"WMat a clumsy man you are!\" scolded bis wife, wben ho toid the-news at borne. She scolded bim often nov. The bis vere eting abead of them. Hie feit keenly ber fretsful harangues. \"Oh! dry up, Martha, and give me a littie peace,\" be pieaded. \"I get enough trouble without coming home for it.\" \"Trouble, huh! I wish I had y'our job and you bad mine for a change.,I'd like te know if tbere's any trouble handiu' eight children. 1 don1t know what'd ever become of us if yen lest your job!\" \"Oh, mother,\" interpesed Rosie, \"«Don't think et such a thing. Poor dad needs cheering, don't you, dad? You must feel badly enough without baving it 'rubbed in.' It wasn't ail your fault. that the fireman wae hurt, was t\" \"Yes, Rosie, Pmrnatraid it vas. I don't tbink M'I ever get eut et the habit ef runnin' the small hoists, and I often make the mistake et puttin' my foot on the steam. throttie thinkin' it is the brake. It was an accident thait the blow- off.- cock was caught, but it doesu't. ex- cuse me; I Was -su pWd .uhv oto of that calife.» \"Dad! \" exclaimed Rosie, \"1did it occur to yen that Mr. Sheffield migbt ihave been anywhere else but just there at that time? lis fate seems te be linked in soute way with yours. Bother that old throttle! Xts a wonder they wouldn't put it where yen couid reach it with your band instead et your foot. I always t'heuglit an engineer worked thie tbrot 'tie with bis hand. Poor fellow,\" she mused, irrelevantly, \"boy he must sufTer! We must do aIl we can for him. Our own fate is not in se bad a a. \"lIe's a brave lad,\" complimented ber ratheT .\"Hie probably saved both our lives by \\ulling the lire. Thc injecter svas on. Çold water peuring inte a burn- ing boilerh as sent more than one ma-n te eternity./ If Sheffield had net been there I'd have-I'd have-Iet-her-blow-up!\" \"Oh, dad! What a crime thst weuid be! Think of the awful retribution yen weuid have te pay.\"l \"Think what weuld become et his farniiy!\" broke in 'Martha, spiashing ber roning venomously with a sponge. ['hat's him-just'thinks ef bimself!\" \"Ill warrant he thinks et us ail,\" re- spended Rosie. \"I'd be. lu favor et dad aying off for a week and resting up right. Besides that, spend a week's pay enjeying the holiday. If I were a croek I'd cheat the doctors first.\" Well she knew that ber father's pessi- rnism wvas bis degradation., What pes- imist but thinks of himself as a factor in dissolution? \"Let's take Mr. Sheffleld over some fruit to-n ighit,\" suggested Rosie. \"Mother, 'ou corne, too.\"1 \"A'ndJeave those clothes te iren them- selves, huh!\" Tliere w~as not much et Sheffield's face visible through the bandages wliich rovered it like a ghostiy mask. But ho righitened up atbsighlt of Rosie and her",
         "Winnipeg, March, 1914. 1, 1914. line niors disaster. over tfii liastrous leasing a tormeda cock on Lhe cable ,barge of Sheflield, kers had ring the exliaust. r his fir- 1er, front 1opened, g coals, lied for fell un- g oni au look-out Id before i clothes. mgh the dl at.the youth-t -te SMcPar- der-way, a heap and fol- .ried the \"Why should we notice the. bauds on a dlock,\" demandedî ]Rosie, prettily, Uwhn ire know we've liad eaoh other only, a momnentr t\" And he went away, Iaugngaly «I've. mid te mun down to the plant on myway ome,\",» lie medià~d \"Levesque, the foreman, is off. to-nijht and maybe 1 ean belp things a littie.\" 0. He reached the. plant before the one o'clock whistle blew and made a tour of the important points. At ten minutes past one h. mounted the ladder of MeParland'â tower. Ho stopped at thie top rung of the. lad- der and held bis breath. MoParland h4d jùst then laugbed. Heo could sec the ghoetly pallor of hie face ini the lurid light around hlm. Bright ceai. dropped \u003crom'the- grate and a yellow-red light peeped from cracks around the ILre-box door. The diabolical laugh and the grim smile en McParland's pallid face discon- certed Sheffield, but only for a moment Hie leaped up-tbrough the ladder-bole and sprang* ait McParland with the. quiekness of deak.h and deait him a stinging lap acroes the car. MeParland fell. Sheffield opened the lire-b'ox door and raked7 out the sizzling eaie. -Ho ex- amined the injecter -to 'make:*sùeit would. not work sud.thon tm'nëd te McParland. 'Corne,\" lue said, as lhé saw -rèsuscita- tien in the sleepy eyes, «you're going to take my St in the. hosptal for.awlie and I'm goingto rnhe'ahn. This wass oming te, me,\" he avowed. 1,1'1lbWall right in à, bm dý's. I've just done somehini at soin, time past te de- serve this -aflition and' maybe 1,'m square witb kismet I I'm awfully glad to see you-both.\" Hie eyes li1ýered in a long glance into Rosie's, 'and foolieh little Roi. ment \u0026way ir-ihout wiahing hlm mollI sý She hsd gene, expecthilg te se àa ole- fui patient make deaf ànd'dumb signe and herseîf consoling him with sym- pathetie fluency - and ail that she did was blush and drag her father away in confusion. The ci plant began te mear of the stiffnees of newnes.9, but the great sum- mer heat brought lassitude to the. laborers, and sei the work still lagged b.- bind. Sheffield improved steadily, ancl ir as announced one very hot day that heoiras leaving the hospital. On- that day, McParland had reeelved two dunning lot- ters.- Hia mile nagged at hum heartily and bore down upon hlm the neceBsity of earning' more money if bo expected to keep bis family out of debt. Why did lhe have thern if he could net keep thcm decently? lHc retorted about wifely ex- travagance at which ho received a mili- tant oration ini true suffragette style. He teek his lunch pail with a feeling of having robbed hie family, and left the bouse remorsefully awtre that debt drives love -from the door and lets in discord; thMi a true wife gets petulant when the family increases eut of ratio to the father's earninge. In brief, ho ment te mork heartlesesud de- presse\u0026d The night foremian iiad been talcen i11 and the job is unn on the impetus by the. day force. Everyone tried to do a share ho try and keep the work moving. But MeParland seen began te 'haVe -*trouble with the injecter. H1e took it off !arefully, and iu putting -it on again stripped the coupling thread. It fsiled to work. Ho lest three houre morking at it. Hie spenut the midnight mealhour at it. ' When the fireman returued at ene oetcôck he sent hlm up to caleut the chief engineer. It would be an hour be- fore ho would get back. Meantime, iie unscrewed the nute of the injector aud screwed themn on again. Yet it mould not bced the boiler. Ho thought of the time ho iras losing, the. poor night's work would tbrow discreditupon hlm. Hia fingers fumbled on the nuts again and hoe laughed hysterioally. The mater in the glass had disappeared, but he had not noticed it tillI now. \"Hla! ha!\" he ]aughed while bis face irent irhite. \"If the injector irorks noir, Cod take the the soul of this poor bailure!\" The lire beneath the scorching boiler roared and McParlad's fingers worked beverishly at the injector to flood lt with cold mater- and the noise ho board iras like the crash of thunder. Sheffileld had lcft the hospital at eght o'elock and had gone right te McPar- land's bouse te sec Rosie. Rosie mas re- splendent in the radiance ef something that good health and bright clothes alone do net impart. \"Rosie, Sethart,\" iras Sheffield's introduction, and Rosie did not retire as she had don. at the hospital. She rail into bis gonerous embrace and snuggled as close as any girl might irho heard a handeome Young man like Sheffield say ~sweetheart\" as ho said 1. \"Rosie, I often thought I mould marry a girl just 11k. yeu and I hoped that I would neyer bave te make any more appeal than love itsell expresses. Don't lot mue say more!\" And Rosie didn't-for secerai moments, a roseate eternity, se close together thiere in the little patch of gardon iu the summer twilight. Tn the bouse of mauy ebuîdren conven- tioxality bas generous bounds. To say tliat Sheffield did net beave until Mid- iight would brand him unworhhy for on- t rance te Most homes, but irben biles is broken into by the rousing romp of mlany ebjîdren the flighit of time gees by tnnoticed. XVben Sheffield arose te go lie honestly expeced hiesmitch te announce tfie heur of ton. \"MWby, littie girl,\" ho said, sbockcd, 4'Uv. started shamefully bore; I'ye gene the limit-midnightl1\" *3üt totiie .chieif*engneer appeared ai tii. ladder-,Way. McPýarlaýnd jumped up. \"Ill go wUtl.eou,\" he-breathed, and to the, ehief, \"Teil the.boes I'm ail in- if*I cbme eut ail right Ill go back to the little tarmn.Fy~e bad eaough steam- \"wYotL saved her just in turne, Maek!\" comniended the. chief. «Tii, boiler's blil- tered, ne doubt, but any man would've don. just what yen did.\" hua enugmamclfParland wae pleased to interpret bis own ýway and h, looked gratefuily, at SheffieId. «I waut te4ile. for -a viile week sud thon -yake.up lbéind a team of horsesY» And thus t h a iahsome men drift nahur.fly b te hoeii land andi soin. are foreed back bZr circu.1mstaDoes TImeTurnesand OM Prw4osr jqh;i Stuart Bisekie, of Edin- burh éu sdelclld.s-yan importut eumons one day, poted this notice on iii. clasaroom door for bis stu- \u003c Ltaekie vil b. unable tpu .mettiisý lasses to-day.'- SoMe.,l'ih mr' ,é ohorm .that teveuing, mwm tie 4;irlm è'h-kled,-and' pruimptly aterware . ra epc o ~ué lie Bought Boka - A insu who had nover had the timê or opporhunity te get much book-iearn- ing suddenlv beesme wealthy. 'He gave up work, built himself a âiueilêùmse sud settlod down t enjoy life. -Reel- lectîng 'is earty sund unanswored\u0026 Io gng fo books, hewet to aehop te ,.Ier soine. The \"Voter\" telle th*ho.sto-,: I vaut ý\u0026 lot^ of booka,» h. ndid- ta tho lerk.%...4 \"What kinl of books?\" vas *la. re. ply. MWy, iooIoe,» mid the. proqeetivb purchase. \"Good books, yen know; resd- mng booke.»1 . I The. book* cameanud vore inétaIe in the. library. Soon afher.aà ou' *f rWe- élightly 'more leamn@ed';. O=ahet.. rioiâ àaxi, came teo IL. 6\"Rée, Hl, nid ti'theýoWt, -«slai iibrary. Hoe la s. viere I -intend.. 16 i down wth my booksansd ros\u0026.\" Hùgh .took down a book, .ookmd 4 i and -put il bac; -took *êown . M \"ooed ýat h\u0026sI -put --it bik;.u peahed the. promes.several tnugteé Thon h. asked: «Joua, vheredid yoP get thi.. book. r -Oh, Ibong-tCi\u0026m;jotbogt W4t'a the. matthLr? Au't h~a4 books? I haven\"t;rud m \"Tby'1rse d books.,\" 4\u003e tp «hlt t he'eluiem\u0026 ijeIu near s Icmn iTue rouguy, rs'i bdxisxbouâ x ecpies èf ii. Ith Pleader. IV'\u0026 a gobock,, but t*ére's hoo Èmay of it ber.-f.ftià i ~. III I I i ValuableInestment. You have a big iveuertnyour tractor. 1w.M.iu Inmwit by uffg FROST \\ 1CARDO -tPROU PROOF Pôlarine S a very IIht.coIored oiL. It àa eq)e- \"iiY reomendedfbr uwn ,tractc\u003ersbetaus. of ls ow oldtss-f owWf\"eelv down to zffl.- Yeur engins starts'up right in the nlcrnings *lme iubr\"cted with Polaine-not faoen o stiL Praictically fr-es froe carboei lI are!\"» ho- nemi en nom. hem. Ho S. re me a enough r it.\"ý Four job 'e. I'd trouble 't know rou lest \"Don't d neede umust ring it ult that I don't abit of I often foot on is the ie bleu- s't. ex- control [t occur t b~ave here ah Slinked er that r they reach it foot. I ked the fellow,\" e muet or bim. ted ber th our injecter a burn- man te n there irould on you of bis ing ber sponge. 11\"re- of dad ing up z's paY t crook ipesei- It pes- factor some lfother, them- [s face wlîich But ho nd her THE IMPERIAL QIL COMPANY,Lmid Regina- up.Sahlo Edmonton romvo Moose Jaw St.ek \u003cmil \u003cw@ffl. in Wdem -I IL~ c.- - \u003e4 444- * 4, '.;.~. 44 4 4 -4 s ~ -. 4-- 44~ 4-. The Weotern -Home -Mon*thly A A high-grade motor gasoine. Ab\"outely the best and moet reliable you can âumd. dan, unifrm and powerfiuL Silv er-Star A %fiaaâS11fSr U». MnTat meu ina Used by every kerSmne-burning engins in the Winnipeg Motor ConteaZ 1912. Igmites easlly. Free from carbon and sulphur. Pôlarin., Premier Gasoline and Siver Star azre carried' at over 300 stations throughout Western Canada Fill your.own tank wagon or steel barrêe with Premier, Gasoline or, Silver Star and avoid leakage and trouble of handling wooden borrels. s- ~1\"' J . ç",
         "Th~Wst-nHom e Mont hly WlnmPeg, Marh, 1914. BRIGGER'S Pure Jams and Orange Marmalade Put up in 16 oz. gIass jars and in 5 lb. sanitary double-top gold lined tUn pails. ]Brlgger' Pure JaxnB are made from dlean, eounld Niagara grown Fruit and. Grariulated Sugar and ri ned Absoluey r@ Whmm Wrlting advtrtisers Pleame mention The Western Home Monthly. A Piçtures Written for The Western OUE ten or twelve yeare ago, y S settiers wended their toilsome ývestward from the then anm towu of Red Deer, through muti a muakegs, over hila, acrose gullies, fordi the Medicine River anti numerc amaller streame, until they came to thg «chose n stopping place about forty mi] west of the (Janadian Pacifie Railway. Rere they proceeded to «'settie,\" ai aise te explore tâe surrounding count: which aboundet inh amali poplar ai balm of gileati trees, and an innumt able variety of plants bearing blossai of almost every conceivable color, whi mnost of the open spacea were cover with a thick grewth of small bruah, boý willow anti black- birch\u003e whoae- glosi leaves swaycti with the wind, tub oi coulti almost have cheated hirnself ki bcieving that he was gazing at the u, dulations of a huge fieldi of wav#ing grai But by far the moat noticeablei * their picturesque «sumding, excep ingi, Perbapa, the. magniicent view of tl distaut Roekies, waa a long andi windir ridge, the southcastern end of which ha flattened tiown te a gentie elope, au Maosed, tdlgnaliy, the land they ha chosen for their farta. At this place, the soul of the ridge wm light and rather sandy; but whcn we cultivateti, with its warm aouther miope it madie excellent gartien grounti.. little fartiier to, the northwest, howeve where the ridge rose te a height of, pei hape, forty feet or more, the settlez founti it te b. decitiedly gravelly. In many places, where itwas th h ighest, it was barely wide enough a the top for a wagon track, while at th baie,ï it wouid probably meauie froi 200 te 300 feet in width. It was a picturesque developinent o Nature, indeeti, as it stretcheti if sinuous length careleeely acrosas t otherwiae level country like an indolent sateti serpent, apparently allowing iti curves always te follow the lines o: least resietance, anti causin~g thereb: many a twist anti curve laî4,teep ittlg pitch ithe. wagon oa(talong iti suimmit. In summer its aides, in many places were literally covereti with fiowers witi a. few of the prevailing poplars here an\u003c there; while on cither aide lay amaI kces with grassy edges, whcre wil\u003c ducka anti many other watcr birdm aboundeti. Hlere, ini time, the etraying cattle of the eettlers found contentment on its grassy, flowering aides, or in the lusi green grass along its lake-dotted base. From ites ummit the eurrounding coun- try unfoldeti itsecf to the view - a pleasant landscape. One forgot much of the unpleaeantness of actual existence in viewing ite broati, calm greennees. As the settlers became more numerous, the \"Ridge,\" wbich is penbape 21/,j miles long, anti terminates in a high round hili popularly known as \"the Butte:' became a gencrally useti roadway, and was, by some, alludeti to as the \"iUog's back,,\" although' by the majority it is stili known as \"the Ridge.\" No tbinking person coulti traverse the winding suramit road without some speculation as to its origin. Wbat strange convulsion of Nature causeti it to bc? Whatever the force that raiseti its flower-crowned top above the level of the surrounding country, it certainly must have occurred ages ago. Many, many centuries must have passed. since tiais \"wrinkle in ,the face of Nature\" first appeareti. le there not something in such* thought-in a contemplation of Naturt undefilect by the band of inan, ivhich sens to bring us eloser to the Creator andi make us almost feel Hlis actual presence? But alas! for the scenie beauty of the Ridge! Whien 'Îe poivers behind the Canadian Northern Rai lway undertook to build a road across tlîis new country, no consideration for its \"scenie beauty\"l deterred them from euttilig 1ùhlèel~y through this ancient landmark. With their huge graders tbey made a great chasm through this leviathan of the ages; they built their grade andi laid 1 s. -e.- que Caravrel-Pit, Home Monthly by Mary C. Baly few their steel through the ohasm, anti drove Way their ,trains relentlessly through with ne naîl thought of the déeeration of which they and were guiltyl Thud must the Olti alwayg' ing maire place for the New. us trange to say, however, the thing heir which impresseti this. worthy corporation les the most forcibly waa - fot the acce grandeur o\u003ef the Ridge- but the rich ýnd gravel beds it beld, which hati been ex- try, psed by their excavations. The entire and ridge waà founti te, be almost wholly ier- gravel of a superior quality-a rich find ina indeeti! ile Neediess te say, the company Iost no cd time *i gain control of a goodly por. oth tion of theirflnd, as it will be of great sy value- to thýem-- in view of* the vast Dne amuit of construction they have under Rte way. They immediately installeti a steain un. shovel, and put several gravel trains and uni. a large force of men at work, hauling of the gravel te, thia place and that wher- ýt- ever it is needed, soine being shippeti far th east of the Canadian Pacifie line. og The point ini the Ridge where it is id croset by the railroati, comsnonly Md known as \"the Cub,\" is about a mile id front the village of Leslieville, which is stili in the firat stages of existence. ra Now, ini pUlae of the vaat silence of a ,el dozen ycars ago, nbroken by neught ýr sate the tinkle of a solitary cow bell A or the bark of a settlees. dog, there is er, the continuai rumbling of machinery, Pr- the whiatlc of locomiotives, the passing ýr of gravel trains, and ail th \"e bustle con- sequent to the ativent-of civilized humait be industry. at We may rejoice at thcee signs of pro- be grcss; but w. cannot witbhold a sigh for nthe simple days whcn Nature spoke te uini er own language, and the ravages of of Man's advent were not. e Lt, The Juryman s of For many long, weary hours the jury- )ynen bad been locked in the room,,trying ,e to agree upon their verd-ict.- The judge ta bat sent messages te them, but in vain. There wae only one me.n who refuscd te Sagrée with the remaining eleven. Thcy Ld argueti with in, pleaded, threatened, .s ad imploreti, but in vain. For the twen- Idtieth time the usher came te the door Laand asked if tbey li agreeti yet. S \"No!\"~ bawled the foreman. \"Anti wcre not likcly te for semetime with this--?\" )f \"Perbapa 1 had better bring supper te 1syou, air,\" suggestcd the usher. \"Shahl Ih 1bring twelve suppers?\" e. Once more came an angry negative L- from the man inside the room. a \"No!\" the foreman bawled. 'Bring eleven suppers and one feeti of bay-or thistlee I A Scholarly Child e Boston, Massachusetts, bas long en- rjoyeti the reputation of baving exceeti- Iingly learneti children wbo are ab'%, se 1it je said, to dispute on subjects far above the heade of their eIders of other regions. But Boston je not unique. In a book entitied \"The Scot of the Eight- eenth Century\" Ian Maclaren descrihes ba similar ch racterietie of the Caledo- i nian. It is the inevitable tendency of the Scot's miuid to follow out every line to its terminus, even if it be over a preci- pice, andi to divide every hair till ite in- Ifinity i-9 touched. It iSI not only in church courte, but in market-places and in railway stations\u003e in humble cottages as welI ae in univer- sity societies that the Scot is disputing, in evcry spare moment of hie time, from. morning tili night. The story goes that a minister over- lîcard a inother questioning hier child, as it suppcd its, por. 3ge, after the day's work was done. \" at\"saiti this, austere mother. \"is the triie relationbe-tween kirk and state, or ; theWgèP-rinciple-s- -f' tuePfree Church ?\" Andi the favored cbild promiptly re- Plied, \"Co-ordinate jurisdietion with nitntual subordination.\" 1 ýl",
         "Winnipeg, Marc, 1914.4 TRE summer of 1903 in Alberta vas- not manch like the. su.mmer\u003cýf 1913. RT . ain, rain, raim. It seemes that thc rsiny season hsd neither s b4ginning nor an end. We-my hugbsnd sud I, sud Mr. and Mrs. Jewcl-arrived in Red, Deer the tirst of June, Mr\u0026. Jewel aud 1 remaiuing lu toun uhile the men wcnt out in the. country te locate the. homesteads, which would b. our future hoimes. When they returneà il did not talc. us long ta geltegether the. feu things that ve could afford te tart eut uitii. This eonsisted of s Barn wagon, team aud uarness, a teut, comfortable bcd end tue chairs, sLave, nccessary cooking utensils, and s feu dishes, wash tub and lumber ta make a table. We had brougli, aur bcddiug viti us front the East. This outtit, with. graceries snd the. tua trunks, uhici ue iisd brougt uitii us, made up aur load. Our neigbbors pur- chases vere sirnilataOunr oua. Brigt aud early in the. morniug w, started ou aur flfty mile drive. The day uas.fiue, though the roads ucre slippery sud ucl f rom lthe reecut raine aud we made elow progres. AI noan the men purchsed s, sack of oats fram a farmer, we made s camp lire sud isd dinuer W. were so interested lun-the country tirougi which we vers passiug, sud in ail we eau on thii thlaI we enjoyed il immensely. Even the. inconveince of a Barn wagon us forgotten. Tii, mud lu places on the. trail use s0 deep thal we iiad te 1iut the. four iiersës on oneb 1usd, lu order te pull tiiraugh. W. restià the. horees fre- queutly, for ve knew tii.t the. day woula be long te them. Il use near night uhen we reached the, Red Deer river aI Content.-tien called Ssil Creek. W, uer.e tili ton miles frorn our destination, se ue de- cided te make camp for the. nighl. Wb were too Iired le tiiink of pitching eur tent liaI nigil, se after eating s issty. 'supper ve madeounr beds in thie wagons as -best ue could. I use oh, s0 tired, but for some time eleep uould net camte ta me. The murmurng oaI the. Homiesteading with Sni Means Written by Irene Wilson for The Western Home Monthly CIIAPFEU). 1914. .1 't The Western Home' Monthly iddrv uith ne ich theyý ýe tiui poration .e scenie ffie rici, )een ex- e entire wholIy icii flnd bLo no Ily par. \u003ef great ie raeI *e under * steam hauling t uher- ped far e il je nonly s mile rhich is 'ce. ce of a neughl )wubeil ýhere je hTheýry, passing ýle Con- buman', of pro. igh for ,oke le avages rive nr by men\u0026Ithe m.oning of the. tal spru eseseeed to sing a song of lonchi- nes. -Ever and snon the wsil of a. dis- tant coyet added te tthe desalatioxi af the. osou. veii the.friendly stars above me eemeil to mock mir efforts ýt.\u0026 -ilsep. ýT\"e futuÊe te me v tatnight .Iooked dim sud uncertain. .Wlien I awskened in the morning the. camp lmrewus burning merrily, and prepu«atgiu were being made for break - fat. The.mm on their preidous trip had lsarned about the ford; but as the uster us iiigh from -the. numerous -rains, the river looked, anything bu inv iting, espe- =ilY f - tetop Of a loaded wagon. Btwe e4édwithout êny inisbap, and Mofore noon *e reaeedounr .hojeuieea\u0026 Oh, hou glad w, sUl were te, know that, wo had resched aur destination, that'we had' feund the. spot.which w. could call borne. We reslized that this home that w. vere teonxke would bo doubly ours, because of the. tnay lard- ships -and privations -which ke would. experieuce, sud we realized that- eaIy years of toil would bring us any degree Of comfolt. Neverthéleas vohadi decded to -Iook on the bnighf\u003e aide, make the beet of everything, su\u0026 to fi\"dpleassure viierever poubW-- Aithougli we knecu littie \u0026boel f . *n we realised the value of good management, saudwe uere *rily de- termineil to sucee\u0026 Thenre s ama pring on our hoe.e stead, so that Mr. sad Mn.. Jewel de- cided toe amp with us for a tUme. 136 ue proceedeà te nire things as ern- foitable as possible. MLr. Jewel's tent w»a umed* as a eook touct, wiii ours uwe curtained off for a sleeping tent. As we haë both- brought sorne lunuber, #ter making the one tsble we b.d suffi- mient lbt te mak sa flooniug for the. Cook tout: The noeemsay thinge doue we got su early eupper, sud proceede . t. investi- gate Lth omosteade -Thairgh aso f thela baus .a 11111e rougn, the. séil was excellent, sud vo vere well pleased. Our neareet neighbor wau four miles away; but Mr. Jewei'e homestead jo\u0026ued Barly the neît mornug the. meo dreve te the. river haïk te, look for a good place te u t\u003eloge, alto te gel sosie fine- uood. Af ter lhe wood was eut up, v. ail d-ove le or. eigbbore te punehase some potatoes sud as h. wss to butcher lu a feu days w. arranged for lhe pur- chaos.of a quarter, whicli ue put dowu in brin. inee tet ¶Tkingtheir ver ith hm h mnu etsrted cuttang hheir loge lth. next morniug, sud oontinued cutting for lue weeks, slthough Il rnu moot of the. lime. Tl* loge were then drawu. te, the liomentead- The. roads vere wet sud idippery, but the. loge uere only lwo miles sway, sud wth the lwo teanis we soon had quit. s presentabbe pile OfIt4vas quit. a problein te décide where and viat te build fiet. But as it was more advisable te shlow the. loge te shrink for a lime, tue more weeks were speut lu cuttiing loge, whicii vere drswn te Mr. Jewel'a .homnta\u0026.Aller the loge were hounansd gatinlto shape we de- cided to, build on eur homestead firet just a rooni 14 x 16, that would aiterwarde aseer for a kitchen The mn-.decided le go to town fer the. necessary materials, windous, doors sud flooring,' sud -a~s -aying time vas near hey would ais. bring bsck a mower sudrake. W. had gel no mail aine coming te the. home\u0026teadý sud as there wuse so littie te do for the. next three days the time hung hesvily on our handsa, ud1.1 tb. much lime for thought. But with the return of the, men our loueliness use forgotten.. They hadr broughlt the mail, papers, letters sud littie remembrances fnom home. They brought many things liaI w. needed badly; snd hast, but not least. tied te the back of. the. wagon us. a nice shick cou. Oh hou good it seerned ta us te have lots of mlk again, aud butter aa v.». Half our troubles seemed te fade vith lhe appearance of thst partnerahip cou. Our shack use quickly built, aur neigiibore giviug their advice free. The rouf, though of eod, did ual leak. We bad a uic. tigiit flo9J, and a good eartiien cellar. Ncoune ctûld have taken more ý-Cutieûra Soap and Cuti. cura Ointmnent keep the skin clear, soft and-beit' tif ut under ali coidtio of outdoor exposure . cidental t itrspt VoUonshan a~ O ~ misu Sl Won\u0026 blassi.uullRs imk AS OUI.fhB h m -m W -\"» 8 OM\"«* Sjury- trying judge i vain. scd te They Lteued, tweu. edoor t- uc're ls--.' per te \"cShahl gative 'Bring LV-or g cen- iceed- iý, se s far other ý. In :ight- Liedo- lie ta r)reci- but ;ions., iver- .ting, from Every Day Someone finds out that tea or coffee drinking- is the unsuspected cause of variaus aches and ilis-that Steady nerves and a clear brain* are often impo ssible to the regular tea and coffee drinker. Our work is to tell the facts about tea and coffee-- then * Its Up to You to decide from your own condition and feelings whether to stick to tea and coffee, with sucn handicaps as biliousZN-ý ness, headache, nervousness, indigestion, heart trouble and sleeplessness--or make A F'air Test Quit both tea and coffee absolutely for 10 days, and use the pure food-drink-Postum. Then take count of yourself. If you find, as thousands of others have, that the old troubles are disappearing, you'll know \"Theres a Reason for POST'UM -SOLD BY GROGES EvEYwHRZ Canadian Postum Corsai Co. Ltd., Windsor, Ont.",
         "1*.be W'teHome, monthly. Fé'V our Veyage. frludute nto passage via CAL4ADIANSEVÇ Theeq~lpren 1amagifcent. Th. Splendid Steamers of latent mos, aa4lbt fllec c)rngo ln(IL) Cabin and Th\"r1Clsg nl, reMgu asR,2ryapoite The uurroundlngu aaà moot 4 =eUgtu auperb ln theïr design. vith a. thorougli me- T.CUnadC.as malaIns t4\"o«. botwoons N.w VYOP1, Qua.netown,. Flohguard, Liverpeol. Noatan Qêa.enstown, Fishguard, Livappool. y o'ric,'Moditereanean, Adriatio. Eiwuineth R..t'.t uwarnwi n thé worIcr4 Lueltïàla,* «MàurMtanTï\" l\u003c.w bnli4ng for Canadian Servioe., \u0026\u00268. AURANIA-14000 ten@ AUfl Iformation as te ualllngu. etc., and beautltully Illiustrated lbUfftgré may be Obtainai hem any Rallway or Steamalp Agent ebvr ttfnto CMASTEAMSHIP COMVANY, LTD 04 VAIN STREIET WINNIPEG@, MAN. HO \"\"-RRO0CKS E S' FLANNE LETTES (ade by he manufacturer.of the celebrated Lo»ngcleths, Twiilh'and Sheetzng) are made from, carefully selected COTTON, The nap. 18 short and close No injurious chemicals are used Quality, designs and colourings are unequalled 0 f f.u hdcà mhsueU matetialfo Underwear allthe year round would' buy THE BEST ENGLISH MAKE they would apprecate the comifort md clurability wh\"c inferior qualie of Flannelette do net pomsms SS. the name «'HORROCKSES Y en the elvedge evey two yards ANN UAL Sale upwards of TEN MILLION yards Awared the. Grtificate of the, Incorporated Institut. of Hygiene Horockses, Crewdson \u0026 Co. UàmltedL XANOUXBTER ume LONDON, ENGLAND -J j - t pride lh a mausion thain vodid in thal shack. Only those vho have had the expenience that vo had ofstepping oui of bed in the rnorning luto a. fov incheB of mnui and wo.ier, of putting9 on clothes that vere damp, or pcrhaps voti can knov boy ve fully appreciated thal shack-.- -It- dclnot.requirp inuch time ta move the. contents of t e~ej1g tout, aIe on stove, into the sbck. Mr. Jevel's steve W»s left in the cook tout, and vo usei it vhen a dry day came, vhich vas net ofteu. As hayiug time ýwaesas near, a barn large euough for four horsos and one cow vas soon built, and things begail ta look liko home. Hayiug vas thon started inl earnest on fine deys, the mén verking until dada. As prairie hay-dees net ne- quire a long turne te cure, it vas stackod as quickly as possible after cutting, iu orden to escape the rain. As thon. vas litie te, keep tvo vomen busy iu. the bouse, vevers glad te give nmre help inl the. hay field viien nocessary. - -Bfore thie ground lied frozen. up,- vo had eompleted on eaci~ homestead a shack, a barn, sud a pigpou with shed, aase ufficiont bey for the vinter. A volt vas dug on Mn. Jevel's homestead, aud after- hoayiing thoy moved te thoir own, shack. W. kopt the partnersbip cow, purcbasing tvo more te keep ber coapany, alse a bnood 80w aud sa pig for killiug later. Mn. Jevel aIso, pur- chased three covs and tvo hoga. .Shortly after purchesin« or cova vo had' a ne* bossy te \u0026dé te our stock. The milk snd the bgttermiilk about kept the .pigs, vb.ile the butter (for viiich ve found a ready sale amoug the. bachelors) took care of oun bouse- hold expenses.. - Wfith the flret fali of snov lthe mou vont -ta the river for a supply of ceai for the. vinten. As t]Ëre vas te b. a sawniflet the river l'bat winter vo vWiàbeü te baýve enaugh loes sm.n into lumber te, complote Our bouse, alao fer the varions thiugs about a farm. The extra loes ere dravu home on sleighs. W. sold enough lumben te psy for our bill During the vinter the mon aise eut picktsfor - encing. W.e ejoyed the long vinter eveniugs 90 mnuch. Sosutimes vo spent the evouings vith Mr. Jewel, et other times they spent the eveuinga. with us, A few books vere sent us during the Wvilter, aud these vo tock turne lu read- ing alou\u0026 Wo had loeked forward te the wvinter vith e« fow xisgiviugs,4 but it passed se quickly that spring came before vo roalized it. Wheu apriug arrived the lumber, loge and pickets vore on the homesteade. The legs vene prepared. for building, sud the picketsaharpenei. Mr. Jevel's bouse vas flnished first, and' thon amuli pastures vere mnade for the horse heunet in use. The ben pens came next. They vero built of logs in the aide ef a bank. Ohr house progressed slowly, the meu vork.ing at it iu their spare time. As vo had hired a fariner te plow garden plots the pro- viaus sumsner, this land vas fonced and veli vonkod, se that wvo mdght have as good a gardon as possible. Wo vomon folks planted the seeds and Iooked after the gardons during the summer. WVe did net have as good resuits as we would have liked, ovrng te the nevuesa of the so]; but vo had plenty bf-vege- tables during tho suminer and folloving vwinter. Iu the spning our hog vas killed and dry salted, the bacon and hama smoked under a barrol. During the vinter our brood sov prosented us with eleven little pigs, while two more Calvos vere added taoaur stock. We vere quite ignorant about farin. in\", but vo read everything tliat vo could get portaining te the different branches of farmn vork. That ouminer Proved te ho beautiful and flue, a contrast te Our previoiùs suînmer. By fal ve had ton acres brokon on each homestead, the homne- steada fenced and the Yianses and out- bouses comlllted. We found that noth- ing bings, in the roady casil like xnilk cows, sa vo purchased three more, put- ting an addition on our barn toa leoin- miodate them. By freezing Up turne we had soven more pigstobthran aithaugli they did flot bring the price tatthîoy do at the present timne the nonoy Iooked prettY \"ood to us. About this time ûtwolve Ettj( i,,,iearriv'ed Lost Articles Departrnent Bridget, who had administered the eu- linary affairs of the Morse bousehold for xnany years, vas somotimes ten betveen bier devotiou te hier mistross and loyalty -to the sauitsou of the bouse. \"Bridgetý\" said Mrs. Morse, in. a tone of vonder, aiter anm inspection of the storeroom, «vhere have those splendid red apples gene tiiat. the mnu brought yestorday-those four big eues V \"Weil, nov, xma'am,\" said paon Bidget, \"I couldn't rightly say; but I'm thiuking if you vaa te flnd wheroe =y loaf o' hot gingerbread is, likely thim four ned ap- pies would bo lyiu' right ou top ef it, an' I'm only hepinW bis little stulnmick can stand the sthraiu.\"1 -sO Cernent Milis belng ClosedI Tt is annoi1nced, by the Canada Ce- nent Company that, owing te the dullness of business, they have decided to close dlown four of thieir plants for the balance af the year 1914, or uîitil further notice. The plants affected are those at M-Narihank, Ont., Lakefleld. Ont., Shallow Lake, Ont., and Calgary, Alta. C Winnip.,Mabi9 Up tà the present time. e erything seemed to be an outlay of mouey, with 80 littie returne. Wlth the butter froin bix oows, the pork wQieh vo hâd for sale, vo vere ableflo see nmre returns for\"tbe Lnmoney vo had paid eut for rnachinery, ;stock and fencing vire. \u003e Mr\u0026. Jewel and I. vent to Red Deer w1th my busband tliat-,-iOlr. \u003c1rcept for a 'heater vo had, added not hing to our household fumnishlngs ince coming te the-homesteads. We nov purchaýsed linoleum for the. kitchenb a good quàlity tapestry for the living reom, cheese cloth for curtains, blinda, cretonne for a cosy corner, a few other things for the bouse, sud materials for to make into wearing apparel. Mms Jewol purcbased a seving machine et the second hand store. We enjoyed Our firet trip to town so much. That vinter the. mon vere not as buay as they had been. They got out: a few more loge for corals, etc., and pickets for fencing. We had lumber left over from the houge n yhusband poedl hie ingenuity tby mkn anynew pieces of furnituro. O0~ living rooms, with very littie expense, looked cosy and inviting. During the previous summer there had tjeen a boom et Sail C\u003eook, its name being changed te, Content. A general store, hardçware, etc., soon apeared, but in later years vhen the railway passed it by, it fell back to its former insig. niflcandle Now, I amrnont going to voary yen with a detailod account of every year on the farm since 190\u0026~ Moat of the summers following those described vo had beautiful veather audl splendid crops. Every year we broke as much unew land es possible. Wo planned on keeping enough stock to consume the greater part of aur crop. We workod bard during those firet years on the fa-nu, and did vithout many comforts, but vo feit tha.t everytbing which vo did was for ourselves, that vo voro working for a purpose. Soute way,whon vo look hack on those years vo remember the interesting parts of or life, and wo fergot the littie hardâ%ips and difficultiea. If perchance you should pase,. our homestead to-diay, yen viii seo two of the finest farms in the country. There is nov a station near by, se that vo have a roady market for our produce. Our succesa- lu this country bas been due te several reasons. First, oving to the natural productiveness of the soil, a progressive permon is bound te succeed; secondly, becauee of our determination te succee\u0026 and, to make the beat of every- thiug; tbirdly, because of the goodwill existing between Mr. and Mms Jevol and ourselves. We vorked together in every- thing, thus 'often, saviug for each the necessity of paying out money for help. Iu this, vay, viien mauey vas scarco, vo were able te do with less herses aud snnchinery. Although vo feel tha.nkful te God for hig help and guidance duriug these years, wo cannot help but foot proud of the work that v. have doue.",
         "Winnipeg, Mtarh, 1914. The Western Home Monthly' Th-.erBlacksnake and the Turtie Bonn 'astle Dale. Phqtogaphs b the Author 1914. erytbiflg ey, with ter frorn for sale, ifor\"tbe whinery, ed Deer býhing to coming irchaýsed quâl.ity Ire cloth ,a easy for the Lke into ircbased 1 hand to towu as buay t: a f ew tri ,ckets fover 1[proved- Ly nov ,rooms, osy and ere had 1 name ai store , but lu aed it r insig. ry year of the bed we qpendid se much ined on Lme the B, firet It many rytbing that vs Soms ie eara s of our LrdipS 9 ïour t'wo of There at vo luce. \u0026a been owing he soul, ucceed; LtiOfl to every- Sdwil vl and Levery- h ths r help. scarce, es and od for yea.rs, of the Later\u003e.that afternoon these-two lads , appeared at our tent.. \"We've .killed it, sir!\" )they oxclaimcd lu chorus, and I preaentf to you the illustration .of the cammobn black anake, very far fiom dead, haîf coiled on the stick's end-\u0026i perfecet- ly harmless, always beneficial snake, one that eats thousands of harmful insects' eggs and grubs every week. -Open its mouth and look carefully-there is the dreaded \"stinger\" - the tongue, the similar tangue that ail animais have (not quite sa vitrolie as our own). 0f course, when a great animal like a man, six foot iu height, appears with a smafl tree aIl ready to kili the inoffensive siiake out cornes the tongue, but that is oly a bluff ta try and frighteu the big animal away. It le remarkable the ignorance dis- played about thie harmless tangue. We were reading a novel by one of the best- knawn modern writers in England, and lieo tells where the \"suake protruded its tongue and stung the girl.\" Neediess to say that book lies unread. Again-.that dreadful \"Hoopsnake.\" *I once came acrose three young men in the his of Missouri and they calnily told me that last night, as oune of them, was trotting up the hill ta the camp lie saw a -oase bicycle wheel comning down the hilI, but wheýn it jumped the.rut and *started to run down bis side lie took an- other look. \"A Hoopenake as sure as you *stand there. I turned old Bess and off dowu-hill we Went. I pulled ber sharp up on ta a eut-off and saw that snake, *with bis tail lu bis mouth go rolling bY *just -like a hoop, sir!\" Mark Twain finished this sort of yarn in one of hie Nvorks by having the enake strike a mwagon wheei as it passed, and tells how the rim swelled up and bust the tire, but these three youths were just plain, un- varnished liars. And, oh! those dreadful Puf Adders! Don't lt us forget tbem. I bave met Mnen *ho soberly described the awfnl. loatheome srnell of the air they emitted fui things; but -al I eau find in Ontario are the harmlesa Blackanake, the equally innocent Garteranake, the littis red- bellied viper, and 1 can assure yoii thàt nover. a specimen of any of these tbree has a fang. Let me explain. Before a suake could poison you it must have a hollow fang tooth at bath ends of the top jaw, teeth -that lie along the gains, teeth that are nover iu action unleas the snake is angry; thon tiny muscles draw the teeth to a perpendicular position, the snake bites, the fieah presses the velu or channel behind this fang, and the sac above at the root exudes a very paver- fui acid that, acts seriously upon the heart of the bitten animal. Lool' at týe big, aluggish Blacks9nake iu the picture. It lay day after day oit the edge of the bog. We, passing iu our eanoeono duek shoating intent, often stopped and atudied the sluggish thing. We have dissected these big Blacksnakes and from a female have taken as many Bnoppery Turtie as 43 young sac inClosed enakes. From the Garter we bave taken 14, but as tîjese wero )yitli lier iu the neet I do not knaw thateue giVes birth ta the enake alive, as sonie of the enakes actually ]ay egge - and none of them ewallow their young ta put tlîem in a place of safety! MVhen they swval1aw them it is ta put them luinlîcir stamache, for snakes, especially in captivity, are nated cannibale. 1 once saw a Blacksnake and a Great Blue fIcran dead in a maet remarkable position. A schoolmater flear here, walking one day alang the marsh. came iipon a Blue Ilerozi ]ying upan its aide Weon supply you with I~e Lu m ber fomw Etsho SALE prices, f.o.b. your 81U. - .S\"s, Doons#ad NIllwork from our Oeigary XMLi. Mail usyoi.w enjf to oui' HeaclOffices, G.y Riverside Lumber Company Ltde. 9' [I I '-t''-- t'- t * \u003eg 'ES~tva velI-known and well-dis- ' from thoir mouths, and hav the Èa posed animals are th igu manual swelled Up as big a bal-veli, as ke of the,«Mohavka. There is a hili did not say what kind,' let's giye him on Rice Lak's,.Canada, ini the Province of f ull measure and eall it a football.- la it On)tario, mounted by a strange snake- flot a pity how blindly 1 have goiýeý like trench and four round mounds, one through life? I have been in pursuit of \u0026t ither corner. Here, some two centuries Natural History notes and photographa, \u0026go, the fathors of the peaceful Indians aUl over the U. S. and Canada and never thaàt live in the littîs villages about this l~ofouht, defeated and slaughtered mome hundede of the invadinq Mohawks. lihey buried the siain wvarriors, these ,ictors, the Ojibways, or the Missias- engas, as this branchi of the great tribe Ja called, they buried them in a long, abxnupus grave-ou the crest of the bll and- Si four, round graves at either corner-to mark to poterity, by literally signing li on the earth with the totemn or sigu manual of the vanquished - the great victory the Mississaugas bad obtained over their enemies the Mohawks. bn travelling over tlbis broad contin- ent I have met with nany terrible ser- *pnt-itonies as told by the observer- m-for instance. ýWe eniered from a swamp in whiech vo had been studying the great bittern ii.time to- meet two country lads, armed Bak~h With guns. I asked them wby they car- swoeo hs vdnl eycmo ried shotguns in the close season and -one Msa es Hof s vdntlyes ry commonr briefly answered «'Snalkes.\" \"'MilkMisnesoHosaesrPuadr. enakes, ir!\" aaid bis companion, \"as No, and furthermore, although 1 have long ao my gun and as big'around as corne upon cases of people that have been My arm, sir! 'It milks our cows every bitten by the Rattlemnake 1 have neyer day -and ve're just g'ing to) shoot it. Yes, yet met a medical man that had at- siree! ye bt we'vef seen it. It's a kind tesuled a case of.-\u0026 fatal bite. of agrayblak ormayb a it bownih I this glad, old Ontario, of course, we of gry-lac ormabe bi bovnshhive Hooponakesanad Milksnakes and qhd it hisses like a duck and sonda its Puffadders. Ask any country boy, and êtinger out six imoLes.\" .A aq ..\u002b tleasom neo \u003cf lthe.narefa- te cu- old for etweefl Loyalty a tono of the lendid rought ýidget, inking o' hot ed ap- of it, mmick la Ce- 0, the [ecided teg for until ed are .Ont., .ta. **PROM FACTORY TO HOME\" 17 WESTERN BRANCH STORES. Wbien ywj decide ta buy a Piano or a Player-Piano, get the beat there, is. The matter of PRICE is of littis moment in buying au instrument to Iast a life-time. When you buy a Mazan \u0026' Risch, you make an in- vestment- that will pay steadyý and life-long dividende in the satisfaction of knowing that \"ITO' OU .A MASON \u0026 RISCH PIANO IS TO POSSESS THE BEST PIANO BUILT.\" Write forBooklet to-day. MASON \u0026 RISOH IIMIIED WMNMCPE s-",
         "18 The Western Home Monthly and coileti about its legs a big Blacksflake. From the p9sition it would appearf as if the Heron Lad been ishing and the snakéé, evidently mistaking the long legs te = viefor sticks, had essayedti ta wirn between ensve Seeis forK\u003e thern. Down like a flash mth ntè iiveý F rm nmaut behinti the head. Swiftly the rep- tile threw coil fter cou .around the long hItensive Farpuiam 'legs and thighe, andi the Heron, lsn Tliat' intoiàva fammàg Tat days front exhaustion and atarvtion. VAWv«y xrý«wmt\u0026The mairke was not quite dead viien WI~ CVt7 1IDU wmb.found, bût was comatose. Bu \u003e80 «OM rMWe Lave in aur marahes and istreama mu R bem\u0026 4t... ma a]spIeuenof two of the . co era turtie iis with usni thousanda; but the. kold chap 1 picture, the. sa-calbeti Snap- ping Turtie (I ece the U.\u0026. autharities eaU ail fresh-water Chelonians Terrapins, ail the landi eues Tortoises andi sea-going ones Turtles). Anyway, we bave taken this Luge Snapping Terrapn-of many a Iýqwo-4 -poundé weight, over thirty, andi with p \"aiial moe upon ita back long- enrughta e thae ftgreen overcoat Thon~L r the sf-ahelled turtles of aur rivera, the. ofes with the leathery- 'gel%\" WItA a L'.g\" ged ahena and Ilongti ka Te J picture of the. old ca on the lois of By «Tauts\" wa mean firet, that 9 a big \"Snap!per.M The en, owever, in Crtrs Seede' are fre. from OP' the picture, just fafling ont of Fritz's dlrt \u0026Mvn d d, second that th\u003ey net, aure from the Muss-turtie, or Muti- IRM . tatqd- for germination and turtle. This ciap that burrowa ini the preduction au weil as for purity. mIni dsleeps through Or Northern ca~stes, threfre, a awinters emerges in srimg-time and laya trltee taststra, a a- a number ôf yelbo-white parchment- tWOpathao ld tOOI@aret, aCar-like eggs on the sunny alapes of the tay raotd Seas sure psaca. ýislani and river banka, but Le lbaves a aIlya aua thng, s aua asany-trail to andi from the. nest that in- thing On aarth can b. Thay f- variably shows ita location. I The ever chansinu \u003chameleoei Now, look at aur pet-the Chameleon. We bought it fromn a loud-voiced etreet fakir, anti a most interesting littl. pet it is. Its natural color, if it eau ho said to have one, is a liglit pea green; change it to your khaki coat front its resting place on the grass, and it slowly beeomes greyislh-yellow, and as near the new-fangled color khaki as its readily exciteti pigments wvil allow it. Place it front there upon a reddish tinged eloth, and, Io! the strange little lizard slawly becomes of a reddish shade. Ail the. day long he kindly- imitated the dferent colorsalie would rest upon. \"I think 1 eau puzzle hlm,\" sait my assistant, Fritz, as lie produceti a black and white checked coat. \"Hie wili burgt himself trying ta get that shade.» But Mr. Chamelean had a trick or ty j of bis own. Slowly Le faded front thé green cf hia last imitation inta a bronze, then in- ta a dirty yellowish black - this took fully ten minutes. We had given hi a combination that the Chameleon family- were evidently unacquainted with, but bce ias doing Lis best. Now the delicate, little body iras ahnost al black; the tip of the tail and the head were quite black. \"See the white lines eoming!\"- burst ont the excited lad. And, sure enough, the poor, !;ttle lizard could not work ont thle puzzluîg checks, but lie did the nearest lie could, and so, as ire gazed, -%%e saw bis sliîm, lhttle body ail blaelk interlined with tinv wlîite stripes. Ilow trulv wodeflaetewyo, Nature! odru r i aso \"RalMr. Johinstone,\" ai nSot- lihb.1adv' to a floted itunorist, \"there is no end to vour %vit \"W ll'he rep!ied, '\"I Nwotld ho sair putten aboot to thiik I %vas ut. my w-lus wlnmipeg, Mareh, 1014. \"iIone, Yet Not Alone\"9 Veryoftmâ 88as VirWnia Maflory read Ling lay behind thO words, \"Ye shall \u003e lave me alon%- and yet 1 amn ot alone because the Father is with me.\" She waaiiot ajone for she Lad her mother* but these two hadsathband inhandaJ Lad bon father, brother d tw sier slipping away -from the, ~d they iwere zeýytno ln, o yhad each thr. Howwould itbe if either of then uhould die and leave the other? Tne turne came at st. The mother died. Virginia waa glad to have lived to minister to, her mother glad aie hati not leftlher mother alone;Li now she was face to, face with what ail the yenresahe had looked forward to andi dreaded. She was, aloné, and ai l ono. For ixten year she andber mother had made thoir scanty but ind.opendent living in a city remote frorn their former home. Modest,ý almost timid koepI'g their own counsel alter the ng..Ne E ]andi way, cutting their coat according tcthe cloth, they had lived their aeIç. respecting and weil reapected lives. People wondered how they mnaçedito live, for both were frail with the nheri- tance of feebloness whicblad carri6d ail the other members of the fainily into early graves. But they continued in compara- tive health, although with no: large re- serv of physical vigor. \"'Tell me,\" said the niniàter af'ter the mother Lad closot ber eyes, \"just hoi yo are to, meet this expense. There wilibe the journey back to the old home, and thore are bills to b. met at once I know Your f riends -wilI b. glad ta o ey.ouwa boan.\" \"I think 1 can manage it,\" she replied. 411 thank you, but. I do not think 1 ahal need ta acoept assistance. We have a littie, and that will'meet the expense of 'the Journey. While I arn back at the ôa home 1 shailtry again to sell a piece of real estate that iepresentsa the littie my father left us. It in improductive and the taxes have been a burden, and Y could not ieh it for anythinglike what we gave. I hope tadose of it now.' Haeyou friends back in the old '«I amn araîd ail who knew us have gone. We lived quietly there. We had a great deal of sickness, andi could not make many acciuamntances. «'Iwill write ta the minister, andi he will meet you when the tramn arrives? and con- duet the service at the gravel saidthe pastor. .When the train entereti the depot, bear- mng Virginia andi the cherisWe dust of ber mother, the minister, w o hLid neyer known lier, was there. AndL*ith him. wero three others, who Lad recognized the nane when lie announceed it in p rayer-meeting the night before. Andi when they atood at the grave an hour later, eleven others whom she had kncwn stooti with hier. When she spoke of going to a htel. she founti arrangements already m~ade for her in the home of an old frienti, and there she s'ient some days andi rested. A lawyer, who as a 8tudent, Lad rented a room at iheir home calleti to offer hie services, gratis, in probating lier mother's will, and tbrough his help, her experience in court lasteti not more than ten minutes. Bis exainination of the papers showed the situation of the real estate,* and hoe calleti into counsel another friend of bers,- a.reai esaeman, who founti the. property in a more hopeful condition than hdbeen supposeti, andi adjusteti matters with pros- pect of immediate return of a considerable part, if not ail, of the money investeti in it. From every aide these'olti friends rose up ta help her, andi she said, \"I could not have linagineti that so many people would have remembered mneaiter ail these yeaiB.\" After a week spent in lber former city, Virginia returned and took up ber work again. The world looketi strangely bright as she saw it through her tears. She La something to do, and was able to do it. She hati money enough in sight to pay lier honest debts, and hati no neeti to accept charity. She had helti ber mother's band to the end, and had heard ber constaltlY repeated word, \"You've always been a good girl, Virginia.\" And besides ail this, she hati found friends at homne and back in the old home, friends whomn she had not knownto beisicb. She had beenef t alone, y Se 'vas flot alone; for the Father was %hber, and the Father's children were -~ j... NOTICE Can any of our \"rivais show better resuts than the following? And just think of the price, $7.00 for a. complete batchier. Brooder and- hatcher combined, $8.50 Lo.b. Toronto. We carry in stock incu- bators from 50-egg capacity te 1,200. Model Improved Sanitary Hovers._Model Col- only Brooders, Bone Mils% poultry fencing. The Firs, Murrayville P.O., B.C, October 2th, 1913. C.1i. Daniels, Esq., Mg. Model Incubator Co., Dear Su :-I arn sending u a ew lnesto let you tl,.hat 1 had very good hatches with the Cycle Hat- Nolde 50 eggu. Constructed entirely Of metal ex- chers I got from you. 1 cept insulation. la self-Regulating. Requires ne Sup- hatchod eut over 600 chicks, plied Moisture and will lest a life-uime. had an average of 44 chicks from every 48 eggs set-that is what 1i put in-48 eggs in each machine. T wiII want a few more machines-will send for them soon if you are stili in the business. Yours truly, WM. JEFFERSON. ONE MONTIr LATER C. j. Daniels, Esq., b ear Sr:-Please ship mie as soon as you cati 4 Cycle Hatchers lb-J freiglit *t. Milner, B.C., same as the last you sent nie.Moiey order enclosed. Xours trulI WM. JLIFERSO\\ Double- Quick Grain Sprouter M IPERPETUAL POULTET SILO A Veritable Hot-House, Growth-Forcing Machiine. Makes twb to four buishels n;f feed from one busiiel ofgrain. Pays a proftt very inonthlini the twelve. Made in six sizes, from a few liens to 1,000. A fuil. line of poultry supply always on hand. Have you sen the latest thing in Leg Bands, the strongest celluloid leg band (Spiital) made in 12 brilliant colors. Over a, million sold last %.ear. No better way of kçcc ing tab on your yoling and old birds, producers and non iiprodutcers. Bands, 25c. doz., 50, 80c., 100, $1.50. Send for catalogue. The Madel Incubator Ca., Ltd., 196 River Street, Toronto, Ont. x- p-",
         "Wnnipeg, March, 1914. The Western Home Monthi y - -- Exploration and Surveys Witten for 'The Western Home By lHenry il Wicks.étead, Chief Engineer Eastern Lines, C.N R. MEsurveys for t1Iis long streteli of parties coiuld lie kept in touch with one i ne, from Montreal to Port Ar- anotiLer and completely under the con T thur (1023 miles), extended over trol of the 'division engineer. The plan aperiod of eight years, althoughi worked on the wbole remarkably well, Most of -the work (and that the most largely on account of the personal abil- dimcluIt of access) was completedl in the ity and experience of - the two divisiona 1 lat -four years, previous to the com-rn-,iefs, . T. Morrison*and J. F. Rose, mnement of construction, which bas The parties worked winter and sum- jugt been flnished. From MNontreal to mer. enough. supplies'beingy brought in Sudbury the country1 was fairly well J muring the late summer by the water 1014. tory read iatmeu. Ye shall Lot alone, r mnother. iisnd and vo sisters hywere r of th=m a mothe lived to she had v she was r mother ýependént ir f ormer %ccordmoe hefr Sah d lives naçed to ie inheri. arried aul ,nto eafly Compara- larie re. aftea, the J owd Z el )Me, and I know. ke you a 3 replied. k 1 shàlJ Shave a pense of ýt the aid ce of real taxes 1 notimeh 1 hiDpe the old Lve gone. 1 a great ke many d he, will and con- said- the ot, bear- st of bier ,r known cre three ne when, Ling the ;tood at i others her. a httel. rade for rid there i rented off er hie nother's periece minutes. wed the e called s, a real rty 'n a id been th pros- iderable M in it. ida rose )Uld Dot [e would 1 these er city, er work ~rbright She a o do it. pay lber 1accept r's hand istantIy been a ail this, id back bhad not f t alone, her wa9 eni were ,niapped and had been worked over by the lj»nbermen. Supplies could usually be taken in by wagons within a few xqiles of the camps. From Capreol June- tion to Lake Nipigon, on the contrary -wu\u0026 almost a terra incognita.. A ha If- dozen of the main canoe routes had' been traversed by the Geological Survey.. .*nd laid down on the maps. Other in- formation was mnisleading and generally worse than useless. One whole sumner and parts' of other suumers were spent i mere exploratory work, and rough track and micrometer surveying. These estahished supply routes, elevations of lakes and rivers, direction of drain- %ge, and the character of the surface geQlogy. Frorn the information gained, a gen- eral route ivas laid down through gov- erning points, only one or two of which ' have been abandoned as the result of fuller informatiop.. This being done, the regular survey was started and carried con inuously forward from either end. The methods were rather different from, and it is be-lieved an improveî:.cnt on, the tîsual- practice. The district was divided into two parts under as many experienced division engi neers, probably thme very best men for the task to be round' in the country. To each of these was assigned two full parties averagiflg froni 13 to 17 men each. One of these A Birchl bark canoe carrying parties rau traverses and rongli expIer- Rtory lines alie-ad oyf thme other nnd kcept finin 15 to 25 miles in advance of it. Pie other followved with trial liues and location. Th4 object cf this was threefold. (1) That the locating party should lways llave a knowledge of the coutry athead, stîffiient to prevent their running into a cul-de-sac and having to back out ag-ain withmueli loss of time. (2) Borh parties were kept on the same supply route and atteudeti to by the same gang cf packers and canoe-xndn. (3) Buth, routes to convenient pints, at which 'caecs\" were made, and from these they were distributed as required by dog teams te -the v'arious camps. These caches were placed as- .far -as possible ahend of the work, ratherî than behinltk The moral effect upon the spirits of the men owing to the feeling of seeurity thus engendered was of marked value. As a matter of fact, thiere was no real privation at any time througlî the 3hortage of. food, practisraly no sickness iLnd very little accident. Some men mutinied at one point, tried to find tîeir way out alone and got frostbittefl and hiaîf starved; two others were drlowned, but in neither case was anyone but themselves to blame.. One died fîrom the effects of alcohiolie poisoning on his- way n. One engineer came out of the4,,woods to die of a dîsease contracted yersbe- fore. These repreeent ail the cauiies.. On the other hand, the standard of comfort -was rniaintained to practically the same level as on similar work nearer home. The touts were roomy and wvell heated andth le food was the best whiclî could lie obtained. A special mail car. rier wvas attached to each division and made regular trips (by canoe in suni- mer and on snowsboes in w4inter) over the seventy-five to 150 miles gap, whieh soparated the parties from the Canadian Pacific Railway. Fresh meat was often C.N.R. surveyor on is way. obtainable andi fislm alninst always, ex- cept in mi(lwinter. One remarkable exception te thme gel'- eral standard of enfort was o1 ai exlW(lîtiOml erganized by the western di- visional engiineer, tlroughI an exceptienal inaccessible belt -of counttrv. N-ivieili it wvas uirgently desired te finkili helore the sprinig breakîmp. M«Nr. Rose discarded al hiî N%-iite staff, except tho-se ahsoliitelv mecesarv for the instrumenital work andj retaied seventeen Indîlans of tlie eul try. Tents mvere abaumdoiîcd i favor of eilouILl cauva.5 tu coer a wi.wam- Made lin Canada Play billiards at homo on a gen aine BRUNSWTOK--the Prince of Entertainers. The physical and mental recreation -concentration, self control, ex. eiternent, fun-combine to make billiazds the one best tonie for tired bodies and braina. A. home biuliard room, wth a superb BRUINSWICK. Billiard or Pocket -Blliard Table will solve the problein of keeptng the boys tt home It provides flnest èntertaiîmment for ail the famlly and its in- timate crcle of friends. BR»xmUNS.WICKt Bïiiard Tables Brunswick Billiard Tables are mode in Canada and used exclus!vely by the world's cut experts. ttEveiy '\"Brunswick,\" from th1e inexpensive styles in speclal home aimes to tesuperb Regulation Tables. is the absolute best ia its class.. Celebrated Monarch Qnick-Acting Cushions, Slate Beds witb perfect playing surfaces. Scientifically copstructed, accuzate angles, finest playing qualities. E-ach a masterpiece iu design. We operate an immense factory iu Toronto and distribute thtough mimerons Canadian branches. These great facilitits enable us tmT sell. blhard tables of highest quality at very ftoderate prices. For thret generations, our Regulation Tables have been tht standard of the world. The Brunswick \"Bab-' Grand\" is made of Mahogany, attractively înIad. Concealed Cue Rack and Accessory Drawer holds èntrt playmng outhit. Slate IBed. Monarch Cushions. accurate angles. perfect playmng qualities. Fnrnlsjed as a Carom, Pocket-Billiard or Combinatton Carom and Pocket-Bilîhard Table. Sizes, 3x6; 3Yýx7; 4x8. Our \"Convertible\" Billiard or Pocket-Billiard Tables (used also as library tables, dining tables or davenports) can be used in any room. Equal in playing qualities to tht \"Baby Grand\" styles. Factory prices Over a Year to Pay Every home can now afford the luxury of a high-class billiard table. Purchaser has the option of paying ail cash or iniall monthly payments spread over an entire year. Playingr Outfit Free Complete high.-grade Playing Otitfit goes wlth table, ineludlng Cues, Balle. Bridge, Rack, Markers, Chalk, Caver, Billiard Brush, Book 'How to Play,\" etc., etc. Mr Write for Richly Illustrated Descriptive Book \"6Billiards--Th'e Home Magnet\"' This beautiful book shows the tables in actual colors, with accurate dWs scriptions, details of. easy termis, etc. See Brunswick Billiard Tables on display at any of the branch offices named below. The Brunswick-Balke-Coilender Co. of Canada, Ltd. Tbe «'Made in Canada\" Billard Table Co. Dept. W.D., 80 York Street, Toronto, Ontario BRANCHES: Edmonton, Alberta, 647 Fourth Street; Vancouver, B.C.52 Beatty Street; Montreal, P.Q., Il Notre Daine Street, West; Winnipeg, kLau- toba, 143 Portage Ave. E. ---------------------------------------------------, . - - i -- Along the C.N.R. route between Port Arthur and Montreal \"l-",
         "Winnipeg, March, 1914. Thàq WàqntAn HOMO MOnthlv * LU E RUV~ WV ~ -- -- - - -- - - ----r- No 63. Quarter section with 54 acres un- der ciitivation, 501acres of begt of wheat land, balance hay land wth graves J.. poplar, situated in the .Arelee district northwest of Asquith. Log hanse 14 x 20, log stable 14 x e20, good'well, rc $2,500.00. Ternis $1,000.00 ca-1h down, balance arranged in 5 cqual annuial payments. This farni. s close ta the Saskataon -Battieford urvey, and -will double in value for a netr No, 71. Fine whole section of land, aità aited 3 miles5fron.the tone1of Mlayniant, CN R narthwest of Asquith, no akali, no stane, 14O acres under cultivatian, no build ng.If you want a gead farrn for yaur sons cane uj) and sec this, a great maney maker for ice purchaser, at $20.00 paer acre. $1,00 handles thie first psy ment, balance arranged. A farmer with a godoiutflt and only $1,500 dollars can get a good proposition at the right price, wîth lots of virgin soil to work with. This section was especîally selected for a professer of the Manitoba Agi icntura1 college, but bis duties prevent bim from farming this fine section, Write at once bo secure this. X,6Fins.hbalf section with.255 acres lidicultivation, 35ace fenced, situatcd in the famious Eagle Creek district, 8 miles f rom Flurd - mant Lodge, 2 storey frame hanse of 6 rooms, cernent foundation * and plastered complete, stabling i: for 18 head, 2 steel field granarica aise frame granary; New îlog House 24 x 8, dividcd into 2 pens and hog house. Rplendid supply cf water Price $2500 per acre, $ 3,00000 cash down, balance in 6 yearly payments, W, C. L. Pratt Notary Public ASQUITH,. SASKATCHIEWAN Canada (2s miles West of Saskatoon) I Business ïO f Iou Iw $5YAKE A VEAR Reliable, earn- est men wanted ta juin the Mer- il Co.aamtilv Syatau. Share in the profits o(otiler peoples work No matter where you lave ot what your business or profession, 1 WitglVe YOU instruction la the Real Estate and Builng Business fret by man,. and it you qualifir, appont you Speciai Repr.eOut.t*M8 hep yoia to bauld op a lifetime bumnsotya5r own thatshouud yedyouanincome or e.M a eyear. great opportunity Instruction Free in 's; ezoiI ad e to te eLothers workngfrye n for firsi ~aaand fuit detaîls Dai fores oA Wpot0a) ,f do jJ JOUILRF, Mgr. OP04*1 gaoy v hiso. 1427 WMam..111d\u0026, Càia Do Not SufferfromRheumatism Sciatica, Muscular Rheumatism, Rheutnatism ot ilie )oints, Lumbago; Gout. Swellîngs, Pains, La Grippe, Eczena. Bfood and Skî,î Diseases, Astlitna. Lung and B; orîchial ti oubles. Write to day Jor our hookiet. It tllhs yo' how the Nomadic fridîiaîs cured themselves wîthî Little Manitou waer, and hwyou can do thc same in VOUR \u003c)WN l'orne withouît patent medicines or drugs, Do nocr deay-*J\"S FREE. The L. L. MNI.itio;î Co, 365 tst Ave, Watrous, Sask, Canada. Good Agents Wants-d. Heating an\u0026. cookling were dons on an open fire ini the centre, 1Ail the camping imipedimenta and pro- vision. were can-ued on the backs, of the men at.oeatrip, [t lasufficient te say thiat in spite cf temperatures lQwer 4ljian 50 degrees beiow zero the patty emierged frein the- woods three mon(tba later in the beat of health and spirits and with the work satisfactorily fin-. îshed In one respect the survey parties 'in thîs nertlit]and bail a great advaiitage over the Antarctic explorera, oibout whîch se much bas been heard lately. Fuel and shelter frein theii.wîd were aiivays within reach. On .thie other land is incomparably more difficult te, bîand the light fleecy snov cof the north travel en tlîsn the wndswept wastes of matter on the portage... A stili later arrivai and ene coming into geners.I Use ,s the canvas canoe. 1 believe this ramne originally froin -Maine, and it ia now brouglit ta consideralile perfection. neh construction. except for the canvas skin is* very like that of the Indiali; but the 'white ýnan's tools and metal fasteninigs give hm a great ailvailtage over the native, aud ondrfui as the Intiian'awork la, coneidering his facili. ties, the civilîzed product is better. The zanoes for the Catjadian Nortliern Rail- way surveys were bailt in Fredericton,' N.B., but its modela were rejected in favor of that of the aboriginal craft, and bath models and construction were a de. cided advance on anything previously used. Tenats werc aise cxperimented 'with,, An Indian and Jus squaw niaking birch canot. tlîe soutli polo. snd oea laled te won- der whether the Lritish sailer is after aIl the rîgit inan te carry tlireugh suc- cessfully such expeditions as tiiose of Captais Scott and 'wlether the north country nd ian or Esquimaux, under competenb leadcrship, is not the pi-oper person. The half-breed runner bas been known to make 100 miles in 24 heurs on. snow- slîoes.' The writer lias m-ade 70 miles and 40 te 50 miles was an ordinary :lav's work a generatien ugo. But tiiese nion were brouiglit up te, it from cbild- hodi. No man hewevor streng could hope te keep pace with tlien, unless after years of practice. They trav- eliedi witlu the simpiest and liglteat eut- rit and it uassucmi nen as tlîeseo î aeconpaiedDoctor Rae te, the Arctie -ad men of a kindred race wlio ivent through with Pcary to, the pole. Nan- sen nmade one cf tlîe most remarka hie journevs in history in comparative Pom.- fort, bocause lie had stuclied thoeir netii. ods snd modes ef life during the years of resîdonco with thiem. Tiiere are stili wasto places on the earth te be explored \"à nl apped, andl the expldrers wili do well te sttempt mcrely te improve the methods iil hiave enabled tlîe natives te live and thrive under the local conditions, net te revelutionize theni. Equipment and Camp Outfit. Tha oîîtfit of these survey parties %vas an iîiteresting .study in itself Tl'le principal considerati on, of course, 'vas t rasporta tion. The nortiîeriî -wviidr- ncss la for the moat paît a liepeless jungle of growing and fallîng tiber, withi procipi tous rocks, swamps or muiskegs and lskcs snd rivera intersect- in- it in every direction. Continiiieus travei on foot is difficuit snd exhaus- niui, and tha use of pack animais îm- practicabie. But the numerous lakes, Iponds andi streamsafsford go-od (thligh Iroken) naýigýation sand the universal ineans cf tr-avel in summer is the canqe. AL, first tlîis was tlîe birclu bark canoe oof ilic nativvcIndian, a wonderful con - struct ion biiilt enti rcIv of tic produict s of ftie local forest but extremeiv deli- cate and iinflt for use 1) v an v biut praci izci whîte mmei. ',Nxt cauic the' Ihassw%%oodl or cerdai- c- noec, b il t rougll oith fli lian ioll.IL wasni tiO! ýtronger and more spedvN. but alc-o bouavier, alid w iglit is a very serionis and a number of difféecnt styles were tried. Ilere again bightiîes as essen- iai1. The final evolutipn was a roof of best 8j\u003ez. ducl-, with back, front and walls of Iight drill. Shelter being ai- mest aiways availabie and windiuge un- important, the walls, were made un- usutally high (5 te 6 feet) adding inuch to available room inside. Bedding for summer consiste cf -the inevitable woolen blanket but in 'winter thu. extremely low temperatures render tliese insuffilcient for the ordinary man Indian nmend even Mien. made into a sleeping bag, The rabbit skin. blatîket la ftie most per- fect substitute wliich the e yd nan or auy oeelcsc 1sd evolved up te, a few years age, but lattî-riv the efflerdeSwn uilt lias slipersede(t evervtiiing cIse. Thiisnmade inte a sleeping bag witlî a protective covering of dîîek has 1wen a verv sa ti sfietory soiution cf thle he ul dingP question .A weii fed man er14 sieep comfortaly vin a -onbanki oni e of tiiese bg~w the titlernionwtei* at 30 degrees i\u003e(IIw zero. Transport iniildëineî-karuomnip]isIoil rie pactieally tlil -saine routie- as tin sutinner., the ice on tieluc l;II ti e fotuming flhcroad. Th'le tlî a Ssnd for my fiîg Lst 0f La nds Iiîg te caný6 1 The Suburban Twvo residonts cf the suburbs, raya the New York Sun, wvere discussing flhe 01l'uipie races whiclu vere thon taking place in London. \"Tlîe Olympic runners bave donc soune record i-wrk,\" declsred one. \"I'i\"rejoitied lis cempaniesi, scril' fftll * . J\"Ifnoti(c fiey d(idit run ith a clip of cotîce in one lîsîd and a b)reak- falst 1-i0i1 atidithe tiper iin the ether.\" S-ilions are te lbcuineasnred by their -t I tihl ot 4icithlPrcfessor l'eaecock. 1 For Sale I the. place eoftthe canoe. Experiment s have been tried. with broadrunner aleiglus similar te' the Kemetic cf the Esc;uî. maux, and under certain circumstaiîces they are admirable., But theY need a broad open road and:'\u0026o fairly bard oee and this they. only get on the larger lakes. The portages are toc narrow and gexlerally too sof t, and the flat Ilar- rov flexible toboggan is the aflly thiiîg wlîich is universuil in its adaptation. It is generally made et the native birch and 16 anothcr- Indian creatïoua 'which bas been little im.proved on by the white man altboÔugh steel ïcrews, tire boitsansd even steel -wire rope. have of lute entered into its construction to re- place the ahinga of rawhide. The bard woad gives a. minimum of friction in cold weather but towards the breakup cfmîrinter the wet snow not only makes them diffieult to haul, but roughens and .rags up th.e uood, Low wooden rudders shed ivith steel are tien sometinies used as an adjunct, but they are awkward thingg to carry abo)ut during the long winter and the period of wet snew lase short that they are often omit teL Dogs are used for the long distance work and rapid trav- eling. The mest important part of the wi n- ter outfit is probably the snow soea and it bas been one of the. hard«et te get of serviceable make. Tle snowsboe the, Indian makes for-himseîf is good, but those he makes teo eIl are the reverse and those sold by the dealers in civîli- zation' are almnost uscless. The Fred- ericton firm lia ve taken-up this brandi of manufacture of late and is supplying a very geed. article. Cooking outrits have aise been the subjeet of nîncli study and experiment. For lÏglit lyiîîg expedîtions the open fite is al .sufficient but for the large party requiring a variety of food it is difficuit in tiiese days te find a cook who la willing te operate o n oe. lu stormy Nveather bis job ia net an enviable one, the haking of bread being especially difficuit. Furtiier the' open fire necesslitates a very large quantity of dry wood wbich is only obtainabie anywhere by virtue of much chopping and hauling and sometimes not at ail. [n any case it takes a helper's wiiole Lime te keep the coek supplied. Sheet- steel cook stoves have been brought to a fuir state cf efticiency but they are stili cumbersome and heavy. 1 on",
         "*vvinuw.y 4ffý- Imen is aSleîghsg Esc1uî. ataui eas need a rd ue larger' farrow Itnar- Stliiiig e birch wlîîch y the s, tire ave of to re - um of owards 1snow \u003e haul, woo(L 1 steel djlnct, o carry nd the t they ed for 1 trav- Le Win- 0e and to get koe the \u003ed, but reverse civili- Fred- branch plying n tie riment. en fite party lifiuit who is not an Lbeing open iatity ainable opping at, ail. wliole Sheet- ght to ey are Dr. Clement Dukes, an authoritY O01 the6 inatter, gives the £oliowing tables, Undèr,,ten years of, age, eleven hourg' slee-p; -under thirteen, ten and a0,haIf hours; under fifteen, ten.hours; under seven teen, fine and a bal! -heurs. ,The younger the, child, the more sleep re- quired, butV the tim.e required decreases front infancy to grown-up life. In old age, somietinico mute sleep is needed; and sontimes lees, it \u0026epends upoù the state of lealth of old -people. If vigoroUS and active, they- rcqui e les8 sleep, and if derepit and weak,e need a great deal o! sluxnber, HIC: \"B yoG:ung ebjîdren. If vou sce a healthy, smooth.faeed old iiiai, you mnay be certain he has slpt m-eil througluout bis life. Rt may be said, tiien, tluat if a nian or wonan is healthiv tule wear and tear of the work anti amusement of the day *s repaire\u0026 - * ùliglit lîours o! sinnîber. ,WhVen a persOlT Crowds sixteen lîours o! work, whether it. be band or brain, into eight, or eighit l'ours o! dissipation into four, and fiat- ters hixuself that because he is working ou- playing harder, he will consequefltly Sleep better, lie is deceiv:ig hiniseif. 'Ehere are feNv men, and still few'er woînen, who are able to lead such a life ioi- a cus.derable tinte and ouly a few. #The western Home Mwont hly Thp average man or wonian. who does not give body and mind sufficient'turne to re- cuperati by sleep, is draining himseLf or herseif of the natural forces and is dra.wing an overdraft on the.,,bank of life, and it 'wiil be only *a question of time 'when 'disaster will corne. Sieepleses9 is' the flrst danger sign.al of a breaki- down, and if long continued, vill.resuit in the vrecking of the mental and phys- ical .powers. But, the question of , hronice leep- lessness le too big to . be discugsed. in a shçgrt article, and it is only brought in to show the harm that the bock of sleep may prod-uce.ina lîealthy man or woman, and- to emphasize the value -of or rather the necessity of enough. sleepb. Tiiere neyver has been a time in the history of the world when long and deep sleep was so greatly needed as now,. and there neyer has been a time when civi-' nhe Value.et SIeep yChules A.' Cloutin M.]). Sle e a,,nemssity. for human beings, 80 iuch a. ne;tural appetite as hunger ç thiat.lu fact, thie craving of the bodyý for sleep la even stroner than i'ts4 Cjy for food. A. man*,can go for forty- dïys, withîout. food; it, has been don e.i ce'an'exist for seven daya, occa-sioni- ely longer, without f ood or water, but without s.leP-hé can scaicely drag'along fôr seven days. Ail living things muet -seep to live, gnd the anim ai that does net sleep can- Dot live. Marie de Manaceine, of St. Peter burg, Who bas written the best work on Blei3p, bas prov4 by lie ex- perinients on puppies fbat animais sufer more froin want oui seep than from want of food or drink, and if kept fromi sleep even* for forty-eight hours wil die,~ and Professer' Patrick and Dr. J. A. Gilbert, of the UnfveritY of Iowa, expermenting on men, sbowed that want of leep had a very serious effeet on the heaith. But no one needs te be told that being deprived of sleep makes a person feel out of sorts; everyone knows this fromn experience. A healthy man who cuts off his amnount of aleep even for a ohort tinte dues not possees his, uual energy and vitality;'be is slack and languid. But if hie continues to do without a proper amount of éleep for some tinte he will break down. How much sleep does a person re- quire. The answer te thua question is not easy to give. No one eau lay down a hard -and fast law. R- depends upon age, occupation, and -habit; ase upon the makoe-up of body and mid. Somes people' eau get along 'with mueh less sleep than others and be lu ex- oellent helth. -Napoleon the Great le said to hâve slept but littie; Humboldt, the well-known naturalist, ia reputed to hbave neyer aient longer thon four hours out of the twenty-four, and lived to be more than eighty; and many other re- nowned mnen are stated to have lived in good bealth te old age with an extra- ordinarily smail amount of sleep. How- ever, the ordinary, everyday man or woman cannot be guided by the exaniple of such nmen, and while the amount of sieep required varies lu different persolis, yet tables have been drawn. up by au- thorities on the subject which show in a fairly reliable manner hon- much sleep the average child, man or woman needs according tu age. For grown-up people, up te the age of flfty, it je generally considered that about eight hours is enough. A philosopher one said that the twenty-four hours should be drnided into three parts; eight hours for 'work, eighit lours for amusement, and, eight hours for sleep, and this see¶ns a good division. An old .English distioh says, six for a muan, seven for a woxnan, and eiglit for a f ool; and another old say- ing goes as follows: \"Nature requires five, Custom gives seven; Laziness takes fine, Aûd wickedness eleveti.\" hized man wvas so )ittle able to sleep well. So many people at the present time live in big cities wlhcre it is rush and hustie ail the day and almost the same thruughout the nighi; aithbugh the city dweller becomes, Ito a great extent, accustonied to sùch a if e, and even misses the city noisçs when away from it, the'strain tells on -hlm and in- ability to sleep properly is often the re- sui.t. The way we live bas made of us a nervous, restless race who seem to have forgotten 1mw to take things culm- ly and reposefully. This tendency bas much to do with the habit of drug tak- ing, whih is said to be very prevalent in thie4country. The value of éleep can in no way be so clearly gauged as in the case of an invalid, or of one who is sulTering f romt a -serious, acute illness. %Vhen a physician in attending a fever strieken patient whose brain is wandcring, or who is raging ini delirium, he, know's that the -onIy hope lies in a. natural sleep. Very Carelees A bright little f!Veyear-old while driv. ing une day with her father in the Park, cane upon the Zoo. Hdr curiosity and intereat were at once aroused, and one6 question tumbled out after another, re. garding the mratures that they saw. 'Father,\" sbe asked, «What is tlmt black animal over in the corner?\" «That, Wise Inquisitiveneee, le what la known as the0 Buffaio.\" \"Oh.\" séhe exclaimed,regretMuly. uWiy didn't they cSX it a New York;, IV\u0026. a y. AST ERq Instrument W Mr. Edi lmoa$M lS bv.ti.m) Juat Out -The perfectied musical wonder of the age. And shipped on a stupendous special offer direct from us. W RIT tou.y for our new Edison Catalog-the catalog that tells you al new model Edison with Mr. Edison's new diamound point reproduoer. about our neu Edison effet! Now read: Mr. Edison's Hoby a1mongt ait bis won- derfu Inventions is bis phionograPh. He wor ked for years striving to produce the inost perfect pho- nograph. At Iast he bhas produced liii. new mode]. Think of It; over,25 yera of work on alI these epochniaking inven- tions - tlen his pet and hobby perfectedl Endless Fun Happiness je If--nd real happines e lufbunil 1 a reai homne where the happy and unted family Lmtua eafS i.tsiaDMM Mdatlo. loeh a varlet ef ntertainmeft 1Here the lateat - to-date sang is of the big citiez, Laugh utilth ters tream dowD yFour face and your aides ache fram Iaughing t the funnieat of funny minstrel shows. ear h grand aid church hymne, the mnajestie choir@ Bear thetreIing organs. the crashing brase bands, the waltzes ab two atups.the solos. dueta and quartettes. Au mil b. yours wth thei. dinlaYoUr homme. Bond the coupon TODAY. about the. woi clerful Ut wiU lÂ o tell you Free Loan Ofer: e 0, il, and yucoc tail the brand new records on an absolutely free. ban. Hear ail the wraetaes, tw0- steps, vaudevilles, minstrels. grand operas, old sacred bymna. every kind 4f. comic and\"popular music, also your choice o! the highest grade concerteaqad, operas, as rendered by the world'a greatt airtists. Entertain your family y. andyour friends. Thon, wh.n you are through with te.outfi4 .you ana\u003e' moud t back at Our expena.. Reinember, not a penny down-no depout-no guarantee-no C. 0. D. to us-no obligation ta buy- full fre, trial ln your own horne-dirmdt tram us-dirct td yau.iteturtiable atoaur expense or payable (if 7011 want to keep IL\u003e at the actual rock-bottom price direct fram us. T he Reson: Wy should we make such en ultra-liberal v cfthis magnificent new instrument. When yougetit luar town we kow every. boywiIl say titat nothlng like itlibas ever been beard-so wonderful, so grand, so beil- fM. such a king of cntertainers-so we are pretty sure that at Ieast saine one, If Dot Ydu, then somebody else, wiIl want ta luy one of these anov tyI.-Edisons e.P.dally Mthev 8» beimg offoeed now t the nmou astond*ng ,ook.bttom pim mv m ds.q mais slm m $2.00 a month. Our New Edàison T. Cataloi Sent Free!f C 1AD: Your narne and addrcss on a Du 5,355 PortageAm., Uh.p.g. N.ia postal or i a letter, (or just Gnlmn-laesn ey~nvaio the cupon is noug. NoCataloz and ful partlculars af your froc trial 08w obligations In asking for the on the new mudel Edison i'honagraph. catalog. Get this offer - while this Offer Iaata. Nane .................. ...... Fi out the coupon today. F. K. Babson, EdisosPlioqrph Disfltrs Adrs.............. - ...... W 71513.35$Pedsu.Ave., Wusipeg. la U.S.Office, Edison Block, Cbflo ~ t E Mr. Eio' Won de rful1 New -ne vu ment ys the ýY thue takng e sonie scoru- withi a break- er.\" 7i teir ýacock. 1 1914.",
         "Household. Sugge4ions 'Wi.nnipeg, Ma.robl 1914. Good Bread Getting at thîs subjeet from an analytical point - of, viuw and de- tirmîning the exacý why and wberc- fore of each resuit obtained, Mr. George A. Oison, chemiat of the Wash- ington Experiment. Station, after several years of experimentation and observa- tion bas arrived at the conclusion that good bread can ho made froin virtually any kind of flour. He says that success or failure in bread-making depends ai- moat wholly upon the methods practiced by the individuial. In the course of bis atudy Mr. Oison made an extensive ob- 'servation of the experionces of persona 'w'ho made brcad. With ne exception he. found that those who succeeded in mak- ing good brea\u0026d ail the time did not de- jesd-upon- -fixed-recipe#. f \"Tîhe first requisite, for successful bread-making,\" lie says, \"'is good, active yeaat, and it makes littie difference whether the source la compressed or cess water.. Upon mlxi mg, !f the dotîgit is too stiff it is possible tao, vercome thlis by adding more water an~d working it geiitly aând thorougbly. e '\u003cMix one pound of flour 'with ai of the yeast and water, either Iwith a spoon or a bread- mixer. Let it stand for a few minutes, and then gradually work in the rcmaining two and three-quarter poundM of flour. Neyer force the flour to take up the water. If the hands are used the dongh should ho partly lifted and half turned toward or away froin you. The mixing operation ahauld ho continued until ahl the ingredieiitsý have been thorougbly mixed. The samne pre. caution shouldho exercised in kneading the rising dough. Knead gently 'and thorough Iy until al the large gos pockets have been worked out. A tlorough mixing followed, bytwo grentie kneadings isa best with Borne flours, wvbereas with others the more handling in the last kneading to shape into laRvés gives the best results. If the ntixiîîg, G BEN ALAIRM CLOCKS Are Illustrated la the Catalogeo Da RI.DI NGîWL.I Write for a Copy of this Book - wardrobe, the cbi'dren's clothes and the curtains and cushons of yujur hame with Ilaypolo Soap * Thde QMiCk, cIeom, Home DyO Without any mess or bother Ma.ypole, Soa.p washes and dyes at one operatian, giving to woollens, cottons, silks or mixtures rich, even colors th it are clean, brilbiant and fadeless Wn sun or rain. 24 Color-will give any sbade. Colore fOc.-Black 15c.-at your dealers or postpaid with Bookiet 'Hcw to *dye\" from Frank 1. Benedict \u0026 Co., Montreal TH-E LABEL on your paper wiIl telli you when your subseription expires. SEND IN YOTJR RENEWÂL NOW Liovernment trail near Jasper, Alta. dried yeast cake, or a 'starter.' The main thing is that it should bc active and not soured by chilis or drauglits. By using good, active yeast and proper methods, good bread can be made from any flour. The best temperature for the development of yeast is fromn about eighty-two to nînety degrees Fa!bren- heit.\" The method given by 'Mr. Oison for the preparation of yeast is as follows: Grate a fourth of a pound of potatoes, add a quart of boiiing water and stir thoroughly. Next, add three ounces of sugar, an ounce of sait and, when the temperature has fallen to blood heat, add one cake of crumbled dry yeast cake and stir. Cover snugly, set aside in a worm place away from air durrents, and leave it there to ferment. The following morning this mixture should contain muchi yeast foam on the surface. Strain and add enough water to meet the re- quired absorption of the flour. If a \"starter\" is used, instead of the above proportions use four ounces of sugar and one and a fourth ounces of. sait, and fbllow the above directions. The next morning save out hiaîf a pint and place it in a fruit jar, whicl may be set away in a cool place ready to use as the starter. The remiaining plut and a lialf of yeast preparation is strained anid diiuted with the required arnount of water. The Danger of Rough Handling \"The use of too littie water is the in(\u003e.'t prevalent caiuse foir failuire to make good bread,\" affis Mir- Oison. The \u003cogh shotuld be almost slack enough to elilg to the hand. A stiff d1olgil is slow to rise, and in case fermentation is pro- Ionged it will sour and never spriîîg in the ov-en. Dongh of proper corisisteiiey wili rise rapidiy andl develop into \"we'l- piled\" lbaves 'of gocitextuire v1îcn haked. Tt is better to luRe too nuuch watpr than too littie, for ili the fOrMeî' case the tinie of fermeéntation ci eau ho 1ortcned -iiid baking prolongcl to dry oirt thc ex- Ikneading and other operations are don. witb force there is danger of .lesâiening the activity of the yeast, in which cage\u0026 the dough fails ta rise. On the other hand,- over-fermented daughs, wben placed ini the oven te bake, will faîl. In stuch cases it is advisable to re-kneod and lot the dough rise again, althougb the quality of such breod will ho more or less impaired.\" Since a measure full of one flour will weigh more than a measutë ful ai an- other, it should be weighed, not measured. Also, it is more satisfactory to weigh the water. The praper amount ,Of water must bce dctermined for each lot of flour, and it is therefore preferable to purchase flour, not a sack at a time but in barrel lots. Mr. Oison adds that four generally improves with age. ,lI- asmuch as scientific methods te doter- mine the amaqnt of water a flour requires are impracticable for household purposea, he suggests the following simpler'plan: Using a fairly accurate scale and a small apothecary's graduate, weigh out three or four lots of flour of four ounces ecd. In one lot add two ounces of pre- pared yeast preparation; in another,' two and four-tcnths ounces; and in a, tîjird, two and eighit-tenthis. If the one witlî tw'o and cigit-tenthis ounces is too soft, while the orie with two and four- tcntlîs ounices is a littie too stiff, mix the fourtlî lot with two and five-tenths ounces of the yeast preparation. Mix, set aside in a warm place and let rise until lighit; then bakçe and observe which comibination gives the best resuits. The one w~hicli, accordng to your judgment, g i vos the best results indicates also the, rvquired aiount of yeast solution ta use. l'le qîîantity of ycast preparation iised for fouir ounces of flour multiplied by fiftecn xvili give the quantity re- (luired for five one-pound loaves of brcad; or, riuîltiplied by three, will give thie quantity required for each three- fourths Of a pound of flour ta make a. one-pound loaf of bread. J Thé-W«tepà* Hom-e,-Afont.hîY",
         "oeunhet Ma.ob,1014. - The Western Home MOnthl 11A Fine Cafldy 1 on~e of -oifr collerge rstreated several Ufn 1 to a kind of home-made candy, ybieh looked and tasted unueually well; 4b caolled it marsbmallow fudge -and ild that it; was, impýly oui old fricnd, Ztolate fudge, poured over 'narshmal. jows. It did net seem quite so ricli and #weet as the fudge alone, and severai of 1 VO thougrht this a great.improvement; it â]ao loôked very attractive, mince the -White of the marshmalIowisa gontrasted: welj,- with the brown of the chocolate. 8he ellows a Iquarter of a pound of M\u0026rshilfows to eaclh cup of sugar, and It does no barra if the marshmallows are aUttle stale and dry, mince the hot candy je sure to soften them. My friend eutq the marshmallows into four or five pieces and spreads thema thickly in a gmail buttered tin; oue about six inches quare je very good, mince this candy je Inuch better when thick, as it k eee uxoist longer.' To make the fudge s e a!4de five tablespoofle of tbick cream and one square etofuiisweetened chocolate to each cup of sugar. She boils this amount five pminutes, or until a white liue ap- pairs on the ide of the dish wben stirred, and, after it bas eooled i littie1 she adds a tiny pinch of sait and a tea-1 spoon of vanilla. She tirs thefudge1 until partly cool and then pours it over1 the cut marshmallows, carefully coating each -piece, then she sets the tUn away for four or ifive heurs, since it must. not be eut until the marshmallows have -had time -te hardena. ittle, because if eut too soon the niarshmallows would. be very sticky and the squares would not keep their shape. My little friend always uses cream for ber fudge and says that the fudge is much better and no more expen- sive than to use milk and then add a little piece of butter. German HousekeOlflg Living i s cheaper in German cities than it la in the cities of England or America. The way in wbich a German family savea money is interestingly told by Mrs. Alfred Sidwick iu the Cornhill Magazine. She takes as an example the lasqs of people having an income of tweuty.five hundred dollars. A German will save one-tenth of bis twenty-five hundred, ither for investment or insur- ance. llow, then, does lie use the rest of bis income? Rents are high in tbe larger German towns, and a flat is chosen for cheapnesa, but even that will cost not leas than four ilundred and fifty dollars. The German income tax is high, and with municipal and other \"rates\" suchi expenditure wil probably amount to three hundred dollars. So far as indirect taxation goes, the German probably lias ne advautage. lHe lives, however, near bis work-oftefl in seneighboring street, and sometimes otbissop or office. His daily saving i ar fares la considerable, and be avoids thle wear and tear of regular travel. The great differeuce between German3\" and England or Ameiica is due te the liffereut scales of living. The Englisb- inan or American ,urnishes bis bouse rather luxuriously, and decorates bis rooms with ornamental knickknacks; the German's apartihents are bare, with much less work for servants. So where the English-speaking family would keep two or three maids, the Cermaii family ~Would have only ree-on small wages at that., ThyTn the Gernian wife look.s closelyý after domes tic details, with the-resuit that food is not wn.ste\u003c1 in a wel-man-. aged German kitchen, and the family does not sufer from the âbominable cook ing which depresses life in some other countries. But it does not demand, ither above or below stairs, the 'Itbree square ineals\" a day. 'Coffee and rolis suffice for breakfast. The chief meal is the midday dinner, which is generally plain and perhaps a littis monotonous. Coffee, with rusks, about four o'clock, takes the place of the English afternoon tea, and the supper is, a comparatively simple meal. The German family of this class plans that when all calls have been met there shall remain about eighty dollars for holiday--txpenseo. Perbaps: one mistak- English and Americans make is to allow for the holiday first.. ' English-speaking people wo'ùld speedilY become lees crampeil for ready money if they weuld be content to, ive a little more simply. Too many make the mis- take of imitating the style of those wbose incomea are twenity-five per cent. bigher than the.irs. Lseful tO know When a young fruit or shade tree stops grewing and looks as if it were about te give up tbe atruggle for existence, the trouble may often be traced te its being bark bound. In this case a long perpen- dicular slit lu the bark will enable it te resume its natural grewtb. Patent leather abees and boots, wben fresh and new, sbeuld be wiped over af- ter every wearing and put away in some place secure from dust, where the air is neither tobot ner tee cold. Extremes of temperature injure the leather. Wben the shees begin te show sigus of wear, tbey should be wiped over with a sponge and warm water, and, after being care- fully dried, sbould be brusbed over ligbtly with patent leather varnish sold for the purpese. Neyer put patent leather near the fire. To elean velvet there is notbing bet- ter than naptba, and 'even that sbould net 'be used cxcept on silk velvet of fast colora. Firat sponge the velvet with the nap tha unitil it seems quite dlean. Tben let semeone bold it down over a basin of very bot water lu such a -way that the steam must find its way out througli the velvet, while it ia brusbed gently ln the same direction that the uap lies. Con- tinue the brushing until the uap stands evenly over the whole surface. Cut glass shouid bcecarefully treated when leaued. t should be washed in warm water te wbich bave been added a few dreps 'cf ammen in. Having'tlhorouglily rinsed it, brush each piece separately with a soft brush dipp'4 lu whitiug. Wbeu the white powder is washed off polish the glass, whieh sbould drain for a minute or two, with tissue paper, which gives it a splendid glosa. m MRW. ww m dolugh me thlis ing it ail of spoon for a srk in Larter )Ur to 1e are lifted from Id be have Spre- ýading 'and gas A entle ours, idling avés ixinig, We get this flavor by dis- -for brains and nerves and carding Af oats' save the bodies. It means -an energy rich est, plumpest- grains. food-a vim-producer-with W-e discard so much that a which no other grain com- bushel of choice oats gives pares. only ten pounds of Quaker. And it means, in addition,.- These picked-out grains- delicious breakfasts and sizp. just the cream of* the -oats- pers at a. cost of one-haif are put through a process cent per dish. which keeps the flavor 'in- .,Don't miss this in -your--. tact. home., You11 neyer know The resuit is these, big, another cereal dish Which white, luscious flakes, with does so much or whichý their matchless taste and tastes so good. aroma. We have done this for 25 years, and now millions and millions know it. And those millions of oat loyvers now' consume a billion dishes yearly. No other brand lias ever done so much to win chli- dren to oatmeal. And that means to those children the utmost in food, Regul11ar IUM paokage,9.40c. FamIly B package, for amafler cities and country trade, 25c. Exopt in extreme West. The.Quîaker oss QpaW (5m6 Sole Makea' _____ L.9k i\u0026P ti Quaker irademark on3 veippackao. lises SOmewhere iEvermy oint of the Dy to \"~~et Br.eakfassofiaU rTOW Mark how these oatu, with their woo.dromza flMvrp have won the children of nearly every ra:ce. WIibrelqt boys and gils- arte brought Up on -oatmeal, thefaoteO_ food is Quaker. In the British Xles-the very homne.of S4totçh«otit -Quaker is thie leading brand* In far-distant'coUtiggei where Quaker is costly, those who want the f'11W t Ost -send to us to get themn. All because of this luscious flavor. And that flavor is'yours, *at no extra pric, In. \u003eany grocery- store. just say Quaker Oats and youMf get it. don. enig caes othr LIen 1 and k the re or wilI an- not .tory iount each rable time that 1 I- eter- four ýhod wing ida out tnces pre- ther', in a one tee ýour- mix nths Mix, rise ,hich. The ient, the, to Cacoma Beach, St. Lawerence River. I , y-y»m",
         "Thei. WatpA Home..làonthl À \"yo f-he Ub.Lnks, by IL Gertrud'aMn1il p ~ ~ ~ ~ ~~a= a~rga. On ~xueme, air,\" mi1Misal\"-hrcl8ty, W~ B\u003e~ds~ lamlduu- b«z\u003eI~gly «but I am àfraid yen are ~*êmeth sùd vith ab. «Ahr -lly»ai te lboip rit, lifting veaJul omet bsMa«P.,\"M* I ak nwbat way 1\" end pmgdte tred4 -la lot-(1M better p ut It mlldl, the UiNg *wh a ~tilu4 of mind ai11 mentaily) -but tla net.\" b'ai\u0026WNed t1 . Ihe sshbéï; «J.assure yen I tiençlih nohhing of £~D~ oweetlÉkOYflgi8tbe kend. -I1wasu mrevyreplacig It It~g.among-\" mho replied. ~oraglevd Iatireail 'IReplacing1 Weil, may -I auk yen net ~w~WOE. \u003c~i~'\u003c'te \"replace' It The. fact lu I oniy laid it O la~ne1~~'dowa there whlle 1 looked for my bail, mannr, uad sp~anil ~and as the. brasaieilua new one, f should y.un 5112118 8111 un- like-\" rShe stretelied forth ber band w quamuThe, man iooked eeniphtely non- I àr11 @ 1I, pluused, but replied: \"It in yen who are mIe car a at amon9e m iltaken, I fancy. Why, 1- oily this wus bet in te undergrowth moment dropped Il wbule I L ied my e. hn.ated ber le impromptu 1 stI tay hon. 1M,1mldnightf\"sh ~urmurd, \"Iat bailla -golng 10 be. ~u\u0026A brand new- eue saU'It ose -eln Ibis waye goSefwerin 'a e 1.ued and mnabout liv. miutes g ýyL: ed, somewbah disboveled, but urnbanh - \"~ow, wbere did 1 put my braiie !\", îsbe stood for a moment. \"Oh, Yia le db\"my, ah. stopped abèrt. qhee, li. the act of picking' up ber ~8ie, was a -all young man, net enly $ekngIL pbut atowing it away, in bis 7fe a Ma Barlay besitated ne -longer. ),nli was oeeoef ler many accom- C.$mbent: -aud'she put I1h mb prachice 'l'h man,,althongli aware ef ber ap- ,#ioacb, *ai dllberately sunnerlng on; \"Stop! \" ah er$ed, authoritatively. -.fe beyed, - ooking a trifle amused, *ut in âoê way abaahod. Iltandifflouit te look dignified whe-n Me pulls up aftor a fifteen ýarda daah .Miss Barclay endeavored te make lier laue~ sarcastie; * the situation was be- comingtee absurd, and suie added some- wliat excitedly: \"When 1 tel YOU I leant it agai t~hiat identical atone, net ten minutes ago-how can ye- y Desperately', \"I arn serry 10o appear rude, but there i. e- ,\"No, 1 know tiiere is ne name. Yen- needa't tell me that- She would net permit him te finish his sentence. \"I knew tien. is ne name, for Tlioxp- son cnly finiahed it yesterday, anid the leather as yen sec is new; everythîng about il is new; the sliaft net scratclied. And, oh dear, wliat is the good of argu- ing I arn sure ypu ony reat te Ikeep it tili yen found the owne, and as yen bave feund ber-\" There were ne signa of witlidrawing it frornthe .bag. \"I insist upon having it at once.\" Till now lie had been aniling, but lie \"CUpen my Word,\" lie aaid, \"'it la the fi-at time I have been held up for petty thef t, but if yen insist. Well, I can't veriy well figlit a lady-\"-? There was Tuma.Tum Range, B.C \"The Columbia Store\" PO'I\\ç% : mit. .., ~.' 't -¶ t .,-i~-# s, ý 1 ,a slight pemphasli. «SO YOU had bettet, take, it. only 1 should, bave liked to b. allowed to expiain.'\" «Expiain1!\" said Miss arâIy, whe had comnpietely lost- bler eemper. -j bardly ses what there lu to explain' Solenunly he\u003eIook out the -brassio, solehIy. eo Peuentcd it; then, with \u0026 grave bow, ne- took Up bis bnaand, walked off. «Weil,\" said Miss Barclay, as ashe slowly foilowed in bie wake, \"I suppose if one la caught red-banded It ha better to add dignity te iiPudOlIO But lie realIy iooked rather née.. - Without another look at tMlIe ae of lier trouble, she stowed ber %as-I li er bag, and ber sister cafli g for ber lust then, she drove home up hoî ad \u0026t out catching sight of tihe Wouid-be-ilub- anatcher. Re, however,.waa enrveying ber from a dressing-room window. \"0of ail cool bands!\" said b.. \u003c'eally, a'woman wil accuse. one of anything. -But -wben *he--fls -out - -th\u0026t--will lis sufficient recompense for me.» The very - -next afternoon, as l Grace Barclay wau on 'the.gallery, lier cousin, George 0 arruthers, joied lier. She had net seen him for some time, and they had'much te talk about. But, as lie was leaving ber te, get hi. clubs, ho recoileoted something. 1 \"Oh, Grace! There la u ncba fice chap. I want to introduce to yen. Ris namne is Sicyden, and ho doeu net know many people. May I get bim?» 'VOf coursui, George. Ilieh a goed player?»t\" \"Ripping! 1 ahan't lbea minute In a moment lie came out ef the men'u club-room followed by -the. club- snatcher. «I might 'bave known,\"gran d Miss (;race, and, ah. scanned t he istant scene. But from the. borner of bier oye ah. saw Carruthers and bis frlendstop short, then abruptly tbe ciubenatcher turned on is bec! and returned toeho buae. Crru thers, looking sligltly perturbed, rejoined lier. He was a man rallier givea te be sympathetie. \"Ah!\" said he, with much originality. \"Ah, Grae! IMiss Graco gave no assistance \"Care for a round with- met\" She leoked ah him. \"'Se lie was net 'pieasod te meet' me. Was that 1h, Georget\" \"0f course not MRe bad forgotten an engagement, or rallier some fellow called-»- \"Oh, George, dearn Ananias la -net the noIe for -you. 1 think 1 nnderstand why he wouldn't.\"' \"MHe said yn woud, yen knw-that it would be mutually unpleasantf' Mr. Carruthers said quickly. Grace Barclay, in spite of lier displeas- tire, laughed. \"Did lie say that? Weli, I agree whà, him. But yon need net ask afly ques- tions, for 1 don't want te prejudice j011, and she walked into the bouse. \"To think it should be the Mr. Sley. den ail the girls have been talking \u0026bout. But I amn glad lie had the grace te feel asliamed.\" It so happened that for neariy a week varieus pleasures and duties previented MNiss Barclay from even looking at ber golf clubs. And îvhen at last the free day came, she walked up te the dressing-room with an eager step and tlirew epen lier Inéeer. \"I won't take tlie bag.' sbe said to Mliss Hanbury, wlio ias waiting. \"Jluat, two clubs will do. Isn't this ncw brassie a good cne?\" She handed it ont for inspection. \"Yes, very nice. But 1 think the leather is put on rather raggedly.\"l \"'Oh, do You? No*, I aiways thiiik Thompson se, part icular about tijat- wvhich reminds ine-I wanhte write mIy initiais on the end.\" She took out a peneil. \"£Tey are on, Grace,\"1 said Miss Han- bury. \"N'o, d6ar. 1 only wish tliey had been,\" C r ace replied. MNiss Hanbury, o«r the point of con- tradicting, turned te, the light. \"WViîat doea 'J. B. S.' stand for?\" she asked. (irace Bai-lay gave a siniek. If sho liad a fault, it îvas that' shè was a littie 11i ; - v. j.B. S' 1I d3nt ,belie'o it. Let nie",
         "WInuipeg,'Mardi, 1914. The Western Home IWonthIy elhe saw. .\u0026And the cler flooded lier rSleydenl So I have stolen his *i.What aHal I do! Oh, Gertruide, aba ha I do? Wbat Must lie have 4bjiught Of Meil,\" ignorant of the facts, Miess lanbuîry ~ofd it dfi iiI tot reply. But w lien site bldheard the story 'and\" had ceascd to -ug-«Mell,\" eaid she, \"the man miust , le remarkahly 'stupid to let you calmly * beix\u003e yourself th his property.\"i ' \"lIy dear girl, lie tried to explain. .1 wouldn't let hlmt. You know iiy un for- tumately decided and dictatorial mai ner. Now I shahl have to, apolIogize.\" \"Oh, simply write a littie explanation on a card and leave it with Conlan to give him, with the club.\" \"iciwen't w rite a note.\" -No, ot course net.\" And after some con imtation the fol- lowing was written:,\"«Miss Barclay re- gts that owing to a migtake, «-Mr. Ke den's club lias beeii in lier posses- sion for the past week. She hopes tha t ber detentien of it bas caused no incon- venience.' \"I think,\" said the writer, \"tliat is very neatly put. It does net make me apologize at aIl. Much better neyer te own yourself in the wrong. You sec, I don't say I made the mistake.'P pose? As long as she had to acknowl- dý.ge lier mitake, she might as well have given me mv owiu again. Gad! theugh, she «à stanning looking.\" Now it was just at this time that the President of the Ladies' Golf Club had presented two prizes, to be played for ln mixed foursomes, the wiiuiers playiflg off until the final pair. won. And the prize ini each casé- consistcd 'of a set cf four clubs of the best make. -il who wished to enter had been giving in their scores of the past week. Quite a number of people appeared at the links on the appointed nîorning. They flocked, on the gallery, tlîey strolîed on the green, and they chat- ted outside. the window, where thei coininittee. was settling matters whichi should have been settled Pefore. Miss Barclay and Gertrude Hanbury sat in a hammock, teasing George Car- ruthers, who could stand it well encdugli when the latter young lady was bis cousin 's assistant in persecution. Grace was criticising lis -costume, from bis tie td the way bie lacid bis boots, yet lic only smiled. 'Tire away,\" said hie. -T'Aat is thec worst of feîîing witlî a %%oiian. She can always be rude with inipunity, be- cause a man isn't pr'ivileged- to figÈttlber. on equal terms.\" O)n the. way te Pyramid Lake, Alta. \"1%t lie knows you did.\" «My dear boy, it. le for your good. \"Oh, tlîat doe net matterl Now, the and Gertrude would say more, enly ehe question is, where is my ewn club\" lias net made a study of your bad points So the disputed brassie was left 'with as I have. My dear! 1 hope we wilI Colan, the steward, and the girls wcnt play together.\" ont to look for the law ful property of a \"My dearést! I hope we won't. too-confidcnt lady. Don't be stupid, George; I didn't But neither high nor low could it be îiean von. But it would be jolly if \"\"c found. three started togetlier witlî some other It was after six before their rounîd iice, or rather nicer, man!\" n'as over, and as they walkcd from the Carruthers jumped up. -' lil go and last liole, Miss Barclay's quick eve de- sec wlîat they are at, those hovcring tected Mr. Sîcyden driving, at tl;e first (oniiiittee peop)le.\" tee. Ini a moment hie came bac]; radiant. \"How slf-satisfied lie is feeling flow '1You and 1, Miss Hanbury, are to play said site, and looked the other way. together. Hope you don% mind.\" As site rested in a linge rocking-chair, MisHnry lok eedh fse ont came Conlati, the steward, suave and MisHnuysokebederf h sîniling. Hec carried a club. did. \"t is to bc returncd to- you, 'Ms \"Where arn I put, George?\" asked Barclay. Thegetma gave it to mie; Miss Barclav. anid he said ashw is lewssry CarrutIiers laughcd, restrainedly. but the club did net belong to him. So 4'O, vou are iii our foursomne, too. 1 lie returns it, if yotu please.\" amn afraidyownt be pleased, Gracie, \"But I don't pîcase, Colan. 0f but-,%%(ll. confound it, t1h'y have stuck course it is his.\" you down %vithî Sleyden ý-fl notlîing I \"Well, Miss, those wcre his idlentical could do wouild chanige Words. But if I inay maIke so bold, I I iid voi try liardT\" hearcl Mr. Sicyden reîîîarkiiig to a gen- I\"'0f course. Yoii know rny persuasive tiiaiî as tiiose were not lts initiais- arts. But 1 say, Grmce, keep cool. He 'J. Bt.,' you sec. Anmd -MIl. -lyden's is a very theeit chap. And there is laille is Ciarles. begging lus pardoi.\" .titis! If volit.dou't get him, you'Il play \"Very wcll, Conlami. Leave it in the îith MontyRyild. g'nitleiiien's rooms sorneNvlitre. I have Nov' Monty ReYnolds ivas lier pet flotliing further to do with it.\" ivQiJfl.z. Conlan withdrew, nîncl intercsted and Miss Barclay's expression was tragie. iliivstified. So iin trutlî was Miss Bar- ~1t eau îîîy sîns have been. to (le- day.S(rve stick punishineiit T However, \"r don't believe his naine is Charles,\" silem t Oitit easily expt\u0026esscil; and saýil titis iiitresting young person. \"Ile I sîjiil adopt that crusliing mode.\" z oll\\ refuses to take it, to miake inue*i but don't îîecessitate your own lved uncomfortable.\" pwlîmîmiuut. It will b li arder for you Anid out on the green Sicyden %'as tula il for us.\" (1lsiilg thec shîep from about ]lis hole, \"No it'-,N-ont. For whcn 1 don't talk sayimg, as lic did so, to Sherbîîrne, iuv play is .'tiîerb. lieceati couverise with 'Wîtojeet bas that gir~ in seîidiiig 1 oim aiîd (,ertruîd smml slelks ine somebody's else's club, o you sup- j 1shall not open in'y 1 à! w. ROYÂL q HOUSINS FIA WR bettelt to be rassie, ith a R and, appose better lut lie ihBe et In ber r lust from leally, itbing. dit ho 1 lier. e, and pet I e chap name Lgood en club- 1.39s scene. re she short, turned bouse. urbed, gvea mality. t' me. en an felle w et the ai %why -tlîat 'y Mr. ;pleas- ques- \u0026bouît o feel week' rented il her came, i with Inl'er. ld te diJuat rassie eather tlink te mIy Han- been,\" E con- ?T\" she If she ,littie .et nie w~. ~: ~ ..- p .~ ~(, J -I NEVER ÂII mûis SUPIOR Makes~a Iar45liht' Ioaf.wf crisp cruet, wholesome body-,-and. fine f 1I\u0026vor twc OGIILVIE FILOUR MIU8ý Co.LD MEDICINF HAT.r, WIt4NIPEGO, FTWIILLAM, M Nf~~. f 4. -,,-~",
         "ibTh BstPiano Values IN CANADA SAT The Rouase of McLean Ayorne in tending to pgurchase a iao . hould write The .oue f ceLem for ful information regarding plua. nd iano prices. Tllhe buse of McL-ean bas for many ynrs enjOed the reputation of giving tek customers better values than are obtaluable eiaewhere and this reputa- tion will b. fully endorsed 'by a comparison of prices. Pi\"« km o$W6to $15W. Tt il -a fact that we sel pianos as 10w as $235, and we also vrillingly back their worth with thé guarantee of the Boum. of lcLean. Write to-day for fuli information. J . JB. CMcLa\u0026 Co., Lt. The Home of the Victrola Winnipeg's Greatest Music House. ..W. Ke1Iy, J. Redmond, W. J. Ross, Sole owners. Department .W,. Om 0w. rl Am .adi Urgrave SI. Don't You Forget Us 41ÇD WB AMD EEDT VITEOUR 0, EROL f«Wm el. For !90-4 hetarn $ 0. ivuaeidu1. We m- uow jO.0w ssabstd r=e met old Pnice.. .e ask '~?iÀathButtw etpa ix.S re. TIE 'USI3UWMLESALE SPECIALT CO. M TALUOT AVENUEWINfNIPEG Ortiew mi Rda.iSeao. 306 14ob.e Dam Ave. (2 minuteef rom Eaton'a) The Elite Beéauty Parlours P07 Enderton Block, Winnipeg H- AVE extended 5their H a ir GGods Depart- ment and have en- gaged as manager tate of the T. Eston Co. and Manitoba H a i r Goods Co. Mil Orders a Speclalit y Mr. Kitchen has made a specialty of - [sape.: and Wip s an;d customiers en- trusting us with any kind of liair work can be sure of tainigl evcry satisfaction. Ladies and Gntlemen wanting Wigs, Trans- formations, Toupees, etc., please write for best prices. AIl goods gtuarauoteed. 3elf-measurement instructions and al D)articulars ftirnislicd fier. Write at PmhsfulKnottedSwollen Veine, Mfl1 j..w.Mamnmis. ld Soros, Ulceru 1 f]W\u0026g.sootblng, strengtbenlng and In. vgosatins - allais i nlammattoit *promptiy. le c ed atseic UIL ILa . .Reinler, R.D. No 1, F eral £4Eaubd elreivina iliat finaily broke eausng onsderble loss of blood. ABOBN JR. and reportesi roi ., in. elu ntircly he led . swelflng and discolorat ion gone anai Sbs otrouble with thein since juiy îsoe SOBN.JR lis invaluable as a general bouse- Dsrlne,i orteute and brtîtses thatthe chl- n co. roup. deep-scnted colds, stiff-neek sore- ro~,Rmovs atty bunches. goitre, enlarged1 mIala,*èu, sy-tMwepn ln,,Rv., -it. si.nand 1.Lo-0Verotleatdruutordlvered. Iloot 3Uor, . ;.YOUG, .D.P, 18 Lman\u0026 BlmAc -Montreal, Canada. The,Western Home 11font hly' \"Good morning, Oarritbers,\" said a tents, she had met lier match. Ail lie voice at hier eibow. 1,1 believe l'ni in said was uttered in a grave. digziified your foursome. Joliy, isn't it 7\" manner, so that it lef t 1nosi .spicion of Carruthers agreed, and fortbwith ini- impertinence\" or trespnssiug ti:ioi stiiel troduced him. Miss 'Barclay bowed- recent acquaintance. after a nianner, at ail events. Grace Barclay was d.Àspiritedl and sub- Sleydjen seènîed quite unaware tîjal lie dlue\u0026 But, though she kneiv it ajot, it twa,- received only on sufferance. ivas of no small benefit to lier to bc thus *We are to play second, 1 think,\" lie -oist with- her own petart.- Sle re- first foursome is just setting ont. BY iieved when lier small brother called for George! that girl drives well.\" lier ini the pony-cart. \"Slie's not supposed to be su ver-e' Though iunu way eieoturaged to do began -Miss Barclay. Then she cougiied so,, MNr. Sleyden stood bareiieaded iii the îîîost opportunel..ler cousin choked blazilig sunsbine, tuckiiig ini the linen boot-for, as it ivas 8ecurely knotted. \"'After al. 1 coiifess I aRn a littie dis- that must have been bis purpose. appointed at beiîîg knoeked ont of it ai- This particular foursome was well iogether,\" lie said. watched. Miss Ilanbury ivas slightly Miss Barclay unsuccessfiilly tried to weaker than Miss Barclay, and Sleyden look stipercilious. 11 almost iînperceptibly behind Carrutliers. \"Wiiat! Stili kecut about eluibs?\" slie Though hie drove farther, lus approach said. 1 was often poor and liere lie fell behind. \"No! But îiow aîîy furtiier chancee of But bis putting was irreproacliable. It playing with you is at an eiid,\" bie r- ivas dlean and sure, like al l hs nove- joined. unents, fuil of decision. \"That 1 ehould think would be to your Wlien three onît of four do a fair advantage, considering hou- littie we amount of talkiîîg, the fourtb voice is 'worked togetlier for good' tlîis niorn- not indispensable. 'Miss Barclay was ing.\" quite discomfited to find ber silence was \"Do y'ou-are voit ever in nieed of a- uniîeeded. soniebody to play witli?\" A very sînali amount of advice was \".Neyer!\" briglitly. \"Miss llanbury is proffered by Sieyden to his partner. always ready.\" Evidently ho preferred to take tlîe The pony sprang forward, Sîcyden chances of independent play. But lie stepped back. rame behind ber once as sue was select- \"UnIless I am niîuch mistaken,\" ing a club. soliloquized Sleyden, \"after this morning \"If 1 may suggest,\" bie said, \"you Carruthers wili expeet that agreeable %vould do well to use a brassie.\" young lady to bie ready for him. And Miss Barclay's glance should bave now, if that brassie really w'as tlîe saute mîade him quail. she relieved me of, wbere on earth did \"I have not got one,\" she vouchsafed. I get it T\" Then added: \"Perlîaps you will lend lue He went in to have soîîîe refresimrent uyours' after his exercîse.1 'Uîîfortunately, 'Miss Barclay, iiii me A stout, ruddy young nman was also lias been mislaid.\"' enjoying something long and cool. There was some stress upon the word. \"Hfullo, Jim! Your arrn aIl riglbt \"Lndecd! I can't easily understand again? You should hiave played this that, for I alxvays tlîink one's clubs seem nîorning.\" to possess an individuaiity. Onte can It was Carruthiers whîo iailed him. always tell oiie's own.\" \"Let nie introduce Sinclair, Sleyden.\" \"Von surprise me. J should not have The young man extended bis left haiîd. thouglit that was your experience.\" \"Sprained my wrîst badly. Havent \"'No?7\"i played for two' weeks. No: it isn't \"No. It is îîot mine. So I always try \u003cuite well yet.\" tii have my naine clearly writteu on the Sleyden vore a preoccupied expres- slîaft.\" sion. \"Tbougli evei t tat is apparently not 4'l say,\" said lie, \"is it possible vour of incli service. Your initiaIs appar- iniitiais are J. B. S.? eîîtly vary.\" . Sinclair laugbed. \u003c'They are. Have Slevtien raised lis eYebrows. von got soîne of my wash.ing instead of \"Thiat sotinds inysterious. M'liat makes vouar own 7\" yott say so 7\" No. But liave vonit nissed a cluib?\" \"Wý7liy shoui I explain wlbat vou ai- \"A brassie? Yes, I have, have vou? ready knoxv, that that club is yours and For wlien I pulied out ny tIàings just nmo' one else-s?7\" . , now a wretched old brassie fell out, and \"Miss Barclay, mny namne is Carles- mine was a jolly new oie.\" 1 didn't namne myself, s0 I won't apolo- Sleyden smiled., gize..\" \"Then I hiave stolen votirs. Buit hîox \"Tlieuii, '.\\r. Slevdeii, whuy do yon put the excliange took place I1 don't know.\" -.1. B. S.' on1 vouri clubs? Is it a nom de He toflthe storyx-even t o bis being guerre? A goifing sobriquet?7\" \"beld uip\" by Carriithers' couî-sin. \"May I ask why do you insist on nmv \"I cati explainif ,\" s id Siuclair. 4'1 receiviuîg toleni-er-othjer peoples pro- 1 uvas in a inischiief of a hîirry the lagt jerty? Willimigly would I take back îîîy dayl1 played; grabbied, tup sone clubs own, but urîtil then--\" i ronitlie table, and clîucked tlieni away \"Until then, please dou't speak to nie in my locker. You caine after anîd took agaîn.\" wbat 1 left. Not plaving for aIl this \"Nteve.î to atdvise? It serîis a pity tume I neyer discovered n iii uitake.\"1 Io lose the îîîatcl hixlen it itcans -a '\"But xvbat about niy cousin? Slîie pi-iz.\" xould not have insisted oi appropriating Thiis stopped thie altercation. but they yours, uîîiess she lbadI o 1oeheref~ did ]ose tIhe lole -for- thîeplaviîîg ofstaineCarrutliers. neitlier ivas ni) to tlie mark. Before tic \"0f course, slie îIiisfook thîe plate rotind was tnislicd, Miss Barclay- be- wliere shue bail leff il. Probably by this, \u003caiie reckl-ss-she drove regardless of tiîneif lias tulricd iî.- thie dire4tion. In short, lier teînper \"No; for slIe toM mie tilis Io,.lliig seenie\u003cl as curatic as lier ganie. Final that it lîad disappeared.\"l sîsa liad a thîrce-incli putt anîd nissed ,FI.olli fir-st to la.,t if lias lut-en a iis lier liole. taniged-up affa iî,\" said slevden. \"Ami.jd SîcYdlen thircw liminself on tlîe grass uY tise wav. ask Coiilai foi\" your chli, comnplaceîitlv Sinclair, or à~ wili be losiiig it *l gam: \"J love to sec aîîyoîîe so siiigularly lie stood leaiig agailasýt thse door for a% devoîd of love of gai\" lie said. \"Now. vhile, xrapt ini tîouglif. T istf îîdeilx- soîne peopile are s0 keen about pot-lîunt- l'e weut over tO awrii-a eansd iii- fhiat it aîînovs mie. W'hy botlier to pulled ont sorne paper. wx s ex-ci clubfs, whleii von raitbuiy theni \"Noxu-,\" saîd lie. bunt to Iliil f, 11 \"On.p fi-e cotlstrari oheruv , \"apologize. Exactîx- v Wat fo\u003er 1Idî011.t ''Oi hecitiar. I was nmost a.îxious kuiow, for Cartisîirs. iiof r ýÇ. Ws ]lot to xii.\" sue retorted. \"Notlîing I like stîcli an aas as Io tell lier 1 w tutilot 1)( better tîsan Jirizes. If is provokiîîg I amrn itrodtceuî. But girls alwaNslk pi- oh'C lyo .tiauvl.'oi ý.11 Pr ogies : aid, for' that ina 1ttel-r. sie liad a s \"Ca *otuac-ola fi- t I ? er iuu.h deaim to thue (.111h)a,;1 ladi. 1 ,u, hiaps if yon l âd riraxu-n anotlier l)artnèr. bgn îgt e îst liaIXein for oný, for'inistanice, %von couildlbax-e talked bfIni brîssiee qjtýi, o I o mnore freelhi-- \" tat roîiil led .nlî la i Miss Barclav u\\vas at a loss hiou-wt o eoiisjdered st~atîy treat this mai). Ti soîîîe astonislîing xvii* v she sereîIotl ave lost lier iaîentity-. Deai- Miss Bar(-lav-: As -a ride. if t a- t -ho ihia-tato or Pr 1-11 ap ý T '111 1; -1,- - . - miade ,harp ale Iî- jBt. toiiaIl il,-i . l-w Ilbe ilm 1 c-; , . .I!P- I II Winnmpeg, 'Narch, 1914. Write to The Cudahy Packing Co., Toronto, Canada, for our eooklet \"Hints to House- %vive s.\"1 '-$~ I ~E) t f I ~1",
         "Winnipeg, Mardi, 1914. The Western Home IWonthIy- ow\" particular brass',lia, wrtillî~ What is nmore, 1. lîave discevOl das Weill Cbe riglitflil owner, of thie ,ciîe volu so khmdly returîîed to ne, and vîîîii îi nîjýii 1 bail been iîîlawfully using. as you eîî11 deavoreti to pîove. Tlht'reforv. %whîeîî v%.0, clainfle. it, your riglit to it %v'.a-, isgreati r uniderstafld oil'N'e lot Net f(0110(1 \u003eour club. if I eould be of 'aîî assist- ance il, tracing t'le tdeserter 1 slîoul be only oohp -y I~a a'to-fliorrowv afterîiooîî aid, talk over the situîationifroînanl amîateuîr i detective's poinît of view? Believe me,1 Vouirs saîîerelv., Charle M. Slcvîleîî. Not even Miss lianîbîîrv îvasiniade cognizanit of alîy of theîo letiI- colleerll- ing tlîat nîote, it s irvept oli or t he rojly it evoked. 'iet everyoll e, iflelidfiîig tlîat yolung ladly. were apîîîaîsed of its re.ults withOlit exervising their powers of ob- servanice to aîiy large exteut. if golf was neglected by atîv meinhers of thiat well-organized lîîb, '.\\Ir. Slevden aid 3Miss Barelay were iiot aînong the Iiimnhier. Anîd the iliseovery that they played golf w~ell, togetlîer, ledtl t the firthier diseovery tîat they rodle andi drove better ini each otlier*s compaiiy. Iii truth anything, even an afternooîî tea, partiripated in by hoth,. imetmoiately turned out suereossfîîl. Thîoîglî, a, t1îey often took paitis to poitrimiot to eaeh othler, sentiment aîîl romnalîe wcre un- known to their practical îninds. M le\u003c.ilis.\u003e I! m nake hlm igive it 11). I lobi vour tonglie. yoil ittle tlîief y;oll, 01-rlIl givi' *'oîloîî îîl îo sajul the stern *Ihoîîpm»I, tiglîtel ling lis \" hgo easv, ihloilpsoîn, ere. Bati.ste. or wlîatîver vai ea votîrseif, take a dollar anîd eut. \\Vil] Ilat satisfy vo \"said ýSeydeu, waviîîg ai tleait bill tenîptingly. The smiall black eves ghained. There wsa. ioieîtarv liesitatioi. TVien oneC grily list cloie(l over tie eoveted miney, thîe club feul froîîî tle other, and t wo baro legs math short w'ork of the listaîîlee betwveen blis Cilptor anîd the road homev. Thle imstructrir, tuîo. disgîîsted at such ieîîiency for furtlîer parley, strolled away. 'Ilire was sileîîee. Tlîeîi (aie, in lier u-.îîal iînpetilofls fasion, seizmd tho brassie anid swîuhg it about beor lîcaî. Huri said she. \"the mystery is cleared!\" Simultaneously Sleyden uttered an expletive too spoutaneous to be studied. Tlîou, apologetically. \"IBy jove, that wvas îuy eye you trieri to drive-out!*' The othier eve as pouring with sYm- patlîetic tears, andtIhte olle stnîick drooped motîrnfîîlly froîn the force of the blow cauglit jîîst by the eyebrow. Apologies ocvre îîot belîindhand. To- getlîeî tley dlescenedt to the strearn, îîow low in its bed, to bathe the injured ineinher. I'Sdin the golden grain in Alberta. 11lt tlirongh it ail, and In spite of A smal eambrie 'hRndkercrbipf -stpeeod l'tile eleavors, the hereabouts of in ii nqîîest iomably uîfilteîeti water. anid 1 'ýî rtIlay's Iong-inissing club had reinaiîied a1îjied frleiietlyv, evidently possessed .1 llytelN *il ti ilite ly s lîing properties. Wliere thîe ()lîe afternoon t1îey were seated somie- blow bail faillen thîcre was alreadv ait what precariously on the huge roller aîîgry lumjîil. but the eve was unsvatlil. tlîat rested from its labors up by tîe '*Oh, dear! 1 arn so rehlieveil,\" said stîeami, hen Thomnpson. tlhe instructor, Crace. \"You cain open it, caîl't OU\" broke ini upon a conversation tlîat It was closed iustantlv. threatened te become personal. By thte -No. At least not very well. It urts!\" collar lie gripped a rnuch dishevellel \"Fui so sorrY.\"' yoîîth, whose face bore traces of rocent '11i iot.'Y No C\\1thtnation was in- tear-s-tears %viped with a dusty hand. vited. -Excuse mie, Miss Barclay',\" said lie, Sîyden sat dowvîîont te stone beside \"biît von kiov tlat brassie I inade for lier. No i i six îveeks ago. \\VelI. I founi tlis i)id voit eer livar ait aneient law re- lîcre litle xvariiin praetrsîng îî'îtl it gaîdiîig .the 1îtt iîg ouît of a man's itt îîow evItlîii4t'niy shed. lie w~as play- eeT iîllleoinnonlîvl, anîd T steppeil.onit \"o\"with docision. 'i amn sure t. watchî. Says 1, 'Wlîcre did voit got tiiere isîi't onle.\" t iat ehîb' ays lie, Mr. Sedngive IL -Tlieîî iwill tell voit about it.i' Savs 1 Nvl oit'fr1i% 01 laedit hn e di, omie. Tlîii 1 exa îîî îîd it doser, and Notli nlg! I 'arr it îvas thîe onie Iinade for .;hs Are 'ou o illintg. titeut. tr letthie lau laea.Thîe slîaft lIaviîîg a peuiar. take it-; course uitiiott tivî'yiîîr to de4- 11trk u on01 1e side, I. remernbered it. The fendvrl'IfT For 1 assuîre voit 1 shlal *\\1in rtîiîgcal says. sweaî'iig lîke the- take ait artion y t \\e-iise ne. Islie fo!ii îîd t up lu the -01i, hîY are voi tîchti a. goose ! As H rit] nea r thle *see\u003cCoi ho le i' 1 if i t iee d ail;1\\%to iak.eiie Aîîd 50s lie did. 1expci'sald MIr We I at T\" Srla .v-, \"tliat is Nwliere 1i hft it.\"'I i fvoit dont kîow, fthen nvJý1ier (do taîhu \" Slevleîi ook lier liands p1risoner. Non know 1 d id ! But, lonpoî, ae'lîe Sa id. \"if Yiin11 rita rr.v me, dit h),t go lts collar Dtd von realhy i nil1*11 e odeavor to farget thiat «u voilt l to hi-rn lt te lie is ofll1 lp 9i11 liad wvit ite ivît r d~.irtv. rutI.v. huaké it goori. anîit lieho oked de- hIlçtw uctivei il \\Ott ýe11 it for.' \\îldIliuîitghî utinehi of thu' 'tOry be- ta uit l\u003e1 e îtirlty, tl,,,,e are people %010 st il ondrter xfv Sle -ydeîi kceeps a brýabsie always lying on lin, ýLudy-table. The question ls: not \"How littie can I psyr for roofing?\", but \"How littie will it cost You mnay pay littie and get roofing that soon cracks, crumn- bles, and leairs; but it costs less in the end to use roofing of riatural asphaitg *hich stays waterproof. Genas co ba hm e ntura cilsof Trdffl asphait sealed luin t.They Genasco life and viçar to reats tain, wind, heat, cold,, aikalie, end acîda It stays weather-proof sud uvos Get Genasco and you set the satisfactory snswer to your roofing quonc. The 600.i Roof Guide Bock and samples are frec on roquest. Ask your dealer for G.ns.o-mtohC minerai surface; neyerai wights. Look for the trademark. TXIB KAIiT-LEAX KLES waterprooféscsaina without cernent and preventa nal-Iemksi. The Barber Aaphalt Paving Company Lara'est producers in the world of asphat sud ready roofing. D. H. Howden \u0026 Co.. Ltd. London, Ont. Canadian Asphat Ca.. Ltd. Winnieca. Ma. U.ew YorIk Chiomi Uan Francisco Lewis Brc... Ltd. Montreal. Ottawa. Toronto Byasà. Colemnan \u0026 Evans, Ltd. Victoria. B. Ç- MAKING HENS PAY is simply ,, matter of zmaking theml nd mk n hmlay la9 mostly nam1tter of keepin hmi h eaith and keil ptheir appetites. Internti .. 1 PoultryF o oi sii. treofhrbs roots and sices that, fed to themInersaluuttsupis theerned of their system, and wrsof~esadb .pec-al acýtion on the . pcufgras makes tbem lay. Rt is b ouAYgaanedtoicease tue production of eggs. 'e f eeding yoehesinternational Poulry lFood and you ;21l be su!,,se at what they will do for you. FOR SALE DY AIL DEALERS We have just got out a very coxnplete Poultry Guid\" it tells pretty nearly eyerything there is ta know -bout chickens. We would lke to send it to you if Yeu will write for it-absolutely f ree. INTERNATIONAL STICK FOUI Ce.. LIMITED Dept.z i Toronto - Canada 95 AND UPWARD' - SENT ON TRIAL AMERICAN 1$ SEPARATOR Tlousads laUse ýýt., sfe your investigating our wonderful ofler ta furnsh a b'b .w ectuadeasy rufr rang, cas.lMccard1,rfect kilfl e arator for onl'31.9. kims \u003en..qu ofilkamninute.warm orcid. Mae thick or thin crea. Different from thîspicture, which illustrates cur 1.w priced large capacity machines. The bowl is a anitarv inavel and embodies ail out latcst improvements. 0W Twenity-Ytar Guaratee Protects Yon Our wonderfully lom, prices and high quality on ail sizcs and gencrous ternis of trial will astonish you. whiether r , 1rv is larce or su,,al, do not £ail to Zet oir great oSfer. Our richly illustratediogIre fra rgeon rerquest. is themcnompieca. rrat and exPCnsive book on Cream Sçaatr s uni oncern in tihe rorld. Shipuients miade prouptly froin Winnipeg, Ms.., St. John, N. B., sud Toroato, Ont. Write today for our catalog anrd me r tymrsdlf whUa t bmoney savlng proffldton we wlU mni you Address. - AMERICAN SEPARATOR CO., Box lige -Banmbridge, N. Y~ v .' -.......... ronte, loust-",
         "The Wester'n Home Monthly Winnipeg, Febru\u0026iryi 1914. Thne Amibush ~I~I\u003eIflWftA War StqrY, by F. N. Friend. lm H fo fowilng lea. eory of -a cn- Y¶\u003e91,,hich '-was -proe.eeding frorn K- to H-, in the Orange Free State, auriàg'thie last Boer WaI,. you ei' net find te tale in any his- tory. oý that sa me. war. Bardecre's \u0026.oua-the pame is as good~as ny ther-of( whtch 1 was a cor\" sra, w re d ing the scouting duty for hs cnvoyand we were, où this ipomentMomonng, stretched out in half-sections at sorne two bundred yards interval, over an expanse of wintry veldt, about balf-w'ay on our journey. Immediately in our front, and flanking each side of the road along whic'h the convoy wag moving, lay two low, un- dulating kopjes, bet*~een which couid be secs, about flfteezx hundtred yards fur- ther S,~ another kopje, rather rocky, and covered with shoit scrub -or brush. It was a. \"trappy\" looking place, but 'the Intelligen-e partment. had re- po thbe country celear of Boers. for twnymiles, whieh uaes atiefying- that is, to ail but those whe haé learned by bitter experienre. A 'Western farmer in «Well 1 said te rny other haîf-sc- tion commander, Helford, as we began te pass the two Iow huIs, \"te continue our discussion. Yon are only just eut frein England, preaurnably, by your air of atubborn 'Briti9hness,' and don't know much of Jehnny floer-s funny littîe tricks as yet; consequently vou have bagsful te iearn.\" He smiled, feeb- ly. \"Now,\u003e' I went on, '11 give you a few hint. Wlen you sec a high, in- pregnabl-looking bil-apparently just the place for a good stand-you mav be 'fairîy sure that there ris notliing there, however much yen xnay expect it. The real danger lies in these innocent- looking, low kepjes like those which we are passtng. I shouldn't wonder if there were Boers on thein now, ani- I arn quite sure neose -bas troubled to go up' and sec.\" \"But they would lire on uns here\"' said Hoîford. \"Besides, the Intelligence 1)epartnient have reported 'ail clear'; so there is ne needte look.\" This wit.han air of finality. \"Oh, wise young juxdige!\" I answered. \"nid you never licar, in vour misspent voutbh, of scouts being afllwed te pass through, se as t\u003c 'surprise the convoy? And as fer your Intelligence Depart- ment, wha~t do you expect cuf ail insti- tution at whose head is a young suh- ;tltern, out here just five minutes, with a brand-ne-w commission, anà with ohi 1Rcillv, a drunken old Kirn'bcrley digge.. w-lie knows as muli about titis business as lie does of drinking water, as brains- carrier? Another tllîl- in. îven the Intel- l igence Departnîvut i roport.s 'al l ear,' look out for squaills?' Iolford was sileîît, blut stili bjîac and unconvincible. \"iNOW,\" I \u003cont iiliû\u003cl. \"l(itlook rotii4l too xnuch l I ci1[tell vo, tliti-. T',ru w cre Dutchinen on thise hils haif a1t iour ago, and they. are sure te 'be 'here StIL 1 saw a mani or two just sihow on -the sky-line, for s second-. That is what 1 weat over te tell Harda.ere, beg. ging hlm te let me go back and warn the convey. Al L could get frorn him wasa a sarcastie rernark about old wo- man tkà thst I was tol obey orders and t frighten the men, that he had it- on'the best aut.hority (mark you!) that there were ne Boers within twenty miles, andi that 1 wàs te go back te niy place and not talk moonahine.\" Helferd began to look a trifle im- pressed. \"*Helford,\" I said, \"I have a little plan of myj own, of 'wiceh I arn going to take the sole respousibility. Even if tbey hang me afterwards, I mean te try it now. Just you ride te the half-sections, rlght and left of us, and tell Tyndale, and one man of the otiter half-section, te, corne to me.\" Ife went off at a canter: we had nearly got through between thekopjes by now. ia happy environment.. Presently the men 1 had sent for carne up te me. \"Boys\u003e\" I said, \"thiese blamned Dutch- mýn have let us 'through se tixat they may surprise the convoy. It's ne good going back; we should ble stoppe\u0026. and capture\u0026. A shot or two niight, not ivarn the convoy; they mightn't notice it. Hardacre 'won't bel-ieve me, but wiIl you cerne with me and carry out a plan te' circurnvent, theni?\" \"My oath,\" s aid Tyndale, a tal1 Aus- tralian. \"It's against orders.,\" I continued, \"but I alone amn responsible. Well, tlien, you see that hillinii front? It commat.d tlîeroad. PRIlbet niy lîfe there is a gun, and, five or -six me~n planted tiiere- I hope ne more, but we must risk that. The Boers 'viii probably bie nearly ail on those other tvo hbis, ready te siweop enxt thte convoy. Yen, lTynd(ale,. must -take your half-sýectien rounid the righit of the kopje; Holford, 1, and this ether half-section will erne round, on the Ieft. WVe are going te take that gun, and turn it on their own littie trap. \"Mien yen get round the hili, keep y'eur eyes skinned for a siga of herses, probably hidden be-hind rocks or gerub. WVe xnust-seize the man in charge before hie can give the alarrn, so must go cau- tious1-. If successful, we ean tell frorn the nUrnber-6of herses how xnany mna are on the hili, and act açcordingly, but if tlîey have an escort, or any number al)ove 'six or seven, we shahl have te give it tup and try to get back to warfl thé yov~.See Y\" TheY iodded a:ssent. \"Be very carefuil,\" 1 concluded, \"tihi YOU 1loe thte nuan with the herses, and thoen rush lîjîiin, but ne noise.\" 41 hhsaii'slidf Tyndale, as lie tool îklii -- b iso oU'to the rigit Of v v",
         ".WFinnipeg, March, 1914. TheWestepn ,Home -Monthly McKENZI E'S SEEDS, Write for, Catalog Every Testimonial a. Prime Wlnner McKENZI E'S * iot'e it Fafrs We are prouc, justly so, of the great part «McKEMNZIE'S SDS- playiii tii sesa of TUa Gmet Canadian WeS4t he Propeity qf the many thoumad who annually'use McKENZIE'S SEEDS, the.Agricultural Fairs and-the Horticultuftl Exhibition\u0026 e o a.gtl The remarkable hîgh breeding of McKENZIE'4\u0026 SEEDS, particularly ii.ticeiWe in thlb. w00p8tkCoi Rtiofl,-,Spedlal. sudirat__Prime---- at---1U tural Fairs in the West, is evidenced in every variety, Ixidividualizes every aeed, differeniate their Primo Winning Character lstics, ail the resulta --oT yOM -e patient careful hybridizing to increase the quality, the yield and poduce seedsa peclay adapted ito the vared soi and clats cndtions of the* Candian Wnf.2 Speo»§lmi On@vm Seed ioWr YELLOW GLOBE DAN VERS SEED end LARGE RED WETIIERSFIELD lic Per Poundi SED Per Pound li As per aur offer on page 20 of otir 1014 seed catalog, which we will mail upon request, a post card will bring it. PRICES POSTPAID l~ ab. !, lb. 11lb. YELLOW GLOBE DANVERS ONION ..................$ 13 $.30 $8.55 .$.95 RED WETHERSFIELD ONION................... .10 .30 .55 .95 FitbUd Roo»«t Seue OZ. 13/jlb. 1 lb. 4 lbs. UcKENZIE'S NORTHWEST- ERN PURPLE TOP SWEDE .............. KAMMOTH PURPLE TOP SWEDE .............. McWýS. IMP. HALP ON WHITECARROT .........15 ZOOPER-8 INTERMEDIATE CARROT?..«......1 McKZNZIE'S GIANT .15 LOW, MANGEL..... MXcKENZIE'S P E ERLS MANGEL....... McKENZIB'S GIANT YL LOW GLOBE ........... .20 .30 1.10 .20 .75 .85 .35 .25, .30 $1.45 1.60 .50 .60 .45 $1.90 2.25 1.70 - q - IPrlze Wlnnlng Gardon smwe e here 'bat is e, beg. Warn Id wo- orders e had you!) menty to niy e in. e plan o take tbey try it etions, idale, ection, e had kopjes 8.20 1 .30 .20 2 2.75 3.75 .20 1 .20 .20 1 .20 1 .25 .50 00 A.~~~~o EIKBZEO.Ltd. BRAN DON mmN.. CALGARY 1 \"TA. 251b. Se M. 100 I BRANDON PRICER........... *3.75 *135 814.@ CALGARY PRICE ............4.00 .7.7S 15.0 BRANDON PRICE ..........8325 36.00 Si CALGARY PRICE........... 3.50 6.50 1m.0 BRANDON, PRkCE ...........4.00 87.50 CALGARY PRICE ............4.25 0L00 $14-00 15.,01 N@tenouown falý\u0026 BRANDON PuICE...... «....853.0 310.5083.0 CALGARY PRICE.......... 6.00 110 1.00 BRANDON PMCE ..........5.50-' 31000 CALGARY PRICE ............ 6.00. 11M(0 2.0 5wd~OOW 61= I i Beedm en towesternCanada We rept grad'ually eloser. WIe ppLwedý the flank of the hill and halted in a bunch of scrub; then worked quietly inwards towards the back of the bill, looking carefully about. There was no sign fron thle top. They ignored us. Suddenly I saw soie bushes wave violently, and then Tyndale rose up and came quietly towards me, on foot. \"Bagged 1dim ail rigflit,\"h. laid sof tly; \"bound and gagged Iiim.\" \"Good for you, old chap,\" 1 replied; diyou m-ere quieker than we.\" i.Saw a borse's head tlîroughi the scrulb and drew my own conclusions,\" he an- swered. \"How many horses 7\" \"0013' six besidies the gun horses; that mnakcs lve men on top.\" \"But how did they get the gun up witlî five men?\" I asked. \"Took it up with horses. There is a fairisli rond round on the other side.\" \"'Al,\" 1 said, \"and they were so short of men they hadi to send the horses down again to save wasting another inan to look after thema. Besides, they Wiight have shown on the sky.hine. AiyhioN,. I suppose thiey didn't think there Nvould be murih hurry in gettiîig away. 'o,\"I 1 ent 0o1 quickly, \"\"'e won't saniple the roadway; we '11 limb UP just liere. Be quiet and take cover as vou lim b, ini case any one is on the look-out. Tyndale. take these two meni fardIivo and\u003e keep to the left; RIl- fdand I1 ill take the riglt; -Sheltori nîust reniain liere *to look after our pris- oner and horses. l'ut vour knife into himi if he's troutiblesoutie, Shelton.. No\"'. TynéaIe, wben you reach the top, movie graduailv round as close as you cati get to thie men, taking shelter behiind the swrub. W'e'll each take the Weil nearest to our own sides, get as flear as poss.*ble, and then rush thîem. No firing, mind. l'Il wave my hiandkerchief ivhen to dash iii.\" We began to limb. Slip, elinu-b. creep, slip, ail the way up. We reached the top at last. 1 peeCpP(!ovt'r. Goc\u003ed. A twvlve-inch gun. seeininlly one of our olu captured oites. and four r-. i.- 'i men lying about on the groun mok- ing, with their rifles leaning againeth Me rocks some distance off. Thegun-was, presumnably, leaded, -and tbey -wailing for the convoy to appear; the fil t.h man was 'on lbe lookout towards the rond, leaning ove!' a large stoiic. The fates had delivered theni into our bande. 'flolford,\" I said, \"take hlm in th. blue shirt; 1'11 take oeewitk lthe beard. .lnmp on your mon, kick hlm, anything, but bring3-hm down as quickly as pos- sible.\", I thea waved my handkerchief, sud rush cd. The Boers were takea counpletcly by surprise. I jump¶ed with both feet on niy mau's ehest-hie was lying down; Holford fell on the top of Màr. Blueshirt; and Tyn- dale and Iris men seon had their lot in subjection. I couldin.t quite sece how, ewing to my own pressing affaira. My man vas knocked out, se I left him, anid collected thpeir rifles. Then we tied the lot up with the gun's drag- ropes and staeked the cursing bundles in a, coriier near the gun.' We ddun't trouble to gag them; they couldn't b. heard anywhere that wouild- matter. The gun vas ready loaded, and sighted at seventeen biundred yards.. \"Whcn the firing begins, Tyndale,\" I said, \"or 'wlîen le convoy appears, lay the gun on the top of tbe laIt-baud kopje, and wail tili 1 give lhe word to Tynd«le had had some artillery train- ing ia Australia, in, fact, lie vwas the only one present who knew apything about guns, to speak of. Theri we stood and w9ited. The country lay stili and peaceful. Wvbo would drearn of the scene so shortly to lie enacted la this pastoral surroundingt StidIdenly, klick-klock, klick,klock f rom tlîc NIausèr on the hill in front. .Ahnost at the saine time the bead of the Convoy swuing into view. Tiie fring invreased rapid1ly %, and we cSild sec the con v-o v's escort doubhling out in ragged Ime righît and ]eft of the road« towards the kopjea, firing bur- riodly. Men sud oxen were falling, and the convoy stopped suddenly ina.a con- fuied panic. NW. could. sec officers and coàduclors riding r\u0026pidly up and down ameiag lhe waggonh. \"«Rcsdy\"' I aouted.\u003e Tyndale, lhe gun-layer, slipped back sud seized the lanyar\u0026ddrawing il laut. Crash! bang!! The gala leaped back., sud in a second or lwo a little loud of yellow dual appearedi just on the very top of lbe kopje. \"1oed abolI Run up anil relead,\" 1 yelled. .' 7 Ah! The ire had slakened on titat hil1p-Ialmost stopped for a. moment. Tid oece men Jumping up and dowa and waving sometbing wbite towards us. \"They doa'ýt undersîand yet,\"' said 1, grimly; \"lb inkir heir own men have made a. mistake. Read'y ... IE.\" Crash! bang! again. Another little dust cloud. \"Good; same place. Now ,trail rounil aud give lie'otiier-bill a show.\" But there was no need. On the k'opjes the D ulehîmen were running * o and fro like litIle ants. Our men, who liad been\" fxlling -bàck on *the waggons, agala began to comne forward. Then, suddenly, the Boers streanied d'own thé reverse aide of the hils, mouîîhed and lied off, laI t and right.4 \"'Give 'em one more, for a stirrup cup,\" I shouled, wiid with delight. flang! *arain. Into thie flying rnob crashiedi the shieil. Nol much damage, but a wholesome moral effect. The escort of the. convoy hail by now crowned lb.heuis and were waking up the flying Boers. The convoy began to resumie its cuxubrous crawl. \"By gum!\" -whispered Tynidale, as otir Commanding Officer panhed up. \"Weil, of ai! th cheeek!\" was ail lie could say; \"what th-\"l ««I told you they ivere up lucre, sir,\" 1 said. *\"H'm, yes. WTat a fuol I must bc not! to bave listened' But, by Jove., vou've saved the con'o V.\" -- s,\"I rcple .- An gîn i Boers wimat 11.oy cal! a good 'Schirk.' -' Besides whih we've gel a gun,a,, osera sand ffteela homes.\" \"Yen were lueky to get 80 far sadHar-ýcre, thougèhtfully. U\"Iua 0,fr meji haek on hearing C would have tried to, capture the h1,~p 'bnIarriNfd It was iloér I aaw Sheltoj% below and h. oI Mien ho. becamàe suddeniLIy registj a la Orderlyý.Roox.7 - ' \"I supose y ou know»\" le sl,*~ yen dlsobeyed My distict orderu. I must overlooki lit Ibis time, noi you have saveà the ovy-~y reputat ion. lnstoad of-p ttgy~~ der arrest, 1 tbiuk 1I-as! the lot of vofl for teDIstlLfUId Service Med.\" An.d tbafi is lîow we got 'em. The Gophor Original by S. J. Wigley, EdIgertoUs. Aits. A shril eau frein the wbeat Iedgen And a heap of soi!l hat's dried,-'- And a fliikingtli,çn bobbà ggbpa Tells you lb. gophe's spied.- .Fo lhe gopher is a robbcr oflgt-artis- ie baste; Fat and furry, too, you'I1. always flnd, hi m. Ile sleeps away the îîinter, and aIl suis mer is in iiiste, '-bchind him. ./ 29- BEANBlack Wax ...............005 BEET, Fiat Egyptian.... .......... .05 CABBAGE, Prenium Fiat Dutch ..OS CARROT Nantes..........OS CAULIFLOWER, Dar.rfr 25 CELERY Golden Self Blanching .15 CORN, dolden Bantam............. .05 CUCU MBER. McKenuie's Prolifie.«. .10 LETTUCE, Hanson................OS ONION, UcKeze's Nortbhad.... 10 ONION, MeKeuzies Red Wethers- field ............................ .05 PEA, Ainerican Wonder............ .05 PEA, McKensie's Proàperity .........os RADISH. French Breakfàst......... .05 TOMATO, Atlantic Prise............ .05 4t for ktch- îthey \u003e good \u0026 and t nol notice [l trili plan Aus- -, but , you ma. de 15 9. liere- Stint. lIy 81l siWoop Muat rigt oter c eft. 'and kep Lorses, serub. before eai- fromi mn ,but imber ve ho warii i lie lit of raffrê --I-- 1 , !A -.1 wmtem canubla oremeut.,",
         "The - western Home iMonthi y Wintbime, Maroh, 1914. rodutloa lik th Semstommand your - teret. uda hcoàtson Fairweather. fttrs meuns a good lrsmn th\"t yoq canot wllafford \"-3 to 500/o -Discounts Off Markd Prices Fur Coats, CANADUN BEAVER Pffty b-Inches lone . . ................ $300.00 . ela............ OMO-00 -GTEY SIBERIAN SQUIRREL COAT * Fifty inehee long Pegular.**..............25.00 fspe . ............... $112M5 LADIES' FUiLLLENKGTH CARACUL COATS *--9a4. if i:newe st Styles. ...la............ $100.00 8p .a...............*50.00 Fur. Pleces HUDSON SEAL PILLOW 1 UFFS large and medium sixe. Regular..............$25.0 Spoci.l...............*15.00 HUDSON SEAL SHÂWL STOLES Straight or shaped, trimmed with silk tassels and fringe. Regular .............. $30.00) Speci.l...............*15.w0 SHAPED CRAVATS Smart style for wearing with spring suits. Regular.............. $15.00 Special................*$7.50 Fairweather\u0026 Co. Limited 297-299 Poctage Avenue ýToronto WINNIPEG Montreal\u003e =, Thne Awakening of Priscifa By -Mollie E.Jarieson Ohapter i1 UNTTL Betsy, the maid of aIl work, entened the old ladies' emnploy- ment, Priscilla, incredible as it may appear, had nover s0 much as guessed that a birthday might, upon oc- casion, necesitate presents and present- giving. The old ladies were Priscilla's great-aumts, and had brouglit ber'up ln accordance with their own early train- in#. Law, not love, was tihe key-note of the old ladies' regime, and Priscilla was the chiefest sufferer thereby. Into this maiden establishment, served long and faithfully by elderly ilannali, but lately espoused by a widower green- grocer, entered, like somne unexpected gust of wuild spring weather, Betsy, youthful, romantie, and red-headed. The old ladies would never have tolerated Betsy for a moment, lîad she not been Hannali's niece, and therefore reeomn- mended by Hannali. In tirne, witlî ricid rule and painstaking training, lier mis- tresses hoped to transform Betsy into just such an exemplary handmaiden as Hannali had been before ber. ladies would have blarned PriocilIaw for overgarruity-had, confided as much to her sympathetic handmaid. \"Jim Merri. pisn, hlm that I've been walkin' outSall Winter, bas promised.mP the tip-toppest pair of gloves wloen mine cornes along, week after next. Ie asked my size last Thursday night wheu we were out.\" For by thi's time, Priscilla, thanke to Betsy's loquacious tongue, knew al about Jim Merriman, the grocer's dapper young assistant, and of im Merriinani's .£penchant\" for Btsy. Smetirnes, caro- fully brought up thougli she had been, she had almoat envied Betsy setting ott so gaily, cheeksalal aglow, on Thursday evenings, to meet the chosen of lier heart. Not that Priscilla coveted the at- tentions of Jimn Merrinian - her weil- brouglit - up youîîg - ladyhood bardly stooped to t bat; but to ho necessary to someone - it wvas that for which ber starveui heart seenied constantly to be crying out. Her grey eyes wvere strangely wistful as she looked up from the ironinig table. \"It sounds nice, Betsy; but, of course, But tho training, the excellent moral principles, the more than excellent ad- vice which lad done so mîîch for Hannali, lad little «or no effeet on Hannalh's youthful relative. Precept, ad- vice, even the more severe forais of con- demnat ion, slid like sornuch -%vater off a duck's back, wlîen applied to Bet'sy. Tlîeir incorrigible mnaid-serv ant ivas the despair of tlhe old ladies' ives, anid yet,' for trusted Hanîîalî's sake, they dare not suînrnarily dismiss bier. But while the old ladies fretted, one member, at least, of the liouseliold re- joiced in Betsy's coning. To Priscilla it seemed as thougli the old biouîse liad suddenly -%akened up fromn tlîat deadly sleep to which the Trigid ride of lla n iali's mistresses, tlîe exernplary serviîig of Hannali herself, had so long re(lived( it. Betsy, anîd eveîî Bets «v's erratic îîîode of w'ork, gave jtist a tiuîge of eolor to a pie- ture whilihbadllong been grey. Iletsy, with lier pink wrap)ler, lier tolsled red lîead, and merry, blue eyes, wvas to Pris- cilla an infiniteiy more attractive persoîi- ality than the excellenît lîocolate-clad llainahliadeverbeeii. E%-eî tie factoftlîe joint being over-done, and tîe, potatoes uiulcr, wvas in sonie ways a chîange froua tie duil, -respectable, everyday routinie. WTien Betsy smnashied oîîe of tlie best diiiner plates. it was soileiitig of an epodl inii lriseilla's existencee. Ilaniîalî, tJîroiuglout aIl lier lonIg siVue had never so inucli as elhipped a saucer. To Priseilla. descending to the, kitehen to i ron su iiie o f lie r fi n nt s' lier lîanîdiker - chlefs and haevs.IHvtqv ýNoiijll tîat awav ini the ilo-st. artl(s., iliiniiiii.i' iile. it %vus thîrolîgil î lsi ' 'iS sa 111tii lriscilla olîtaiiied iiiiijt of ' liiip-e of tlîat oitside l %N«r'1(1uof VIlijeu. uank ti lier eIderss dci i îîphr11iigîg,'Ile ku -o littîe. ýl in eaîling lier .-ESS 'ilanilleil to 01- o\u003c1ladies, M1110 * -To t i lihlk of il lei, îj i' V l,' )iitlilSýlV l0-fiorr'cî ,v 111l, ýO1 oi iever sQ 111](11eli a, ll i or.\\%-ard to ;( reen. lrlýi1La-u10 tîbt tiue oli with me it's different. My aunts would possibly not - approve. Yet I wonder Hannali nover spoke about how other, peo- ple kept tlueir birthdays. She must have known too.\" \"Aunt Hannali? Shie wouldn't bobtor«-ý lierself about those sort of tllings,\" AUIAù327e- Iliannah's niece averred with youthful scorn. \"Neyer likely had a present froin a sweetheart in lier life, ]et aloiîe anyone else. A bora old nîaid, if ever there was miîe, and a bora old nia id she'll stay, tliouglî sle xvas married fifty tines over. It's the miistresses l'in onderin' at, flot dom' their best to inake things cheery for you, and you the only young titing in thîe hoiîse,' added affectionate Betsy, settiiig duown tlie potato pot with a tlîîd. Subscqiienît conversat ion reveaied tlhe fact tliat Betsy liad received a good înany birtlidayi)resellts in ber day. ]3etsy's adi)iii's, liad been nîany, and lier swains' gifts varied, ranging from tics and gloves to chiocolates and boxes of \"bong-boings.\" Priseilla, hearkening lialf eîîvioîîsly, suddenly realised that lier owil life m-as duil, mouiotonous, grey. MVas it altogether the oid aunts wlioin she lîad tii thiank for the narrow oîitlook upon life, wliieli she at presetit enjoyed? Bad Iriscilla hierseif, by' lier over-rneekuiess and docility, no band iin the inatter? A ring at the dloor-beli upstairs broke in lijon thle liaiidnaids recital of pzist e-oîîqîests., Priseillai, sdillironing, ivas revolving înany tIi iîgs lu lier mind wlîeii Ee'(tsy caine elattcriîîg (lonl agaili. lier eap awry, baving suecessfuiy adniiitted tlie visitor. ~Xlady to see the mistresses, and Ms Maria Says, will yen llease go iii wlien tlie tea does, MNiss 'Cilla? It's that old Miss Arrol froin Bournville,\"' added Be-tsy, seizing the kettle, and filling it at thie kitehien pipe witlî altogether lin- ieeesary (lin. Priseilla an(1 the tea-tray arrived il' tlIie Iprlor, a qua rt r of an hour later, to S i. le entered softly-the auints Iliad tatiglî t lier tha tyoîiflg people otiglit to bu and nôtd livhurd, and, liaviiig .5,.. Robinison \u0026 C ompany Limited Winnipeg's Great Department Store We would like to take care of your crockery require- ments as we have unequalled advantages to serve you ini this respect. It matters flot where. you live, we can satisfy your every want and fan\\aýt a cost that will suit and please you. Our illustrated catalogue giving exact reproduction, full des- cription and cost, can be had for the asking. If you are flot satisfied in every way with our goods your cash wiIl be .Promptly. returned. \\X'\"rit\"e us as to your wrants. Robinson \u0026 Company, Limited Winnipeg soevingt tk CanadianWnt for upwards of 30 years w-tw«%* - ww %o%-Pwwa ma A Western town Opringing Up at the foot of tI2e Rockies",
         "The western Home àwonthly ankoegj, aon, lu - -q-- - - - - au m hands with the visitor, procecded 1bber usual duties of pouring out tea. i As rioi, a merry old 1ady,. as unlike the sunts as it was ' possible to ho, aLanod up a t her with \u0026 smiiing nod as ah d hier ber cuplr !'Growfl out of ail knowiedge, you ý.Mto be every time 1 see you, child. ieteen to,morrow, your aunts tell me you. are. Ah! I can remember, when 1 was your age. Littie 1 valued my youth theni, and-now ail the riches of the world caiit give me one 1.ur of tbat golden time back again.\" - Miss Jane frowned alightly. Miss Jane was'the older aunt, and possessed the strongest objection to Priscilla being brÔught into prominence. \"ÂAge has its advantages, my dear .\u0026nes\"-Miss Arrol's name was Agnes. \"joutb, in its inexperience, may wel envy those of riper years. You may go and ait down, Priscilla. You are oniy standing in Miss Arrol's light.\" \"«Now, now, as though I didn't like to bave bier,\" the good-natu.red spinster said. \"0f ten I've envied the two of you having a little girl like thisof your own. You it down by me, 'Cilla-once upon a time, long enougli age, I had a littie sister of my own valled 'Cilla-and tell' me about ail the birthday presents you're expecting te-merrowv. Wby, wben I was your age, I'd not have been able to sleep for thinking of w-at I wau get- ting, and from whomn. Sec what it is tot bie old. Thougli my birthday's to-morrow,c too, samne day as yeur own, no one wouldi ever dream of sending me a present.\" 1 \"INo one bas ever sent me a present either,\" Priscilia averred half sbyly. \"There are se few people that I know\u003e\" abe added sorrowfuily and humbly. At that moment it almost seemed te hier as though she hadl been cheated out cf sometbing in bier life. Âge might lay dlaim to experienee, as Great-aunt Jane had delared; but how-was experience'to be gained if one had bardly even lived?1 \"We bave always 'been most careful. regarding Prescilla's aesoiategi\" Gresk- aunt Maria said with. dignity. «Young People are often heedl'ess and rash as to their choice of friends; but, guarded as Priscilla bas been, we bave ne need te reproach ourselves witb any degree of laxity on that score. As regards tbpe frivolous habit cf present-giving upon birthdays or otherwise, that at least is one ,which we have always felt ought te bc discouraged.\" \"Poor Priscilla,\"Miss Arroi mur- mured: but she said it s0 softly tîtat only Priscîlla, and net the aunts, heard it. \"NL'eyer mind. if ne one else will, l'il sciid yout a birthday souvenir. It won't be much fun for you, L'm afraid, but it -wilI nt leasst be better tjhan notlîing. ýNineteeti onlv cornes once in li~hfetime, voiuknow '. And the old ladly nodded reassuriflgly, andl gav-e Priscilla's band an atectiotiate little squeeze. Chapter II Priscilla's «present\" from 'Miss Arroi ariviv\u003c duly upon lier birthday nîorn ing. Hall' a dozen cmnbroidered pocket-hald- kerchiiefs, aeccmpanying a card pretty enoiigh to bave ernanated from the Most adloring of lovers. Priscilla bail ne lover -l-ad neyer bail a lover; but this very tangible token cf lber kind old frierîd's affection for bier ivas certainly next best. Slie looked up with shining eyes. 1 \"Isn't it good of lier? Cani't 1 go along' and thank her- this very, morning, Aunt, Janie ' And oh! I wish that 1 had some- thing that I could take ber in return, for a birthday present.\" \"Don't be ridiculous, Priscilla,\" Aunt Jane said in condemnatory tones. \"Thank Agnes \u0026rrol if yeu wish for\u003e ber pretty gift; but pray do xît endeavor te retuirf it in any way. At bier -age, one en- dea'vors to ignore a birtbday rather thaix to remember it. Even when I was a girl, we bad no time for sucli folly,\" added Aunt Jane, wbo.certainly, at that period of bier if e, lookedl as unlikely a birthdaY- present giver or recipient as it was pos- sible for anyone to imagine.* Priscilla, thankful te receive even so inuch permission, beld ber peace. But after breakfast was over, she hastened upstairs, and, donning bier bat and coat, made a basty exit from the bouse. There was always a certain fear lest Aunt Jane might repent cf the permission already given, and recaîl ber to some totally un- necessary lhousebold--task. Prill1a, hastening down the faintly sunny street, Teflected on the possibility of lher being abile te, present Miss Agnes ArroI with any acceptable gift. At the florist's she paused, besitated, and finally went in and bought a tiny pot of violets. Then plie bailed the bus for Bouravilie. Priscilla, though she bad rarely visited Miss Arroi at Bouruville before, found thte bouse easily enough. One of a Couple of villas, standing back a iitt.le f rom the rosa, and surrounded by a ebeerful green paling. The maid wbo answered b er. rather timid ring, smiled, and invited ber te, enter, even before see ad asked if Miss Arrol was-at bome. \"Missus bas been expectin' you al mornia', tbough sbe's net just se well te- day, miss,\" sbe volunteered as informa- tion. Priscilla laid.berpot cf violets upon the' --table,, and. sat. do.wa te wait-in ,tbe comfortable - little; reom, baif parler, baîf study, jute whi èh she. bad been usbered. She bad net se long te iwait after ahl. Tbe door openéd, and a ratber gloomy- faced yôung man enfiered. The globm did not even lift from-.bis counteflance.,at sigbtch rii itin Àg tbere, ber ittie pot cf purple' violets .beside ber.. \"Geod morning, \" he said briefly. \"M.Ny aunt is indispoied this morning,-and bas commissionèd me te ,sce. yen in ber placé. Sie expected yen rather earlier'; but I supose tbe delay was-unavoidàble.\" \"Icame as soon as T could,\" Priscilla said in a very smal voiee. She waàs tee meek te resent tbe.old lady's evident de- sire for. immediate thanks; tbeugb she could net belp wisbing that ithad been Miss Arroi ratber than ber nepbew whe bad been there in persen te receive tbem. \"Oh! tbàt's al rigbt,\" bé said easily, \"It's oniy that my aunt's a bit nervous 1-thoughit there migbt bave been a bus smash-up or sometbing of that sort when yen didn't make your appearalide. Yen haven't been from bome before, 1 sup- pesè ?\" lie added, net unkindlly. That the 1littie igiri with the shy grey eyes was .half frightened of bim, Basil Norwood .lhad realized on the moment, and this ' oung man, abeit gloomny f counten- , nce, did net care te bc held in unneces- sary awe. r \"Neyer w ithout elle of mny aunts,\" iPriseilla inforined bim. \" As far as .Bournville, I meani. But 1 found the 1 lieuse cjuite easily. It wasn't that that SPRING AND SUM\"MER4,\"' CATALOGUE IS OUT',\" If Yon Bave Not Already Reevdà Yomtr Copy Drop Eaton's a LUne and One WilI Be Sent Fre The new Spring and Suinmer -atalogue of'-the AT.' Eaton Company, Limited, for Western Canad» b out. Thousands of copies have been .delivered throughout,- the West during February. It is the best Catalogue ever issued by the C Om'i- pany-the best in arrangement,.i appearance. and' ii', merchandise. You need it li your home. Keep'it as a bok ýf. reference; use it as a guide in buying.- If you have not already received your copy, write:\". us, using attached coupon, and one will be forwarded-ý to you promptly free of charge. Win, The illustration at the head of this ,.dvets- mnent la a view of the front cover of the new Ecaton Catalogue. It is dons ini coloraTh and is a very effective rePresentatton of a T. Iitte# i Western prairie scene. Go,1Ltd., __________ Kndly .e1i e a\u0026 eopy of new Spring and, M ATON CG mr ets- nTeW en10 mcnthly. nipeg Canada NAME--------... ....... - PROVINCE ...... - 1'-* -~-~'\u003c-ey - '~1' - / ' 4 ( wix Ilaw for mceh to Merri. out-all ;Oppest along, ze last t-, nks to w al dapper care- 1beeri, ng oit îrsday of lier ffe at- Swell- ardly ary to hi er te be were from 'Ourse, wuld vonder r, pee- t ave uthful. L frin re W115 stay, s over. i, net cheery thing Betsy, L thd. M the good -day. nd lier ru tics , e, of ig hiaf Was it e lid upoil Rad ekiîless bi-oke f pist rwas il lier The produet of a ildonm u aden neer WinnPeg V\"P»h. 1914. 1 «.Lri.i;g when at old added ing it ýr un- ,ed in later, atints ouglit laving",
         "Ir, mat. uat..have JI t -,, addçd ~~b~g~ltfuri to appWMa ~lI.' ie h anulsMo face. Tom.bie,,rt'rI io\" .1qIis \u003c'miyoaur ppearançe, *«Wty YOUng. -It musti-on ly reffly that Yeu bave douüe »wa ayPriwsoasturu to, lusb. *Ufrfio îung m-on this was, te DiLt perhape, hiko Prisciha bher- i~raashy, an-jud the -abruptly novol o~ f bscnverçatI1 - nught mere y ireluit et-arp 9~iere\" f ere t çe ase, Prtoei, faéit th~ 'iervs et«t - \u003e L. y aufts pro- ~sd b. t t athome. ~a tsoyunaslok very- ~yIm .~Knet.n IUotsnovery te., -militg in spite. of ;for 0 p _.a somelhu nPioIascid sgi#te whieh u nopaIsbyre- \"4g Forgie mefu.tomi. ~e cf u n4uwqry. Tbat laone ~tI~ngs.[ Au..told, whlab he t-Y yu4jlady usuail ~W to ke te ajel.» T wo~kr~ PotPriSCifla, liv- fr'rqurt'-fre,»the. 'iorld and !ta 1a '84 e had hithelto doue. was ý4riy -ignorant on sncb matters. 4iuuts'are alwaYs tellilg nme bmw 9 1 ai; but then, one of them il elglsty, sud thàt ilarealiy old,\" add d Pris\"il, ai though -notbing short of the* ageofe the re9)owned Metliuselah coo»d bave i;Iiany way appoaied te ber. Asd hon h.roiembered tbe - roui Ipurporttof ber \"coming, and lifteil the , tIý. po1of violets frim tiip table. *« 'T'wa-tbeoaoly tbing 1 eould tbink -of. 'Yoôr aunt ikes .fowêrs, dfesn't \"et?-And violets-I always think there are ne owers ike violets.\", «VrIélets.» Ho s miled back at ber, the glom altogetiier gone frorn hie lîand- some face. \"Aren't they sweet, too T\" Re drew the little pot towards him, as though the- better ta inhale tbe frag-_ rance. \"IThey take me baek to the time whou I was a little chap.. We used to Irow juat such violets as those in the doar .old rectory garden at home. Sucli a tume ugo it seonis, aimost la lifetime, aud I thouglit I'd forgotten. But there are sûmo things wo can't forget, bard as ,wo try.\"1 \"But that-you'd always want ta re- member that.\" Priscilla's grey eyes were -se-sok.-\"'v notbing- liko that Iu my life-only always tlie same, the old bouse, theolod aunts. Sometimos I think that it will nover be any different. The worid beyond, and me horo-aiways here. Odly perliaps when I qr o d, like the oid aunts, I shan't mind so mueli.\" The mn, atml bending over'the violets, glanced up. Ris dark eyes met bers with a sudden, answering, understanding flash. \"Not' mmd? Wby, cbild, don't you .know that it's the passing away of your own beautiful youtb, above ail, which will . lave you broken-beartedi Wlen 'tbat 15 gone -goa utile ciao matiers. IlWe're s0 wearied, witli no lieart for the brave figlit we mi glt 'Once have under- taken, bad fetters not bound aur *hande. W. are not contçnt,. not even 'resigned, ouly belIjess. Surely there are bigger thinge ta -b. got out of life tlian mere- 'nat minding' T\",' \"Oh, then you know-youl know, too T\" Priscillà stretchEd-out ber liile hand, and, across the violets, their grasp met. \"I liad fancied iliat no one understood- knew. For lif. is beautiful, isn'tit, and ta b. shut out from it all-that's what scems the vcry liardest. Not that it's tihe aunts' fault; don't imagine tlîat for a moment. It's only that thiey can't- will neyer understand.\" .And tben, with. a sudden revulsian of feeling, Priscilla stood up, blushi ng furiausly. To confide thus in an utter stranger thase thouglits which as yet she had liardly realized shie possssed- wliatever couid ahe bave been thinking of ?. Only, lie hardly seemed a stranger -now. -Thioso lýater--confidences bad brouglt tliem very near together. \"I muai b. going,\" Priscilla said, a littie stiffiy. \"lWill you tell your aunt liow sorry I amn thiat elle is-indisposed.\" \"But you must corne up and see my aunt.,\" le said, almost eageriy. \"It was only those - preliminaries tliat I was commissianed ta arrange. She would naturally prefer an interview with you herseif.\" \"Iý thougit you were neyer caming,j Basil. It is, quit. baîf an lhour, I am sure, ine. I 'heard tii. door bell ring. Give the young woman that chair wbere I can sec hèr face.\" That. Building you are going to do ~ -get the cost. No. 19. tallié~ FOO.,OPERATION SsuRES$UCCESS I 010,777,00 earned by 4 Co-Operative Representatives. \"ehat Others Arc Doing, 1 May .Do\"'b As\u0026a reeseeatlve cf Thse Domnion'C tyoe se .iy Ce., td.. 1 hereby lmaté t .amo.d la 1911 thee uesof 8$6.09.23. 0- T. Tissait. Newtoa. ae Co-iiatloo set.me e $amn $1.250.0W during my u ssnety vacation,.-1911. \"Las represntatlve of The Dominion Co-op.rti«. Rmhiy Vo.. Ltd. (Su\u0026)d.\u003e OI.culpeton. ellen hatyour 1. tUal \u0026 ate absolutely lnoces- sary for aoy on. *tetor an other bssi.ssss.and 1 consider thee 5isà tw. Uasovrth ti oe cf, tis 1. P. M.. -wiooiug , ..lm ssyiat tise. . nsa. excelent for any youn man. wbe- tiser liey intend to \u0026et in à business Caity 'or int. robes that. yoib have lait!down ans\u0026 Ilva by tisem. woutdf maie a'rame and PWasefor insseif In society. and ila tise business word', J. M. H., I\u003cemare, . DMlçte. gUS.A YOU CAN. F5AeSb. :: 2is.sepd.000 U. 0,0001' Mate C.d.E.sA LEsi ssdS TA. T E5. BUssaSINSSà I,. .'The Dominios Co-Opsrativ, Reaity Co,, 114 Mth AVE.,EAST CALÇyeYt navet bae haba ':..1tdme àfinttv -Matole 0f grat Me veuY muchsregret tise deatis of Mr. M. S. Percival. About November 1. 1911. wbo. iss Our rePresentative. earned j5.81.00 by s4ing Real Eýstate.in 1911. M e b11eby stat at IeaReBR.tOti Opecotie Realy Ctt. Lti. n o .. ALTA. il Sgd) A. P. aaB o0 TJa Weatern Home Monthi y 4 t. -I Winnipeg, March, 1914. But Priscilla did not at once accept the chair the. nepbew, thus eOmman(led, praffered lier. There was a startled look in lier grey eyes as she met the searcli. ing glànee of the irate old lady. For the moment 'the girl feit n,)t unlike Little Ried Riding Hood of the children's fairy, tale, who, coming to visit kindiy Grand.l mamma, finds Grandmamma mysteriotîs.. 1$ý vanished, and the snarling wolf iù lier place. \"What are you staring at, mây I ask- child ?\" the wolf inquired sliarply. \"One' would think you had neyer seen a sick woinan before. You may louve lus noNy, Basil. 1 shall arrange matters with tliis young-ihem, person myseif.\" \" dOh, no, don't go away.\" Priscilla turned desperafely to, ber one friend, nowv about to desert ber. \"'It's ail a mis- takze, and I don't know what's the mat- ter. It was Miss Arroi I came to see- Miss Arroi, whoi sent me my birtbday present. Oh, I arn afraid that there is soine very terrible mistake,\" poor Pris. cilla said. Then the woif d[d a very extraordin- ary thing for a wolf to do. The ivoif hegan to laugli. The nephew was very far from ilaughing. ' He was too mueh concernedl over Priscilla's grief for mirtli. \"Why, the poor, dear, silly child lias somehow got herself into the wrong house,\" said the ivolf, who, upon dloser acquaintanceshîp, did not seern ta be sucli a bad old walf after ail. \"Miss Arroi stays next door, and I suppose, the two houses being so mucli alike, yau somehow wandpred Lu ixere .iustead. Fooled that brilliant nepbew of mine too, most successfully. Hie undertook to in- terview an intending 'campanion help,' who promised to ala this morning, and this is the resuit. Hie must have con- ducted bis interrogations very cleverly ta, keep yau in the dark so long.\" \"O0h, I see,\" Priscilla said slowly. She raised ber eyes ta the nephew's face, the dawning of a smiie chasing away their ditss The nepbew, who bad been looking singularly discomfited, thereupon smiied. too. Perliaps he recalied the pleasing fact, that, though in that in- teresting category -of questions whieh lie hadl put ta Priscilla, he b.d asked ber several things, after aIl, Priscilla .baid told him even more than be had asked. \"You've got ta forgive me,\" bce told lier riow. \"I thought my aunt was in luck's ivay for once; but it's évidently nat to bc.\"- The nephew hardiy acknowledged, as lie spoke, that the regret was as much onl bis own account as on bis aunt's. \"Fi'r an aid ivoman, and tliough yau're not ta be iny companion, I'd like yau to, conîe and see me now and again, my lear. Agnes Arroi will bring yau, and vouch for my respectability too, if yau care. 1 like your face, and it isn't often that I take a fancv to a face. Whiat are you standing glowering at. Basil? You can corne back in 1,alf an hour, *vhen we've badl otr chat out, and show tais young lady the way next door.\" But, after ail, Miss Arroi never gat her carefully chosen birthday prescrnt. Priscilla left ber violets on the table of lie siek aId lady ta %vlhoni she had been so strangely introduced - left'perhaps aisa a mernory, even sweeter than the violets, ta, brigliten lier own and lier nepliew's joint lives. Agnes Arroi nodded and smiled insca-utably as slie watched the young man from. next door a littie later, shawing Priscilla \"the way\" ta lier own abode. \"The way\" necessitated a good deai of.showing. Tt even neces- sitated, on bis part, an entrance into Miss Arrol's own particular parior. \"It's an age since V've seen yau, Miss Arrol, even tbough 1 do stay next door,\" lie nephew informed. her uiilushingly. Miss Arroi oniy sniiled. again ini- crutably. \"And now I suppose 1 shouldn't have een you either, if you lhadn't stayed next cloor, and 'Cilla liere liadn't thouglit bhat 1 dli,' slîe tol(l iimwitlî equai aitlacitN ' Whiei. iieitîter the nephew nor yet \u003eriseilla emîilul altogetlier deîiy. 'lie .eliew wvas suîîiliuîg; Priscilla ývas sinil- îg. Miss Arroi wvas srniling too. Per- als tle 01(1lady, with lier far-seeing pIaiaîe,.saw wluat «as vet tliose two dense ouin g people did îîot that, wiere the u-rN auit * tv Ilîad uîlatclîed thîe gate, Hle îiepliem lia(l'II)uslied it ajar, and tîîat [h portaIs of tuie world wvere about ta' -P('n (Weifl inore Nwidely for Priscilla, ever. it iniglit ho, ta close gagin on tîlis DOMINION CO OPERATIVE REALTYCl",
         "Winnap~g March, 1914: w\"- The Westprqa, J\u003c w oM,«tI.i Il- - -~ I., i -- - -- la. Ill Readwhatyour Neighur say abut, ,,the dl4. Lecept Lfl(ed, 1 look ýarch- \u003ew the Little fai ry rand-l rion s- il bier Eask, - icone siek tthis seilla riend, nlus- mat- see- ;day re is Pris- rdin- Wvolf very irtb. Sbas rong loser o be Miss pose, 1yotl tead. toa, lin- ielp,' and Con- rerly She the ;eir been ipon the in- i be ber had ked. ber ck's L te ged, iuh l're I to My and you Eten 'at Du r, uow got ent. Sof *en. aps the er * IfEIL fi r .,,2 ., S. There are FORkTY Spec.ial, Convenience8'. i te HOOSIER. that have- macle - it. necessary to 'ier 700»O OE ~ ç5a*e-W 1Ie idq~ Thee Hoosier Cabinet Co., Hartney, Man., Dec. 10, 1913 Winni pg, Man. Gentleien-.i received thie cabinet to-day and find it in cvery v'ay satisfactory. Thank yeu very1 much for sendirlg it se promptly. Yours truly, Mrs. J. A. Johnston. Thie Heesier Manufac turing Co., Moose Jaw, Sask.., May 26, '13 . :.Winnipeg, Man. Gentlemen-I received the cabinet in good condition. We think it is just fine, and a Most be4q#fully finished cabillet. .,'uYr neighbours like it very much and you May get an order ifrin'' some of them. Yq4rs tîuly, Mrs. J. Garrison. Thee Hoosler Cabinet Co., * Brandon,'.Man., Dec. 14, 1913 Winnipeg, 'Man Gentleien-I amn highly pleased with my cabinet No 1322 and find it invaluable. Yours respectfully, Mrs. W. f. Dark. Thie Ho osier Mar\u0026lufctdiring o. Quesnell, B.C., July 4, 1913 - W4innie-, ~ Gentlemn-EÉnclosed is Pbit Ôffice order covering the invoice for thie 1428 H-oosier Cabinet supplied me.,'.I wish' .to. tlink you for your kindness in proinptly shippng thc cabinet, and express rnyself as* beitig welR pleased with Mny purchase, and my dealings witlî you, I amn,Vours sincerely, Mrs. J. Frank Hill. Thie Hoosier Manufacturing Co., Brock, Sask., Nov. 24th, 1913 Winnipeg, Man. Gntleren-Having seen a number of different cabinets I decided on seeing Mrs. Frank Hainilton's, of this town, tliat it was a Hoosier 1 wanted.\" After looking over your Model Kitchen Book I selected one. I sure enjoyed reading in the catalogue abou t these cabinets, and arn ordering the best, a duplicate of Mrs. Harilton's. I reinain, Mrs. W. A. Howie. The following are a few of- tnany unsolicited testoii Genièie-Cbiet gried gnd as unpeckred'Wdneadqty and It ou stu 1~i bargain as5 a wÀextei, *elIpIa d'st and your promnptness. l in 2PO\"lngi MA to bel of fu*rthér usé lto -yol in, eisds'4.o placing cabinets. 1 a dYurs rdylitF D. Bowea. The Hoosier ManufaturingCoc., Carmangay, Mlia., Jufy, 46,0, 1iý Winniegm an. . .* * Dear Sirs-Thé cabinet which I ordered sanie time ago 4rrived thia'mousq. udf pleased to notice the improvemients *hich have been made la 'this year's cabinetïE4,u who, lias seen t tbink it is the last wordi In the kitchen cabinet line. Yours tFtdYà . U Buckley. The..leosier..Càbinét C.,. Rirers, Mati., De 5~1ù. Wiuinipeg, Man. Dear 'Sirs-Received Muy cabinet somne tme ago and arn very mu p1ea»ed wtt1,kt and 1 consider it the înest up-to-date kitchen cabinet I have aeor sçeç. fxo rsb#mély, Mrs. John- Cluf,.S~.. The foosier CaWnet Co., ,~uu, ak.JR Dear Sirs-My cabinet No. 1326 came Ohand somne tme apro, sa il T 11k h 8a» ~U d' those who have seen it think it aS truly a very compcýt cabinet. Yb\u0026$xstii*~, ra., David Babbings. Hoosier Manufacturit'g Co., McNutt, Saak,, joue 9 1913, Winnipeg, Man. Gentleren-Your Çiabinet received and insluected and found to be satisaçtory in evr«y respect, 1 amn, or at1 st rny wiie is, highly pleased with this cabinet. Yo uri-tîruly W. Pruden. In the 110081ER Your Whole Kitchen is-, ai your igr'[a Yen \u003cean searchi the world over and net ind any- thting tbat saves se mucli labor in your, kitchien as titis beautiful new Hoosier. You can sit down at work with this Hoosier and save miles of steps. It combines Three Big Cupboards, a Large Pantry, Specli Bins and Compartmelts, and -dozens Labor-Saving Features, around a room\u003e metal table that slides out 16 inchet. YOUR NEED FOR IT you wil1 not question wlieu you know its total conveniences. And now, %vitlh se many newv features and its inucli larger size, at the present low cash price. it is a wonderful bargain which you cau easily afford. YOU MAY CHOOSE betweeîn two dominating nîioels-\"White Beauty,\" vbi\u003c'hlias a waterproof, ivory-white enamnel upperý cuphoard, and the maodels with xerely an \"Oak\" interior, at slightly Iess pri 1ce. OUR MONEY-BACK GUARANTE,rrOtects yen, on any Hoosier yon buy and removýs any final cause Y-1 mright have for hesitating to send in your order. Answer These Two, Questions 1. Arn I doing justice to myseif and =y family by w49tinýg my, strngth with ýmiles of useless steps in my kitchen- which a Hoosier would save, or 2. Shail I write now:f6r,,aetall*d- informa- tion about the new Moosier features ini order to compare-detail by detail-the savinga ' this cabinet wiHi ake f or me when I put it in my kitcheul? Here Are The Terms: 1. $5 puts the cabinet youý choose in your 'home. $. 5 monthly quiekly pays for it. 3.The Low Cash Price fixed by the factory pre- vails strictly. 4. No interest. No extra -fees.- We pay the freight. 5. Your inoney back if you are' flot delighted witb your lfoosier. TRI IS18 A R M AL Ât A town a Hoosier \"a we-alvisn you 0' w-*à*u now for the book, describOd belOW. !Wft * send prices and detuls without obligatioa t# ypu. Every H\"oier Cabinet in built of 'earefolly selected a' d easoned oak. This. extra qualt gtiaraiitees lastiiig service. -New Domnestic Sceèn'ce« Book FREE \"IYOU A» YOUR VTcomE,» bi lus. Christine Frederick, National Seeretary of the Associsted Clubs of Domestie Science, describes the other, Hocli features Euly and treats YOUrK kitcheji prob»su ia SIMPLEC, BRoAD, .SCIzTIFIc ANM\u0026R (t is filled with illustrations and wil provýe a val-, able I*lp te you. Send for it now.- Yott 4 not obligate yourself by acoepting., THE- HOOSIER MANUFACWVRING CO* 419 PORTAGE AVENUE,. WINNIPEG, MAN. Branches: Regina, Sask. CàîZary, Alta.- Box 1604 Vancouver, B.C. HOOS i Eut. w LLLPI",
         "CLASSIFIE» COLUMN If youà watt to buy or »eil aythiug la the lige. of poultry, fairm property, farm machiery, or if you vaut help or empoyment, remember that thie Claufifed adv.rtlu.men* columus of The. Western Huam-eutbiy are aIw4ys ready to help you acc.mpliuii your object. Coat 3c. word minimum 50-. Cadi Witli order. B9USINESS CANMES REPORT L O C A L INFORMATION, name, et., t us.Exc.t~n1 opportunlty. peg. 3 PRM FOR SIX MONTHI My speclal offer to introduce'mymasasibe *Invedtinf for Profit.\" It la vorth $10 a ca to aityone Who bas been getting toorer u~e the r1deh fiht tdemonstrates b-ra power of money, *and shows bow anyone, zko matter boy poor, eçaacquit. riches. Inveot- la\u003c for Profit la the onlz p*ogesslve finauds!l to $2.200. Write nov and I'11 tend it six mntbs free. H. Lý Barber, R471, 2 W JcsnBird., Chicago. FOR SALE GUINEA P14MS-Mixed clr;, $2 pair. Solid coloa White, Creusn Red, $3. Blacks, $5 pair. W. McKay, Îinig uton. Oui. À 7OR SALE-Shop-worn National Crease Separators.guranteed new. $gS.00 each. ltaYMOnd bs Co. Ltd., Winnipeg, Man. 4 BILLIARD TABLE\"-or farse homes, prtable and tationary. The game of kings. 50.00 Up, easy terus. J. D. Clark Billiard Ca., Wbmuipes. T.F. mBEUT MUSIC GALOR-For ane dime (eau or* stmpo\u003e ad your name and addres Wewemll f0 vacalepi« flateat \"l Mo« 1%,ThobpnvlctosYa.B.C T. 100 POST CARDS PFI-If you send à '1c. for 25 beautifully colored bîgh-grade. gold embossed, eatine Baster carde. Al postpaid. Home Emporsus, Beebe, Que. 3 NOVERLTIES AND PUZZLES-Tricks, lokres and puzzles. Catalogues and free saniples. Fe cents. Glbert Novelty Co., 11129 Creacent St, Morgan Park Station, Chicago FRUIT AND FARM LANDS RIAL £STATE WANTED -SeI our property quickiy for cash, no matter wire Cn \u0026Andrew Peterson, Fostoria, Kansas. -«QUARTER OR HALP SECTION WANTED in exchange for revenue producing property in Calgary. Will assume small incumbrance. 0A4ply room 16, Cadoga Bloclk, Calgary.\" S\u00263 FOR 'SALE-Tu beautiful New Brunswick. Ail kinds of improved farn's. No wind storms or blizzards. No hard times. Send me par- ticulars of what yo rqire, tating yUr apital S. L. T. Harrison, Moncton, gN.1. 5 FARMS WANTED-We have direct buyers. Don't pay cormisions. Write 'describing property, naminsn lowest price. 1WC help bues locate desirable property Free. American Investmnent rAssociation, 26 Palace Bldg., Minneapolis, Minn. 5 CASH FOR YOUR FARU OR BUSI- NESS-I bring buyer and sellera together. No matter where located if you want te buy, seli or exchange any kind cf propertyr or business unywhere, vjite me. Established 1881. Frank P. Cleveland, 1481 Adanîs Ex- press Building, Chicago, Illinois. 4 110W TO MAX£ AN ORCHARD in Brtish Coltnba-Send 25 cents for bock written by J. T. Bealby, B.A., the prize. winning B.C. fruit grower. Full information for beginners or experienced grovers. In- ternAtional Securities Company, limlted, 844 Somerset Building, Winnipeg, Canada. 12 PROFIT SHARING LAND SELLINO SYSTEM-Our land selling system connects yorlands with over 10,000 live vires en- circling the globe. Place the selling cf your lands at the pivýot. We send and deliver the message for -you. Vour address brings ful information. Globe Colonizing Agency, Bran- don, Manitoba. fro 312 ACRES-Irpproved, five miles ri Moose Jaw 320 acres near Munster, 1,280 acres near âainsborough; 160 acres improved, near Carievale; 640 acres, 3Y, miles from Lanigan; 320 acres near Wroxton; 1,280 acres near Borden. Write for full particulars regarding any parcel in vhich you mayb i interested. Canada Lands,j Limnited, 400 Nïltn, Crown Bank Bldg., Winnipeg, Canada. 4 .W iniiipeg, Mardi, l114. 5 h - - .1 - -. ~. s NEW BRUNSWICK FARNS-We bave a splendid climate, free from \u0026aUlextremea. Our 9eogrphical poaition unnurjpas.d only six dayfrose Eland theii.worÙi's maniie are ours. Great fruit a ry et patato poie.Average yll 1913MbeXailCanada. Besiwatredprovince. Best gante country in North America, finest boméland on earth. Our land values are almost beyonl compre- hension. SmaIlt cpital here does, bg ting_ Write for- 2914 Fêee Illustrated FàLrm Cata. lagée. Alfred BlMy \u0026 C.., St. John, N.B., Farm Specialiats. 3 MISCELLANEOUS -2EIGHT CAMES FOR lOc.-A viiole year sa mueMei.., Send today and get them. LGaudin, Heathcote, Ont.3 »RL- JANET E. FEROUSONf '290 Portage Ave., Winnipeg. Free consultatâOn reçarding Niervouis diseases, Goitre, Rheu-matism, Infant- ile Paraly-is succesafully troated. à SPORTINO POST CARI.-Including 'September Morm,'\u003e l0c. Miss Blanche' Girard. BoxE 29, Holyoke, mass.5 STAGE INSTRUCTION-Fret111 atrated Booklet an *«How ta Start lu Show BAisnes.\" Experience unnecessary. Send 2eVpostage. Stage Studio, -Sta. 12,--249 West 38th St., N'tew York. T.F. ~ DBeTold Frot A CIGAR un-be w oeu by msS md, TMXCVl The Atnvapi. C, Noutreal.3 LEARN TO PLAY 'PIANO WITBOUT NOTES or teacber. Only ev bouts practice required. Surprise your friends. Play any- tblng. Simple, effectve systeni. Write today for free particulars. . Box 394, Winna- peg, Manitoba. RIONH CLASS Rase Comb Rhode Island Reds. Splendid cociierel $\u00265L o. Jbspuff, Mekiwin, Man. 3 BARRE» ROCKS FOR 8ALE-Bred froin provincial let 'prze birda. Richard Lea4 Bridge Creek, Man. 3 tLC LO4ChA!PCILV fo b ,cinfrsale. . gBeltz, Bo 56 Baling P.O., n on, Ont. PURE-BRED-R.C.W. Leghorn Cockerels for sale ut $1.50. Satisfaction guaranteed. Peter Bueckert, Love Fars, Man. 3 FOR SALE-Duston Strain White Wyan- datte, yearling cocks, cockereli and pullets, $3.00 te $5,00 euch. G. H.LRissinger, Can- diac, Saskatchevan. 3 43 VARIETIES-PoultMy pigeons, duea geese, vater fcvL Incubatora. Feed alà supplies. Catalogue free. Missouri Squab Ca. Dept D2, irkvood, Mo.3 Son VAR'S POULTRY, EGGS, PIGEONS, *u doge, ferrets, squirrels, etc.; colored de- scription* 60-page bock, 10c.; list free. J. A. Bergey, ox 90, Telford. Pa. 4 RHODE ISLAND RED EGGS-From choice pens. Either comb, $1.50 per 15; stility, $1.00 per 15, 50, $3 00; In0 $5.00. Circular. Wm. Runley, Byng, Ont. FOR SALE-Ten pure-bred White Wyan- dette cockerels $2.50 each, famnus wiiter laying trÏn AMammoth Pekin drakes, fine birs $250 joseph Webster, Elklîorn, Man. 3 KELLRRSTRASS AND CýOOS strain cf Crystal White Orpington cockerels, $3 te $5. White Holland turkeys; bens Ï4, toms $5. Can supply unrelated pairs. airs. A. 1). Naismith, Wavanesu, Main. 3 IF YOU HAD A MILUON ne.. N. \u0026msb êaS a t nme t e J t. u h .a-Il . 'teq0 IMlL Unds,'. lu\u0026 ke jai6,roua £ et,- ota bo(m.d ,1AIg4tahlmU0. ' la . 608015is 4 ducks, $1.50 'ach. Mrs. Macoky, Lestock3 Sask. l3 REGSTEE» OItKSHIRtE SWINEo-A few choice boars and sove. April littcrs,ý White WyandottesBuf Orpingtotn, Cockerels, $2 80 each. Frcin beEýt strain in. Canada. R. . Binihani, Marquis, Sask. 5 FOI ALE-Same B. R. Cockerels pure lP m fl _ $.00, 00 -ý .R6. egg I u! -son; 15 ygs$.)P M ao, Lttlecote Poultr 30 egM9. M bo Sturgeon Creek, M1anitoba.3 SINGLE COME RHODE ISLAND REDS -Eggs frbru my Toronto Exhibition, Hamil- ton and (Ontario) Guelph. Winners e2. and $5.00I per 15. High daise, exceptonai 1aer. Writefrmtn list. J. Willis, iount Halùton, Onmtaia.o WHITE ORPINGTONS--Quality counts. Champions exhibited ut Toronto vin first ben, and again vin firat pullet and fifth lien. Again ut Buffalo International first cock and 1irst and third lien and four specials. Stock and eggs for sale. 3 pullets snd cockerele, $1500; eggs, $3.00 per 15; $1.00 pe 15 and $10.00 per 15. C. Schelter, FonUli, Ont. 5 SINGLE COMB WHITE LEOHOINS - 30 Co\u0026kerels -for i-ae.- Alil rothem t tecocker- ela winning first, second, third and fourtlî prize in the great Winnipeg show. February, 1914; ,falso eggs for hatchig. Breeders for sale after une lO, the prices very reasonable, for close d'escription and guarantee write for myfl%'N mating and price list.J. Frank, Winkler, Man. STAMPS FOR SALE STAMPS-Package freetot collectors for 2 cents postage: aIea offer hundred different foreign stamps, catalogue. hinges; five cents. We buy stamps. Marks Stamp Go., Taranto. T.F. SCHOOLS AND COLLEGES THE DE BRISAYMETHOD is the Royal road te Latin, French, German, Spunish. Thorough mail courses. Students everywhere. Highest References. Academie De Bisaý Ottawa. ELLIOTT BUSINESS CQLLEGE; Toron- te, gives superier training for choice business positions; graduates eminently successful; open ail year; commence niov. Write for nev prospectus. 2-15 USE TOUR SPARE TIME-To fit ycu; for a better posltuou We teuch you ut home: Commercial Course (Baokketping, Arithmetic, Penmanship, Business Correspondence, Com- mercial Law), Shorthand and Typevriting, Beginer's Course, Journalismn, Special Eng- lish, Elementary Art, Mechanical Draving, Architectural Draving, Electricul Course, Engineering (Stationary, Traction, Gasoline, Marine, Locomotive, Automobile), Matricula. tion, Civil Service, eachers' Examinations or any subjec. Ask for what you need. Can- adian Correspondence College, Limited, Dept.i W.R.M., Toronto, Canadla. 3 HELP WANTED '-~$l WEEKY-.Eaily earned at home makig Icanescnt anties, whole or spare tue orkrs vnte luevery town. Write for particulars. Plant Mantle Ca., 109 Hociien Ave., Toronto. 6 EARN $15 WEEKLY AT HOME evenings, mailing catalogues for large Canadian Mail Order House. Representatives wanted in al cities, tovns and country. National Supply Company, Windsor, Ont 3 WANTED-Reliable parties to do Machine Knitting for us ut homne. $7 to $10 per week easily earned. Wool, etc., furnished free. Distance ne hindwance. For full particulars address: The Canadian Wholesale Distributin WANTED-Men and women, I will start you in the mail order business, makidg $500 a montb ut home in your sare time. No can-. vassing, previous cxperience, education or capital required. Particulars frec. N. Smnith, Box 292, Sarnia, Ont. 3 AGENTS-We want a live On1e i your locality to seIl our toilet soaps and famnily inedicines, 41i combination Packages. Greatest value ever offered, and some îold in every home. One hundred per cenýt profit for you. We have hundreds of other lines also. Write to-day for particulars, and price list. The F. E. Karn Comnpany, Limited, Cor. Quleen and Victoria Sts., Toronto, Ont. 4 GRAIN, ETC. CLEAN, REGISTERED RED PIF- 2 cents per pound, îacked. Isaac Bros. Aberdeen, Sask. Send for samples. T.F: MARQUIS WHEAT-2,000 bushels good i cean Marquis .%heat for sale at $1.00 per btishel. Saniple gent on rcqnest. C. S. Thomas, Hartney, 'Man. 3 ALFALFA SEED_-MfIlk River Valley grown-Montana native: 500 pounds $80); 100 lbs. $20; less 22c, Per Potund. èenuinej Grimun's: 100 Ilhs. $60; less 75c. Per Pound. Montana Yellow BlI ssOm: oz., $23; single 1seed 5C'; saMPles: 'Montana 21 o7. r. iim's 20z., Yellow 5 secds, :ai1lfor 25c . ddres. aMes Rummel, Gr0w, otc1Hrem M ontana, U.S.A. Cr t3t 1 ireI By ]E . Vialoux, Sturgeon Creek I N this Nortlhern elimate cf tuie Greater West, where the ther- mometer takes such icy dip!.,. ut thies and a snoawy mantie cevers the earth for months together, spring, in al its beauty, is hailed .with more real de- iigrt 'thin anywhere in the world. Se keen is our appeciatien cf its pleasures, anc of the spring -ventures, afferding much interest and pleasure ta a reui lover cf chicikens, is getting the liens set, an incubator Msarted, fittiug np thedittle whitewashed coeps and brooders in readinees for the tiny yeiiew andi black fluffy darlinga of chicken life soon'ta ap- peur from dezens of white and brown shelle. In Manitoba and the 'Western 'rvne consider the latter part of Matchquite sôon enough te set' any hens on an incubator. Early April is a gaod time te start the hutching process. spring seusen, and unless hens are set in a very coînfortable place eggs get chilled and liatches are pour. Tiien again, under ordinary conditions, the saute very early ehiceks, are diffleult to look after, either with their mother hens, or in a brooder. If the \"guid man\" will al- low such a tbing a warm cerner of the ew or horse hurn, makes a cosy home for baif a dozen hens during hatcbery, and if these hens are properly seen te undnet allowed te wander about and wo-rry animais, tlîey give ne treublé. Exhibition pair, bred and\" owned by Mrs. Cooper. If space wili.-permit, a row cf three te six nest boxes ceuid be put together by the ha:îdy memiber cf the family, cevered with a lid, and an extension miade in front of each, cevered witlî meslî wire for Biddy te streteli lier legs and feed and water herseif. Ail setting liens slsould have a regitiar timnie cf feeding. Af ter three or four nîernings I do net find it necessary te take tht-ni off. Just place the food iii liglit grit and w-ter and un-, cuver the nest ut a regîtîar hour. Eleven in the merning is ait excellent time for cliickens ta feed, and tweuty minutes is as long as a lien siîould be off; soîne- tinîeg tiîey rcttîrî to the -nest in ten mn utes. After--a littie training the hens wvill sec te tiîeir waîts. A dust bath is often reiished, anîd the caretaker need only look lu tesece ail is riglit in haif an' liotr's tinie. Thien cover tisent up for aniotiier twenty-four heurs. 0f coturse, îîo sensible man wili nîleir a heu ini lus stable withvermin ounlier, providing.she is '\"boxed up.\" But, thon, 110 une lias any riglît te set a lousy heu, and there is no excuse for liens huving vermni tpon them uat any tiîne. A ehîcekeii, inî pasrticuîiur, should be tiîoroug1î111V dusted witiî inseet powder before she is set, anîd onuce a week after- ivards dur!îîg intcubat ion. On nu accouint set aîîy liens in the laving peus, as the egg-S W-îhiget broken 'other bons iay in that uîest ~-ithout fuil wlien \"M,rs. ChlickePn\" is feediîîg. tlîus muddiing up the liateli. l\"\"011,thte wiiîteî' laving peu plenty cf broody liens. eait he selected by April first, or soine daYs before.' Tiese (IilZei-. Si101o(ullle nmade comfy in cîcau nîest boxes, liai f fild ith chopped k;ti'aw-, ehiuloîi.,,oft liay witlî a spriuik- 1ing of itiseet pow-der'aIl through the flIn.lollow- ont a nest und givo her some $l1hant eggs. I prefer a couple of hk. .1* the western Home Mwonthly 1 ý",
         "WînnPOIC, Marclà½ 191-L The western Home Mont hiy ýreek lis at ors thie P, in al real de- id. so esures, ffordiîîg a real ens set, le\"lititle lrs in d1 black Cto ap- brown Nos fera part of et nny il is a process. ;of our e set in ga get iains to look ens, or ili ai- of flie vhomo Ltcery, een fo ut and iblé. Exhibition hien, bred and owncd by 3Irs. A. Cooper, Treesbank. In gntluerîng eggs for lîafclîiug soc iiaf flue\u003e' are not ciilled; uin fc, if is h\u003est to colleet them tlîree finies a dav auJf plae fhem lu fray-s iun a roon about tit'dogrees in tenîperatuire. Turni fiicui 'l'eu\u003e'. day or so, aund sèt as soon as s M\u003e,-he. But îvlieuu filling a manauje a (îeek or feu days must lapse fo collect 'Ilouigli to starftlhe incubator. Wiîeit i be falit cheeju, leep is licardtu ntheb Iî'ttefirst Sound of, lire ch ve -en-grly--ook fR\u003c he l h leu caroe- fuli\u003e' Xlen, slie- lias liad lier morning ineal leave lier quiet for twenty-four liours or longer unitil al lihecl4icks are Ilatelied. Slie is quite capable of thrôw' ing ont discarded egg shelis lerseif. Pokînlg in flei îS't does more liarm tîjan igd.Leave fl icet anid lier ciuteh of elicks until tie\u003e'- are whnt is called \"4nest ripe\" before removing-4hem tofthc jetl ones, though, asé\u003c'ti slams\" are sud hiijthin fetonckaleW- 4 Select eggs for hatehiîig ptîuposes froin the liens thât have nof beci: focinfo earIy' wigter iayli[ig, mated tiI), as 1 dieted ina1ybruarýy's Chat. Piek ont Nelahaped eggs, bard and snooth in abeli. Rough-shelled eggs selbhnn batchi, ej.4otice. Discard 'vory aniail or-. v\u0026iy j.elggsanà'gFive ach lien, eleven egge, qite tooincuhate inuearly spriflg- In May a large lien cau cover and hatch thirteen fo fifteen eggs, as danîger fromn chilling bias passed by fliat date. 'May la realiyquite an ideal mont h for liatcbing chicens anywvhere, thougli it is splendid to secure some April hatchos if conditions are riglt on fthc farm. But in Nlay it seeins so easy to aet the chickensisnlua'iy outhouse or bandy corner. Wlien the oiicks corne ouf, flie coops oaa bc piaced on the ten- der green sward, wbore flîey get tlîeir \\ own taste of green-stuiff 5 necessar\u003e' for tlic heaif h of young chicks. When sitting hens bave been attend- Fing to business for sixteen or seventeeft days, the\u003e willI often become restless and rquire a littie attention during the lat week. Somtimes a Biddy will bop off bier nest and cackie berseif hdarse, and infect bier setting sisferhood and the cartaker wiii fiid «\"a groaf ado\" \u0026bout notbing, Then eomes the value of ciosed idoors, because, i f a hien gets ouf of doora when fbis fever of unrest is on 'ber, a pretty chase saeciili lead you. Eggs eau be candied viien set under lions in jusf the saine manner as in- cubator lots of eggs. Many handy testera are onùfthc market for a liff le price. 'A briglit soda biscuit fin with an egg-sbaped hole cut in thec aide with a caa opener, and a amail lamp set in the 'box makes a good tester, fthe bright tin refiecting the ligbf well. Even a novice caju soon learn to test oggs, A lifflE' practiceenableste operatrt e h embryo spot indicating flie \"chicken's oye.\" Seemingly fliere are f iny stream- ers atfachoed fo if, flhc tin\u003e' blood veina branching out f roin fhis centre. Aýn egg with the eye spot fixed to one aide is no good, as the mass should- bc fioating tlîrough the whiole egg, as if were. Theîî an egg wifh a blood-colorod circle around if nover hatelios ouf. The clear, infer- tile egga are very easy defected wifh just the yolk to ho seen in flic centre. Somo thick shlclod brown eggs are diii- culf fo test af first, but at fwelve f0 fourteen daya the growth eau be rendu\u003e' detecfod. The first candling is donc from tlic sevent h to eiglîfh (la\u003e. These tesfed ont eggs miake good fecd wiîcu boilcd bard and iixed with bread crumnhs for the uvon liekens Iter on. When several liens are s, t at one finie and the eggs festod at one0 week, usuali\u003e' oîîe lben caiu be sot on a f reali bafch of eggs, when all infertiles au-e reinoved, lus saving a litfle fime.' if yonng peuople are fo develop nat- urali\u003e', if flic\u003e are to make full lise of fiueir social as wîel as their litelee- tuail pohh'\u003cr, if flue\u003e arc to be sati6lied wifh fheir surrouuidiuigs, flic\u003e' uîusf bc proî'ided witiu suitabie opportunîties for social mniuuinig anuhrecreat ion l grouîps. Tiis is îafure's wav; tlire is neofliher W'aY. The scîjool niglît and sîould .1 Iord flîls, opportoiiity. Tiiere is not flic least reasoa viv flue scîtool huild- îuîg, -lien if i-tadaptcd b fuhis ipurpose. sliotild uot bic the commxonnelior liood meeting place for A sort s of y'oiig Ipeopie]\u003es parties, picuiies. enter- ftinuuielut-s, atiîietiv coiteýsts, anîd every otîter forma 4)f amusueenît apprved in te coniiiiiiiitN. Sieua u-e of te 1îniprojueif\u003e w'oild iif large meturiîîs te tte conu. mnuit ' v for flic -mail addi tiona I expense rt-iluii. t wouîiIlSuve Iotweld. tue -i-boul ait(] coiuttilit \\ m uelcosely to- gether. It would vastly cliaîge the atti- tude of -thec-Young tinvard 'tire --qltoo'l. t vould Bave mueli of thie dissîîfisfac- tion of yowng people witit the lhf of tlie farm. if would prove a greaf. sae- guard fo youtfliful iiiîoral*. 't would lead flhc coninhuîity îtse.f to a nov seuise of ifs dufv, toward tlic social life of flic young, and' to a niew% concept 'of the sliool as a part of flic coninunity organizaf ion. Finally, tlus broadq,îîed service of thle scliool to ifs communit\u003e' wouuld bave a reflex influence on thle sehiool ifself, vitalizing, ever\u003e' departmnt of ifs activifies, amit giving it a ncw vision of ifs opporfunif les. ''lie first obstacle tbat wiii appear lu flic way of sucli a plan is thle inade- qnacy of flic presentý type of country seltoolhhousc. And flua is a seuious niat- fer; for the barren, squaliâ, lit fie building of ftle puesent dav woîiid nover fit into such. a puoject. But t bis type of sclioolitouse munst go-las going. -It is a lîundred ycars belîind our civiliza- fion, anîd wlîolly in - lequafe fo presen.t needg. Passing for inter discussion fle* method b\u003e' wlicl these buildings are to be supplanfcd b\u003e' flicbtter on-es, lot us consider furtlîer the dctaiii~ of flie plan for nîtking theuc shool flic neigliborliood cenfer. First of ail, enclu scliool must supply a larger area and a grenter nuimber of people flan at presenf. It is financially impossible fo erect good buildings tothe number of onr prosent sciiools. Nor are there pupils enough iific thsmrall district as nov organized fo make a sclîooh, nor people enongli sucessffully to use flic sehool as a noiglohorliood conter. Let cao-h townslhip, or perliaps, some- what amaller area, selecit a central, well-adapted site and thereon ereef a modern, -well-equipped sciîooi. building. But flis building mîust not be just flic traditional sachool-hiouse viflu ifs clnss roomsandm rows of desks. For it is to ho more than a place viiore thlic li- (Iren iwill study and recite leseons from books'; if is to ho the place where al f1h8 people of tAe neighborbood. oid and young, ivill assemble for c'ntertainment, amusement and instruction. Heu-e viii ho held community pienies, social enter- ,tainments, yonng people's parties, le- fures, concerts, dehafing contests, agri- cultural courses for the farmers, scliooh. progranus, sprcadeannd banquets, and wliatever cise nul\u003e' bolong fo flic corn- mon social and infellectuai life of flic conininit\u003e'. Tlîe modern rural scbool building viii, therefore, ho bome-like as 'ellias school-like. In addition fo ifs cînss roons if viii contain an assembl\u003e' rooni capaulle of seating several bnndred people. The scafing i6f fuis room nîay ho removable su, tilat flic floor can he cieared for social piîrposes or fthc rooni used for a dining rooni. One or fwo smaller rooms viii be needed for social functions, club and comxitfee meetings. Tiiese moinis slîould ho made attractive wif h good furniifîro, rmga, couchesa an pictures. Thîe building viii contaipi well-oquippo(l lalioratories for manuni fraining and domestie science, flhc latter of wiich will ho fonnd serviemhie ini coniiection wiflu scrving pienica, \"spreads\" and flie like. The enfire building siuîd ho arciiitecturilly a t tract ive, wol l-lieated and venti lated, conimodions, well furnislîed, and decor- ated vifh good piefuires. In if slould lie housed a lilîr.ry confaining several tliousand 'ivei seleeted books, besides nmagazines anîd newnspapers. The lali- oratorios' and cquipmnit sliould ho fully equal to tiiose fouîid in flic fowu achools, but slioîld ho- a4upted fo flic work of flic-rural sciiool. The grounuds stirrouinding ftic rural sclîool buildings can ea-,ily be ample in area, and heautiful in outiook anîd dec- oration. I1Tere will lueflue îîeigiiborlîood atlilefic grounids for bof I boys and girls, slmde froos for pienies, fiowers and slirubs, and grotînd ciiotigl for a scliooi garden OflnOted vitliflic instruction in agriculture. «Nor is if f oo niuch to helieve fliat flie district wiil in the future ereet on flic seliool grounds a cottage for flic principal of ftle scool anîd lus famil\u003e', and flîns \u003c\u003eter an n(i(i- tioiiah indiwenient for strongr. able nien to devote flîcir cirgeto oduiation la the rural cnruîîis Ncw. ,contrasf ti s sclioolliouio ti m equ ipnien t with tliec tvlpical rural buîld- iiîg of flhe present. Aýdjoiniîîg a pros- perous farîn, ~vith ifs large hoîî~e, its ci.e Your tumto FR Mr. Delano tool bis own medicine- It cured -lis rheumatismn after lie lad suffored tortures for thirty-six years. Ho apent thousands of dollars before he discovered the remedy that cured him, but Iwi»gu 0 o the benefit of his experience for o ing.Y\u003eu If you sufer fromn rheumatism lot mo sond you a package of this remedy absolutely free. I)on't send any mouuey. 1 want to give it un youî. I want'you to see for yourself what it wiII do. The x-ray picture shows how rhictmatisni t wists and' distorts the bottes. Mafzyle you are suffering the sanie way. Dont. %*ou dont ieed to. 1I have the remedy that 1 helieve -,iii cure yen and its yours for the u-kintg. M'rite nie to-day. F. H. Delanio, 328-MI Delano BIdg .,Syracîuse, New Yerk, and I wUilst-nd ynui a fruec jackagc the very day 1 get your letter. '-'y' v Exhibition pullet, bred' and o wned by Mrs. Cooper. witing coop. Thon flic bungry mother lien vanta good feeding and a drink bo- fore she ia put in to cuddle fle. young f ry for aniof ler twenfy-four hours, wlîeu flic\u003e are ready for their fist feed of crumba. I covor flic coop over vîth a snck for the firaf day to keep fhem quiet. A fow emarks in regar' fo Tumkey breeding mny ho usoful to Thie Western Home Montlly readers. Turkeys sbould be mated lu carl\u003e' spring, Dot Iter flan Marc Ic sf to 15th. In selecfing \"a Tom,\" a bird of medinni veiglît froinitwenty fo tweiîty-flve pounds is to be preferred fo a linge creaf u-e of thirty to fort y pounda. ns a large .gobhlcm soinofinues will kili a tumkey hoen. One Tom to ciglit or feu furkey lions is fhec luit for a breeding pou. Excopt linflic coldest veatiier, fur- koys noed ahi flic liberty f iey eau be givon witli safef\u003e', as flic\u003e are wild crea- f ures lu habit. EarI\u003e' in April flic\u003e' iili begiuu to la\u003e', and 1 find if good roomy\u003e nesf s, sucli ns an oid barrel stnkod and placcd on ifs aide, lîif filled wifli sfmaw, etc., are placed lunflic tnrkevs' winfer quarters, fliclbons viii probàbl\u003e' nuke use of fbei. 0f course, 'if flîcre is a sfraw stack or lia\u003e' rick lunflic stable vard thie liens wil) likel\u003e' nesf fiiore, as flue\u003e' dean\u003e' love to sf cal thîir nests na\u003e' froua flic wntclifil oeeof nman. low- evor, lanflic damp sprnug-finîe utostof flic turkey eggs can bc found. 1 oftfen savc 9 or 10 turkcy eggs anîd give tlîem to a large broody ,oniinuon'1ien to liaf cl anid hrniu p Nithu good success. If a fîîrkey hoen hegins fo la\u003e' ver\u003e' carlin the li season, shie can bc broken up caqiiy. Wlien hecomuîîg hroody and af- fer a couple of wvcoks ivill mv nioflier quota of tliirfeen eggs. Turkey eggs are genemali\u003e' îost fertile, iîatcling well. Came îîîusf b used ini nating. Thîe Tom anud liens inuisf not ho akin at aIl for hoat resulf s ihrceding. ýSocial Centre of thé Rural School y Mrs. hree fo ber b\u003e' !overed de in ,ire fou- d and slould Af ter find if t pince Md un-, Eleven me for utes is soune- lu ton ris wvili s offen oni\u003e' af an up for I allioi Dn lier, , thon, sy hon, having me. A Id ho powdcr :aff or- Lcont as ftie ns let \"rs. ing up ut\u003e' of Apil Tlise fv iu hoppd 3prink.- rII flue vo heu- ple of peromp an, hi-n :î:slare lise itio bouses anîd aIl the equipnicnt necessary to moderit farming is thle littie sclhool- bouse. It is an dilapidated sheil of a rectangitlar box, -barren of every ves- tige of beaîîty or attractiveùiess both insidé and out. At the rear, are two outbuildings wliiclî'are. an offinae to decency and a ùeiiace to morals. itiin the schoolliouse the piin.ted walis are dingy with srnoke and grime. The win- dows are broken and dirty, no picture.s adoru the walls. The floor is wash ed but once or twice a vear. Thbe room is beated by an ugly box of a stove, and ventilated only by nieanr of windows whiclh frequently are nailed shut The grounds present a wvilderness of weeds, rabbish, and piles of ashea. It in al an outrage againat the righta of 'the country child, and an indictment of the intelligence and ideals of a large pro- portion of _ýur people. If it is said that the plan proposed to renedy tbis,-eitation is r\"yQLwti4~ it wiii be admitted. What our rural schools- of to-day need is not iinprove- ment but re-organization. For oniy in thia radical way can theX b. made a. factor in the vitalizing and couaorvifg of the rural community which, unless some new leaven is introduced, la auroly destined to disorganization andl decay. Grandtather TMme John Drew the aetor, told the follow- ing atory at'the Playeri' Club: A young married couple were inoving f ront ler mothýr's to a cozy ipartment three blocksawaay. The bride .afd to lier husband, \"Jolîný,doar, 1, swr$yeau- not trust the vanmen to carry..gtnd- father'a dlock. You viii carrTy It for me, won't you ?» John domurred, but cou'hented flnaily. The day vaàot. Mben John reached the firat corner ho found hie was being folloved by'a man. It irritated bim, but lie kept on, ths perspiration trickling dowu bip cheeks, the six-foot clock beld tigirtly betwee bis arms. The sanme man vas watch- ing John at the next corner. \"WVby are you foliowing me?\" y lIed John. \"Wby,» aaid the stranger, \"'m tr-ving to figure out vhy you don't carry a watch instead.\" Ilappiness in in reiish, not ia things; if in b\u003e' having what vo like that vo are happy, nof in lîaving what others like.- Dr. ilenry Van Dyke. It is more from c arelesaness abolit truth than from intentional lying, that there is so mucli faisehod in the world.- Elbert Ilublard.",
         "Western Home Monthly Winnipeg, Maaich, 1914. ~T fa' not withÉout -moome justification jtbat the Winnipeg Bonspiel is called the gteatest sporting event in the Vold. Teounderstand this, it is but aoeesary to visit the Granite Rink on the openin. day of the great competi- tion. Outsmle the rink will ho seen a daman sàeighs lad a mrail army of men, fr. .Roblîu.mthe VetSmn boeîet t c he àgnital CudhingAmociatio, and father of th Wimlip.g Booepiel Who are loading and unloading the «rocks.» Crawding into the building are \"Tu~es of jolîy-look-ing men-bright and enthusiÂtic-many of wlîom have corne te participate ia the fun; others ta ob- serve the play from points of vantage in the spaeious galleries. At tlîe ring of the bell there appear on the ice seventy-two, stalwarts, each armed with T. E. Poole (2) Tmus Johnson (1) the ,eustoxnarv broom. _. Then, after 'lreping the rocks andnîarking thei6 M ite tags« and ribbons, the word is given ta begin. Plandemonium reigne! None but a devotee of the game eau make anything out of the- strange ex- pressions. \"In turn! - Tee weight! - Take a littie more ice !-Keep vour eye on the broom!-Noir, just a ight hack! -Don't throw yourself off!-Take this wick and be over! -A long gitard naw, just over the hog !-W'e'Il sweep yen! - Hold your hand, nian!-Be cainn!- Take him through the hiouse !-Sweep, -men, -\u0026eep!-Well -tried -Carry .iiin through! -Just enough to change places! --Canny, noo !--Hold your lîand !-Take the port and draw ta the but ton! -Oh, yo'ecaught a broom! -O-ood shot! eour salary's increased !-You're a brgw ourler!\" Sa it continues for two houri and a half-witbout cessation. Men seem ta be 'running everywhere, shout- ing, sweeping, naw looking anxious, now exultant. Sametirnes a atone cornes dowii the ice slowly creeping, with Men polish- ingLthe ice as if it were the costiiest harware floor, now running se fast thal. it looks like a bullet from a ship's can- non. And when the gaine ends there is a shaking of hands ail round-a pioni hope of another meeting-a kind wislî that the winners may go through ta the finals, then a drink of bovril and a sand- wich, and a long ride on thîe cars to reacli the next battIefleld. For the Granite'is but onîe of many rinks. Net seventy-two, but three bundred anti twenty players are at work in the city during the flrst draw. Thege give wa'y ta another contingent, and these te still a third. Altogether tiiere are about nine hundred curlers in thi.% great bonspiel, and it is the hope of everyone that he may reach the finals ini one or more of the competitions. Who are these curlers and whence do they corne? From Wininipeg, Branîdon and Portage la Prairie, froîn every towvn in. Manitoba, froîn the cities and towns of Saskatchiewan aind Alberta; froin far- distant, Yukonu; froin Fort William and l I.. ''it-ler (3) j. Alohnison su. McLaren Cupy-Wouî by Johinsonx o? l3ldur, Man r n s L W. N. Budge (1) Geo. Richardson (2) A. McConaghy (skip.) Geo. Richardson (3) Eaiton Tropliy-Won by McConaghy of Neepawa, Man. jPort Arthur, froin the towns and cities now planning plays, nnw cauitioning and *Iof Ontario, froin Duîluth, St. Paul and encouragiîig ech other. -Nor i§ there otlier American curling centres - yes, any cessation of interest and no cou- and sometimes froni the parent land cession of vietory îîntil the last stone is r 1where the first curlers were bred, anîd thrown and the sijouts go up for the wlîere tbey stili play the gaine in the winner. spirit of true sportsieii. It is the cnn If it sliould be urged that there is Scotelinian wlîo is ever the real en- great loss of turne when 900 men spend' Lthusiast in tlîis best of gaines. ten days in useless sport it lias only ta And why the best of gaines? Because be pointed eut that for many of tiiese it is clean and sociable; because it (le- 900 men this is tlîcir only holiday. Most ýelops many qualities; because it is a of tlîem are liard at work in offices or in gaine for old anîd young, rich and poor. butsinesses of varions kinds throughout It is the înost denicratic and the imost the wihole year, and here they get their aristocratie of ail the gaines of men. Lt necessary oîîportuîiity for relaxation and is clean, in tlîat it nsIl tolerate no0 garnb- for niingling witlî their fellom-inen in a iîig, no0 cheatiîig. Anîd wlîeu players non-coinîîîeîcial pursuit. And what a are at work, driîking is alinost wliolly relief it is fron office strain and husinèss unkown Ltis ociblebecuseiLworry to spend a couple of hours on the tlraws togethier in a frieîîdly way ail ice! Tiiere are 192 stoties tlirown everv classes, crcc(ls aund natioiîalities. Lt de- gaine. The intcrest is slîifted 192 turnes. velops rnaiîly qualit îes becatîse eveN '~woeatninl ie otî tn goaodlisotawaysa gnodrd fior se- yduring its course down the ice. The play- goo siot iîdan ncoragng r sin-ers litcrally forget homne and friends; patlietic remark for cvery bail one.. The hyfrebuissadplts.Ty Qecaionl \"roti(ýi\" wo a proid es are in the gaine for ail it is wortlî. They garded witlî aiuseicut. He'poie are clîildreîî once more. No one can (liversioli that is a Il. inesure the menîtal rest that is found And wlicn onie reiiienibers that everyinpangasreofam ud uh yearthe-%vloleof Ciia r ien l-re-ii conditioins as prev'ail at Winnipcg, and frieniffl rivalry, tzîatt tliese fre . r-the work 15 50 strennuîs tliat the latioiîs are exteiuîded ini equal Iýicsurie hselbnftaradie yevy to ilie visitors froii aeross tiie liuîe*'; l)liescr bnfisaeamttdb.v ~vleî oîe ecsa în of~~ctciîîs\"ply- Wîîen thîe curlers cone to town they iîîg against a riîîk of 'ýkidis,-« or fatiiers bri.îg with flîem a host of friends. playiiig against tlîcir sous; wieîtliyPoal ouerfv loua vstr see city liiied iii)agaiîîst counItr*y, or Poal'furo .etouadvst distrit agaîîst istrit tlare i n on i iithe city. It 15 a tie of conven- disric aaiistdisritt tereisbor tonsanl Metngsofail kinds. Thougli out of it a]l a feelin1g of friciîls'lîiP tliat Lions nie t in afai ag iy.cn tune canhiot olliterate. For iL k a i e- tiigo-, ure famlinpo inarkable tîîing in iitîis curling that nîost pe taiîigote a art er of a million pto- of tlîcse layers ean reeal ail thîe pIeseiL wofi.l lardw liube epete tat ue critical shots of ail tlîeir gaines. Tlîcy peseîe of*iita fetosndeopnterest in cati talk tîhein oNer wiitliev go bile fi.Bts ra sfi neetl andi(la thi i .t hï eliiîe, this national winter gaine, and so nîîîchl yexplai itleu il tlow tlial chilîen. attention is devoted to ,iL in the news- would have been difl'erent, onlv, if!ý papers. tlîat tliere is a, positive lotncli- Tiier arefourileas about tuie eitv after the lasL gaine Tbr ar ou lra îîiîîi* lis tit iol andfas eti'nlplaýYed, and tlîe curlers have _U tw vld o a ettinedto tlîeir homes. wneek the great inia 'jorit v of tlli r inlks Th lsfotieBnpladte haefalîcu by ftue wzak,iàe aiffl libr u lusfrtu 3npe n u ellilirrviî u ot of the details, involve a e ,u iiî aire left t o bat ti a Ioiîg, 1111.- \"i ead~l of lahor. For nonths befoîe- h,1.1 îîdi tiiei eîj ,jiev gtheeî* v ý î iiîs districts in Westerni a iadi la ebeen plav iîg down tbe Ai\u003c loli l r ti iniof 111 Mir- uies. ,ti-oiîg committees lhave mile of thîe rivat 'uip ituî~Agaz- 1i('e'11 at wkiiakiiig ail arrangements iflg\" i'(iwtlof \\.IllP i u o1ii /i. a iiîî,li is f(,,-ie, tia nll,îIotatin iof rocks. tlîe houas- 001 doe Oui II 1th e i, a ig of the pacrand tlie order of the îiiîor appîî,(\u003e il iii a Ia1V ail uo11îîhîti îîi ý. iffI ;il] tiis lias becri doiie 11C-i uiiLIhe 1(1ii- \\iii i taÎ()tile 1Tiler tue iie t of thie veteran plaver filev ; îrîest, 1 lu\u003elOiv S'(iietarJ .Rb't idiiigeveîy ulu 'P \u003c e w lia iLIS beeliary. .1. P. Roct- li -'t -i WinuiPeg, March, 1914. ,âne Wmteg»n Home, monthly",
         "Winniipeg, Irh, 1914. The ýWe'stern h'Iome IitÔnwôthly- Bonspiel aubce the earIy dPy,ý amfi Who is alwayS.V accorded the honoi. of ieadliîg off in the veterau's game. cl ean is the sport, andl so bonoreil by the players and the people generaliy,. that it is conBidered by weailtik nen of the comflmgnity-and.I by higlis.oliciiis to be ain honor to present cups amui prizes. yct, the curiers seem to set littie value on these prizes except as inemneutos Whether it be a goid Watch or a ladys fan it is ail the saine to one of tlie con. testants. He is happy if lie can oniv take home some symb;AO of ictory-. Tlimer is scarceiy a town in Western Canada that does not po sess one or more tropbies. When yd'ung curlers look at thtese aind then tlkink of ice feliowshili and the juy of c9mpetition thbat go withl thse witining, it la no wonder that they platce it ainong the first, of titeir ambi- t ions to go sonie day to the big city to take part in the annual bonspiel. Every Man Is N.ecessary Remenîber, we are aliretty, much alike. That ia to say, aithough. we differ ip appearance, we are the same in suibstance throughout. Go a moment, ini imagination, to an orciîestra during the interv'a1 whiie ail the instruments lie on the seats deserted by the-players. Look around upon those mut crea-_ titres of* brass and boxwood, of ivory and silver. 13ome are plain and cheap. others are gilded and c9stly. Some are worn with yeurs and some are new from the maker. Even now you have a. kind of quspidion that the less showy onee may be the more valuable. flow curious their shapes, how skilfnl their construction! Yet with -ail the measure- less - variety, and ailthe inarvellous range of intrieate combination they haveý each the same limit of reach., AI the musie, is produced from the mere eight notes to the octave. You think there are too many of one kind or too few of another. But when the per - formers return, and the grand chords begin swelling again, you are con- vineed they were grouped by a wisdom higher than yours. They are ail- neces- sary to each other. Tbey cannot afford to be jealous. And so, no ulatter whether thse Iarmouy iQý strun- for the Plaintive dirge or the brilliant. song- ail are obedient to tihe rod of the master musiciali wio- guides tbem. It takes everybody to niake a worid. We are al môie alike tian unlike, and are ail ne- cessary to thse making up of hstory and humein work. 0 mountain-crested Sctlaâd! 1 marvel not thou art Dear as a gracions niother unto thy chli- dren's heart! 1 marvel 'not they love thee, thou Land of rock and gien, Of lake, and strathî, and moustain; asid more, of gifted men! -Mary Howitt TED Top Greater Convenience-G reater Satisfaction Yourfing -do not touch the sap.Yougap it by the me1W1 cp minwhich, the- stick is tlrmly fatstened, rub it gently oveS the kSc, which lias pev elybeen m 'ne and then -return :the -Shaving Stick to its nickeled contaitieet- The HlolderTop permits :ySu to use the stick down 1 the, last avoi1ab1 bit% with- perfect. ease and cë\u0026enien THE SAME GOÔY\u003e QUAITrY Williamis' Savig Stickeld o Wîlliams' Shaving Powder \"'ck'djoen Williams' Shaving Cream (ini tubes) A sample of any one of these four shaving preparations will be sent postpaid for 4,-- in stamps THE J. B. WILLIAMS COMPANY9 Dept. Av Glastonburyq Conn. WILLIAMS' JERSE-Y CREAM SOAP and out~ extensiye lune of Toilci soaps have the same softening, creamy, emýlient qualities that bave made Williams' Shaving Soaps sa, famous. Ask your dealer for them i îg and t here a oil- One is Iar the ere is spend, nly to these Most ior in Ighout ;their in and n in a 'hat a isinèss Dn the e ver v times. stone play- iends; They *They ýecan folund r sssch r, and L tihe every they iends. sitors rnven- hough ý Con- i peo- It the wolild e-st inl nilisel news- oieli- gaine have 1 tihe IV(, a ýfo se- ,Sterni É tbe have nent s hoius- f the done la ver sert- i the JI",
         "t1he Wester\"n Home. Monthly n-ie--Huarding'.o.f.the aes By Frederlok Hail SE'' f\u0026M Aë 1Ie tter-and thée êext tow n ta sco a patienlt, and Joel ~8IiSdi i i inside pooket., walked withhimttoe station, shook Vlsa u~y: hands 'vitit* hlm and stood watcbi ng as «I 1m\"Ve for Denier, Priday,,sud vin the~ train pulled siowly out. On the roar gtbp wtMorris, t. tslk things oper with platform two men, appnrcutiy tourists, * woro standing, and as they were whiried jeu toht toséwors ean muh:past, asesrap of their conversation NI for ene thing, thqy repmsonted aimost reached bis ears- 'tIé c«e secret that ho haci ever kept \"-Simply depeuds on whether dry frouzisamother. farming-\" and the e mot as loat lu the YRactopeda moment at the barn door rumblo of the.train. te\u003e look strass tho corn aud vheat fields, BuXt the haif dozen words stuck in bis '*ItbtÙt bunoth tho fire. hoat of the imenxry and ail tho way home, whlenever ~ 0.m\u003eeomaddld Pinto and ho vas flot pondering what Dr. Camerýon the ton-mile race te Morris. had said, ho was wondering what \"dry gret .eventa in Joe13. 1f. lad farming', mighit mean.? ~\"~rthatho ais sventeen: \"Mfôtbor,\" asked Joel, as ho sat down -e ~jtb-e-h1efsbr ad the othoz e xtrmrnig -the ,reakfast, table,- ~tb* ishlmowuheart. Ro morne- \"what's dry farming?\" k~gt the oee ad corneat the \"I don't knaw,\" aime answered. \"What 1f4t hi at ho mfht haveete k makes ypu ask ? I da't think I over 1*-'bart\u003eeothr, loi Joollved 1ma aberdç f t hefore.\" e 4îé. loi tat,-bad l-eft -the 2*0 si a 'lmlaid upoX\u0026 thé bues, voew 4 a heavy I oad 7e - for EW=ram HRt4% iliy had Êoved luw AhM1ear, dyair ofth~e bd onc 50zttMe for th0w 1 hid-aLivuuî dded months ef life te tb!l6pfufai1ing man. .1t vas that hadkept tp their hoarta duriug t frit t»o crs of drought ' wheui o setties ad *Ïve*ufup-sud \u0026q5 -so longas.fte.eeiWilnd 3\"$sluever -fie endasn n avél, mybéthe Harts eau stick it out V They'veo \u003ct mouey baek Esat.\" i t only Joci sud bis mother knew hou' meager vert those ceateru e- soue, or how heaviiy they hld been drafru upon. Tncame their.year of 'plenty, with- lts l,eurous raina, vbon the father, in his: whoel -chair upon. the parcli, eould look serau ilds ripenin; ta an ahund- a»Él arveat sud, lu a voice which grew e\u00264,i day wqkez, would talk of the gaod timMs vhioh veret omiug, when ho shoilffdoeesmore ho el and stroug; Vhe ,,,\" sp of drought hadl piainiy been ex- ePtions, the sali was as fertile as any Wtu whorled, proaprity had corne ta stay'; aud Joel sud bis mother, who saw on1eý ta. ciearly the end that vas em- iug- se quickly now, encouraged hlm in al bis hopeful prophecies. The autumn's iel: barvest had been gathered iu, vinter bad passed'and thon had corne exactly sucb: a spring as they had known those fimt two yenrs. Dry vinds swept for days acrosà tho prairies; thon. was gelant rain in May and ai- Winners at th~eN mout noue lu June. Wlien Juiy carne, C. R Hudson (2) f!eu ,could se that naothing but speedy A. N. Fidier (3) arn! ahundant ain could save even a Governor-General Cup (grand aggregate)- fraction of their crops. -,%\"I heard twa people talking about it \"We'1i ho ruined if it does't ain,\" yesterdny, and I tlougit maybc* it vas Joel ssid ta aid Dr. Camneron, ta whom hie somotbing that ivouid belp us:\u003e\" hadgant for advice and comfort. 'We \"I think it's, cfiickeîis,» announced cauidn't soul for the cost of aur build-. Sadie. ings.ý It isn't nîysoif; in yotnng and Jool and lis motiior lauglîod, for it vas strang sud I eau tarit a living aîîywhert; a faîuily joke tiîat the poultry nlwa3-s but mather hasn't the boa ltlî she used ta paid, no matter wlat the season, but the have, and Ruth: and Sadie, thcy'rc littie. nnswer di\u003cl mot satisfv Joel. They can't vork, and it caîît hoctiat they \"1I Wonder if ii-I#l Franîk vouhi are ta ]ose ail tiit tieir father saved for know ?\" hie asked. them wben hie as well anîd strong. And \"Tl ask hlm, the next tinime 1 write.\" timon, at the worst, ive are better off his motimer proînised. titan others; there are dozens, yes, lîun- But whlen trie answer came it proved dreda vimo wilI sufer more than wo tlîat Uîîclc Frank knew uothing wlat- aima Il eî-or about dry fanîning. Hol couid omly \"Hjave you lever rend of. the men Who guess tlîat it must mnean farming with- are cultivating parts of the ahiara?\" out watcr, which îvas, of course. (Jiite said Dr. Cameron, suddeîîiy iooking up at alîsurd; and meanwhile Joel's lilqimiieýs tht boy, \"Now tiiese western plains aîioîîg time neighbors liad miet with ino thoy rnay have beoit meant ta ho btter succeas. irriÈated, or tiîey inay ho best adapted About' twa weeks after bis talk îvit]m ta crops that you have uot tmîed.\" Dr. Cameron a stranger cailed at Joel's 'It's ail es6 new,\" answered Jool. \"¶No, hose. His costume was a dark grill I imvr iooked at it tiat way before. kiiiekerbocker suit aîid legg ngs9. A pal*] l'il-l'il have ta think it out. It-\" of glasses cxtremnely concave made hi-i hoe hesitated-\"it QAiows me up somne.%eves seeinta protrude like tiiose of 50111e lt's like tht paabie in the Bible abolit great imnsect, and the reseniblanco wva. the housos, somewhiere the floods have heigliteîîed by lus largo head and slliglit. corne and the winds ioîv. 0f course nîy wir:y figur-e. Ilo vas caîîvassiuig for il -bouse has got to ai nd. ail ight, only book, aimd, hecause strangers were rare. -\", h is voice died out and for some le was made weicoinî and.sat for tweitN moMents ,ho sat sulent. J tuumnut es ivomiiig tpoit the merits (; Dr. Canrnron had biai a lîurry caîl to luhs voloîmme. ''lime îecisioii thiat it Nvas not heat for them ta buy ho rcceived with a quit\" surprising gond gmace and fortlwith rase ta, go. -It scouts ta bave been a prettY bad year for cropa, ail througli tis section,\" lie remarked, as ho descondod thýe stops. \"lt's,.àa lack of ain,\" said Joel. ««How muchà have ýou had et\" \"'None ta speak of sinceMay.\" The straïker took out as iitle note book and consuited it. '*You'vo hadfourteen inches in the.last yenr r\" ho aaid. Jool made no epiy. \"TIwelve luches are eout ~hta çrIFaw forty bushels of whent to t ie acre,' ho went on, \"and in that field it doesn't look as if you'd get ton. Von iîaven't used thet min; you've wastod it.\" The stranger ended with a amile, ai Joel mnight bave etorted angrily. After bis montlîs of umremitting labor, it was not pleasant to find hiaeif aceused of -heingythe- author of is\"wnmiafortunes. \"How bave Ï wasted it ?\" ho ed Tht strauger replied by putting an- other question in a quick, nervaus tono: \"Did yau ever write ta the Agieul- Winnipeg flonspiel. H. J. KeIlberg (1) C.. M. Hudson (skip.) -Won by G. M. Hudson of Kenora. Ontario. tumal Departmnit about yo:îr troublies, nia v I ask T\"* \"N, nsî!red Jool. \"e twr \u003caiiI it w-ou ld 't do aiîy good.\" \"vrvisit the Agiiultural College at \"Evor visit ane of timeir inodlel farnus?\" \"Votu'%e a himcd manT\" \"cDo You lise a sub-soii packer T' 'No.\" \"D)ry fariniiîg-\" Amni tîmem of a qndden Jeel fell uponf tiiat book agent and seized lii, as if hlie feai-ed tliat fieîîiimlt take to lii, Ieelu ' mm seaipe down ithme road. \",Sec lîcre,\" lie exehtinied. \"Wliat i,, t11- fiî * , le hee1)iVItryimîg for i- iîts 'liev soit uloNvil (on, te steps anîd taiked. Aft;er a vhmile thme 'v iii-.andi îvaikced ab)out fi-ni onie par-t of the farni to an. othmir. inspeetimg and i (îseaus-ng it. imot hi-ding Ille i ie, whîile thme Siu i k lower amndI ov-r ini tii,-westvn iskvY. WIIIere 'did o 1111fltM li? a-kî-d Joil, a-i Hie to ihiglut hegauilta, (-o,- about themni. 'Wl i't uVi, a y. 'Tia sort of umussiommarv --nigi, i mweelie strigerm. 'h teail ut Waîua. iii. vitis is sni Otinteamiso ii -z '-. -i Winnipeg; March, 1914. tramping the country and seliing books ta pay expenses.\" \"fCorne ln, and have Borne supper,\"1 sa*i Joei. SEldredge Brewster accoPtéd the invita. tion ang stayed the%' night. Every moment- thaât wav flot sPont in aleep -,vas lapent in carneat conversaationl, and.WSvhen lie ieft next niorning, Jool walked with' hlm'down tho dusty road- a mile or more. 111i Beiid \u003eyou the booksand the tool catalogues,\" said bis new found friend. at partiug. \"You'il want ta read it Up. It wouidlp.too if yôu woui1d came to the college and see one of our model farms. Il ever you get 'stuck' write to me ard 1VIl caine or'send somne one, but ln the main, ail you noed Is ta réxnem- ber a few simple things. There's Tain enough, this section bas always had Tain enough, if only it ls kept from running off the surface and evaparatîng. Ta Bave it you must keep your suh-sal packed and your surface, yaur.soul muich; pul- verized.- Begin inÀthe apring. as soan as the graund is dry enaugh te lot you on it, follow your plow witk the sub-soil paeker and the disk harro*. Harrow af- teroevery rain. Save the vater, don't let it get away from you, that's the- secret of the wliole thing. Keep the work up il summer and if, as you say, you have the monoy ta skip a crop that yoar, and givo your time and, energy ta getting your sou inuto the right condition, there isn't a reason la the worid why, after that, you shouidn't bave good. crapa every year. Y ou won't need ta dopend on the we«ther. The work will ho hard and atoady, dry Trming iras nover invonted for a.az in but you and your bired man wili bo she ta do it, with perhaps another horso. It la the rosuits you are aftor, and whon you coaeta try it, yoiu w'ill fid that yau use lesa aood aud get bigger crops than you'did theolad way, evon in the best yoars. 0f course the irrigation ditch would heip even a dry farmer, but, as you say, youwon't get that for soine years yet.\" They shook: banda and Eldmedgo Brewster set off down tho rond. Thoen, w.hen lhe had gone a haif dozen roda, hoe. tumned and came back. \"«Just one thing mare,\" he* said, «'don't b. talked out of this. If it wasn't s pathotie, it wouid ho funny, tbe way tbe old Uino farmers stick ta the notion that ijiothods which were good in Illinois, and Ohio, aud New Englaud, must ho good hore, aud nover stop ta con sider that thero they had twice the Tain fail. rve ta-lked to such men, and mon who knoev ton tîmes what 1 do about dry farmiing have Otaiked, and lectured ta them, and shown tbem resuits, and stili they keep o* in the samne aid way, year nfter ycar, aud fail. The hope of the country lis in the young men. Don't give this up, or 'b. talked out of it. l'il pay the expi'nses if you fail; oniy if you do as I say, you won't fail. GondI-bye.\"l And this time lie ivas really gone. Joel set ta work as soon as the books came, meading tliem eveningsand at odd moments. lus mother joined hl-n in the study and later, after their filds had been harvested, and, as anticipntod, had pro#ed aliiost a total faiiure, she la- sisted that lie foiiow Mr. l3rewster's sug- gestion and i-lisit tIiý Agricultural Col- lege and model. farin, at Wapnhoe. That week's trip va-s to Joel a revela- tion. Coing over the grounds of the col- lege, withi his friend, lie saw comn, whent, soi-gliiim, potatoes, and sugar boots, ail of which had grown Iuxuriantly under weather condfitions exactiy similar ta those upon his own fnrm, seventy-flve il les away. Rue saw, too, class rooms and lah)oratories in wliceh were studied sciences which he liad neyer known ta have any bearing upon farming anxd, bc- fore lie retuirned homne, his last doubits lid been vanquished and hoe bad placed his order for his now toole. and ehapp', Canada biff afsur y Bde an SeLIa\u0026o",
         "Wilnnipeg, March, 1914. The Western Home M -oithly 4 The oungWonian and Heirv Problem By Pearl Rich.mondIHamilton books 'sa*i ivita. Every p %vas ,Wlien wi th' more. tool riend, t Up. nie te nodel te te , but mem- rain 1rain nifing sai-e icked ,pul- on as M1 ou b-soil w af- 't ]et weret k up have ,and tting there af ter wery ri tuie and îted hired rlaps a are ,yen. 1 get way, Sthe idry b~ get redge rhen, s, he- don't 't se r the that and good that rve c no4% M ing and keep Far, is la 3,or nses you red wife resolved. te amily up inl a Hotlse eighbors believed the The cbjîdren, bow- rie spiritually in an oeption; tliey were ame of the Young rried a noble youug learned 1that bis wife creature.- left her and misery to suifer îishment required of It is neyer right to mce bas created with-- 1veie\" 'te warn us ar, and if we alloîv our hearing, we müst ENTS IN A GfltL'$ is a period full of Every girl should A quaint French village on the SU. Lawrence happy. In the meantime the yeung woman dreamed of bis flattering com- pliments and f ct a, tfurilJ cof pride that she bhad the power te attract men. Be- sides, one must\u003cbave a littie fun in life. There were times that the \"still smal voice\" beat against lier breast in anxious, %wainiing and ber lîeart burned hot, but the music of the orcestra snîothered the troublesouute conscience, and the burning heart sent a fascinating flush te, eacb cheek. ' One morning bis ittie girl called bim up over the 'phîone. 1t was lier firsý telephone iiiessage. She was very prend of ber accorniplishmenit. Shie did love her \"1I)addy.\" But \"Daddy\" uas tee busy te talk te lier, and the bot tears burned lier eyes as sue turned frem the 'phone. That saine noon his wife called him up, but Central made a mistake, and the wife listened te a conversation between \"hiim\" and \"lIier.\" For a moment the wife trembled in a fearful chilI as the truth dawned. Her hand lutched the receiver with a deathly grp He, in ten- der tones, was soliitous Of \"ber\" welfare \"She\" felt that she was taking a risk and relied on bis judgment. He told bier that slie. liad ne need.te worry. They en(led by proinising to meet at four o'elock. The conversation was long. Hei was net '\"tee husy!' WTen the conver- sation ended the wife stood stunned, petrified te the heart; gvery muscle in her body was paralyzed, every nerve lifeless. Finally; dropping tlhe reeiver, slie paced back and forth moahing: \"lias it corne te me? Fias it cone te meue ýlbe bad always believed their ]ives were te one another an open book. The lit hie OMIS tried te comfort ber by \"Whiats flie matter, mother, dear?\" and they lised ber over again and again. Th.ey 1 -Ilunever before seen lier in tears. Thieir borne happiness was blasted. She could 'lot leave 1M because she loved lier cilîdren, and Ma\\Initoban laws protect tue father by giviîîg lji the eidren. And take time te decide. S. S. MeClure was in love with the daughter cf Professer Hurat. In speaking of ber dismissal of him he ayB: \"Although may last inter- view with Miss Hurst was a definite dismissal, I did net entirely give up hope. People neyer do wlien they desire anything greatly. Since it was against lier father's wishes shie eonsidered .the proposaI serieusly and did net rush into the step with a head-streng spirit of revenge.\" McClure--iWeaks of ber decision thus: \"After àheon~ce made up ber mind it was the rigbt thing te do, 1 knew that nothing could alter lier decision.\"- What strength of ebaractera te in- spire se, mucli confidence in the youxug mnan who trusted bier!\" Rlule your man friend in the name of virtue and- piety. Men need counsellors wvbom tbey cau trust. The experience of love in an engage- ment should be a desire te elevate not to degrade. There is ne woman in Frenchi history of whom France is prouder than Heloise. There neyer was a time wben Frencbmen have net bowed down te cultivated women. To ber came Abelard and they are known as the immortal loyers, because their love survived ail changes. Af ter Queen Victoria bad eosen lber busband she said: \"Wb%\"en I had mnade up my mind, I sent for Albert. There ivas ne hesitation on bis part, but the offer ivas received with kindness anid affection. I told bim I was quite un- worthy of him. He said hie îould bc very happy te spend bis life with nie. How I îvill strive te make hum feel as little as possible the great sacrifice he lias muade! I told 1dmi it was a great sacrifice on bis part.\" Then there is the decisive moment of Rebckali at the well. The two lifted up their eyes andl saw one anothier. They 1i: d been guided from~a distance by the fiii ier of God te be uniteed. -May n(\u003et a, c A TELEPHONE TIRAGEDY se the broken-heart try te, bring her fa lie was a succeâsful business man- of Lies-for tbcir ni married, respected and loved by -bis home ivas happy. family. She was an office girl-modestly ever, could flot thri neat and considered a. dlean, moral atmosphere of dec young woman. They met during the handicapped for life neon heur in one of Winnipeg's popular And what beca lunch rooms. He bappened to sit across woman? She mar the table from ber. Twice their eyes man, ivbo, when he1 met, and then the acquaintance began. was a second-hand Tluey met by appeintment the next day alone in poverty a at the same place. The third day thcy the penalty of pur met aga'in and made a date for an hour the home-wrecker. or-twe, during the afternoon. Every day de wrong. Providei the two spent some time together. It in the \"stili small was harmless pas-;time, and they enjeyed when danger is nei the flirtation, besides the wife coîuld nett he devil to deafen( possibly discover tlueir friendship, sunce pay the devil's bill. she was ebliged te stay borne te take care of the chiîdren. She believed tbat D*IIEMM woman~s plade was iu tbe home-se did DCSIEMM be for reasens obvions. He was playing LJ the double game. The wife trusted him The engagement and their home-hife was suprernely deisive moments. tom",
         "The-.Western Home Montlily' Winnipeg, March, 1914 jp\"ao Orcrgan Wtth- A ]Detroit musician has imvonted a igrderfWd uew system which enables a~yperson or littie cUld to leara to play t~piano or organ iu one evening. »en. though you kuow absolutely nôth- 16 l*g bout muhic or have nover touched a*piano or organ, you eau now loaru to pIby in au heur or two.- Peopîle who do ai~t kno*,orn note front another- are able tbplythorfavorite music with this létIod wltlot siy- assistance whst- ever from auyone. n -isuo system which ln called the Nunieral method, ln eold in Canada by 4e, Numeral Method Music Co. of ganada, and ad 4*bey are desirous of at ce uiaklng it kuewu lu every locality, t6iy. are makiug the foilowing special fies trial and half-priee offer to our 1You are not asked to send any mouey u*tl1 yen 'have tried and are st iefied '*Ith the new method. The Numeral' \u003ci.mpay nyawillllng te eend it te you on 9M Week's free trial, aud yen wili not h4ve to pay theni eue cent unless you sbiroteo keep it. There are ne express charges te be paid, as everything will be sMat by mail. Simply write A letter or post card te the Numeral Method Musie Cb~. of Canada, 185A Curry Hall, Wind- sor,*Outario, saying \"Please send me the Numeral Method on seven day's fre ttlaL» If yen are satisficd after.trying l1t the Method aud fifty dilYrent pieces of sheot music will ceet yen only $5, attheiugh the regular price of these la $16. Yen ehould «net dclay- writing, as the Numoral Company will net continue U 4s special haîf-price offer indefinitely. Làter on, the Mcthod aid fifty pieces of pi:uaic wll ho sold at the regular price.q ÀAOood' A cent isn't a large amount of money ta, invest in a good Sthing. We want every reader of The Western Home Monthly to send us a postcard and 'ask for a cp y cf our new beautifully illustrated bookiet whjch we send absolutely free. It contains a wealth of information ab o ut the hair and is a fitting adornment to any home. You wil aise receive fuil in- etructions for order- ing transformation.% switches, wigs, etc. by mail. Send for a copy to-day. SEAMAN \u0026PETERSEN Noew Yorkr Hair st@rm 293 SmILShSt., Winnip.gl $1000Reward We are a responslble cempany and vill psy mrte one punt ef milk into one pound cf but- ter In two minutes. Looks the s»me gets hard aî\u003ed Io aveeter tjan (Jreamery butter. Dem- enstrators and general a«enta wanted on sal- atu or Commission. If yen vont this Job wXite lmrnediately for Illustratd cireuiars aid Éworu testimonial aise home addres eof 1,000 users ef this venderfui invention. FaultySuttr MorgerCGo., Washlngton, O. C.1 yoUÈIg woMmuPray that the seul which la her 0wn'bounterpart may ho led by God te be aide? The story of Rebekah teaches us that young mon sud vomen are not te beav'e this great: eveut of their livos te chance but are te recognize the 01 fa»e f rovidence. N~n# syite o~riee,\u003c' ~woman, in, whonr livea ah My hope, .wbo hast' delged-te )eqve for my'salvation thy «foseho the tbrone of* the Eternal -theu bas redeemed me from slavery te, lberty; nov earth hae ne more dangers for me. I cherish the image of thy purity im my bosom.\" The sibîlmest declaration of love in huma». literature Shakespeare wrote: \"Love je net love that alters When it alteration finds.\" The greatest compliment that man bas ever paid tb the woman ho adores je in these lines of Shakespeare: \"And those oyes, the break of . day Lights that do mislead tbe morn.\" The greatest play outeide of the Bible le Romeo aud Julit-a eympbeny lu whieh all music blonds. The beart hurets ite blossom. She, wbo reades feels a divine perfume._ God stations policemen te guard the castle of a girl'e seul. Hon seul ie eternal. Young wemau, ebaîl youre etain a man'e cbaracter, or shall it make him eoar ta beavenly beigbte? Yen are tbat yeuîg man's keeper. IN THE WHIRL 0F SOCIAL CONFUSION. Iu a uew boek eutitled \"The Girl1 and Her Religion,\" by Margaret Slattery, je a cbapter ou Twin Idole. They are Fashion and Pleasure. *SIe mentions a girl who bougbt hall room finery aud veut vithout warm boots aud a nain coat. To ho weli dressed meana te ho appropriately dressed. Many vemen and girls are caught in faebion's cycloîic whirlwind and do net realize the coat tili they are wrcke physically, montally and monally. I bear continually: \"I amn s0 huey geing te teas, halls aid bridge that I bave ne time te belp at borne!\" When in the future a voman listons te the phonograph « ber paet life she will regret the heurs epent ln uselese social intoxication. The fameus queenâ of society ln France durng the seveîtcenth and ighteenth centuries were exclusive. They reeerved tbeir talente for social renions, vbere amoug distinguiebed mon and vomen tbey poured eut, the treaeures of seul and mind-wbere tbey could inspire and draw eut the senti- ments of those wbo were giftcd. We hear of carde or dancing-but there were frequeyit parties te the' country, valks in thse woods and epportunities for mental improvement. Froidh Society at- that\" time was brilliant. Women raised the intellectual tone aid this inspired ,veneration for womnan. Womeîn eally deterrined the àffairs of France. Madame Recamier vas the social queen aid vhen bier busbaîd lest bis fortune, she ecld bier jewels aid lier fine botel and cheorfully teok up bier abode in a small apartmont. This won sfîiversal respect se, that bier friende vere in- creasod rather than diminished. She did net ]ose bier social prestige aid influence. Money vas net the highest test of-social position. TEE MISLTNDERSTOOD GIRL The girl vise bas.iya sinicere sympatby is the daugîter ini the home who is passing through tite trying teens-es- peially in tIse beginning. I have kîown mnany girls in country homes, where there vas ne opportunity for recreatioit and where no attempt was made to inake lier home if e attractive, who have heen treated by their parents most cruelly hecouse they were misuider- stood. \" Many times uîfeeliîg fathers and inothers have tried ta îvhilp thei into their way of thiîking. This is pitiable. If at this age an attempt were made to give the girl some privileges such as -a îmusical instrument, books aid pretty tlïiiigs for bier room, she woulil develop ita strong, womanly eharacter. But maîy tifi(eu these girls are scolded. pounded aud horrib ly trestéd until thcy run away or sottie downinii abject sûisery. I have seen this occur rnany tirnes and my heart aches for these mis- underetood girls. At th is age tlîey are passing. from girlhopd 1into womanhood, and they long for something different. The physical body ie ehahging-hence the mental - and if caretul atten- tion ho nent given the moral tone change. In nine cases eut 'of ten changes in borne recreations will go far toward making 'ber con- tented and happy: If there jesemething te keep her'mind activcly engaged she ivili ho tided 'ovpr this trying period. She cannot be whipped intc lino. I know, a bright country girl who at this time iras refused hy her parents te beave the home fer menthe at a time te kceep her from company. She had a bare room, and seldom was a kind word spoken te, ber by ber father or mother. Often a strap from the harnese was used by ber father te whip- her. -At- those timea -ho was furious and ber body trembled from fear and nervous exhaustion. She de- veloped a hatred for him that sho could nover overcome. Later in life, wbeî ho had made bis fortune and longcd for the daughtcr and her eilîdren to, visit hlm, they neyer came. Net ail the money and attention he could beetow on ber could vin back ber respect for him. à The yeung girl bungers for parental attention and\u0026 kindness at this age aid not ail the dollars a farm can yield can equal tbe valus, of a daughtor's respect aid gratitude. Sometimes parents do cverything but thunk. A few heure theught migbt save years of suffering froin a fallen daugbter's deeds. Make the daugliten love ber horne. It je net se, difficult a task a-s it may seem. Farming je geing te ho a popular profes- sien for women. Buy for the home library reliable works on ýfarming. Scientifie mcthods are the only way te farm with profit. Wornen are capable managers of farms. Tliey grow te love the work-it brings them nearer te nature, and their work is a constant reminder of the goodiess of their Makor. One voman farmer says: \"I have doue everything that can ho donc on a farrn, from hoeing potatoes ta stacking hay, and thêre vas ne task, boweî'er beavy, but was lightened by the tbougbt of Ris touch having heen there hofore.\" Interest the girl in some' feature of farni work. Allow ber te keep the pro- ceeds of ber work. It may be caniig vegetables for tewn consumption, or she may care for a special calf or colt, she may raise chiekens, make butter, or have an acre of laid te cultivate. ,-MI parents would make it possible for berf toecari moîey at home, our city em- ployment places would Dot ho crowded with girls from the country looking for work. Girls are the same ÎÏ4ey bave al, ways been. The sudden openiîg of the parents' eyes te, their power will give tbema courage aid ambition ta become womanliu vomen. Their dispositions are suchi that they grow ta love their work and their home if kindly directed. 1 love these beautiful girls and when they briîg their troubles fe me I fiid so manv, hearts broken by Cruel parental hammners. REAL GIRLS Thiere are twa types of girls-tse kind a mai viii allow hîs sister to recognize and tise kiîd hlivili not allov with bis sister. My littIe six-year-old girl vent -%vith lue ta bear.a group of girl musieian.s. On lier way hiome slie exclairncd: \"Mother, I thought they -would lie 'real' girls!\" The girls vere artificial produets of paints and wi-s and thie littIe six-ve\u003car- old reeogîized Mthe imiitation-lInitàstioil Girls. When the sweet hahbe is beaithy with- nii. a soft bloam appqemr5 oii the clieek, w i thout. Rluskin saw biinsfalil heeause cf Ivig tinbers 01 i crouflie ,aw useltibers of a 110,11vhuriiigup iwit]iîa i;ttaI fever beeaute ut lyilîg plunîbiiug. Truth is the first law in temple l)uild- in- anid also in]îappiîîess auj cL-1intrc if You Like Gooci Syrup- Here it is. A syrup that is simply good in every sense of the word. Made from the uweet Kanmsorghum-. ail the goodues. and thc richueuu possible to extract from its pure, healthful juices boilcd down into a blended perfection ineyer before attained lu syrups. The COdIVili.Compny, Distributors W-map.l. man. amiez. man. 368» Ji. .SU uhSiabo.. Sadi. M W, A simple camera for the littie folks. THE DOLLAR BROWNIE Makes 21 î 2pictures, 1ridges. Has a good littie lens and a rotary shutter for snap- shots or time exposures. BIGGER I3ROW7NIES Front $2.00 to, $12.00. We have all the new goods f'rom the Kodak Factory. riree illustrated Kodak cata- logue mailed upon request. Amateur Finishing a Specfiaty. STEELE MITCHELL WINNIPEG, MAN. FRECKLES Now is the Time ta Get Rid of These Ugly Spots. There's na langer the slightest need of feel- ing ashamned of Jour freckles , asthe prescrip- tion othine-daoubie strength-i sguaranteed to remaove these hamneiy spots. Simply get an ounce of othine-double strcngthi-froîîî your druggist, aid ap 'y a li t te af it night and marning and ya.u sh.uld soan Sec that even the warst freckles have begun ta disa ppear, while the lighter anes have vanished entirely. It is seld.m that mare than an oince is needed ta comPletelY cleai- the skin and gain a beautiful clear coin plexian. Be sure to ask far the double strength athine as tlîis is sold under guarantee of mOney back ii it faila to rernove freckles. *2",
         "Wnnpeg, Mrch, 1914. The Western Home MWont hi \u003e-- The Women's 'Quiet Hôù By E. Cora I-ind.1 The women Grain Groerâs of -.askatche*an are - not a defiitely establisbed body and ne doubt much vaiable work will be done by tbem in tbe coming year. WVie, Women Grain the convention was held Growers in Saskatoon ini 1913 a Il commiltee was appoint- ed with a view to permanient organiza- tion, but it was not possible to really undertake this work until the constitu- tion of the Grain Growers' Association had been amended to permiit of an auxiliary orga.nization of thie women, which, while net separating thein en- tirely from the mun's erganization, would stili. leave thein free for work of their own. A good deal of quiet work bas been done during the year, particularly by -the women who were on the committee. When the timè for the Grain Growvers' meeting came round this year F. W. Green, Secretary of the Grain Growers' Association for Saskatchewan, - was anxious te, have \"Lillian Laurie\" and O'Nellie L. McClung»' go to Moose Jaw and take charge of the women's conven- tion. Both of tiiese woînen, however, realized that in doing si they weuld be doing an injustice te the women of Sas- their rëason for asking for money from the central funds,rather than asking for- the coîtrol of their own fees, was that they wishcd to remain an integral part of the general association. They Iiid questions of their own which could besi- be discussed' in meetings of their own, but they wanted te feel that the men were behind themn in their undertakings, aise they wislied te feel that they could ho of some assistance te the men's or- ganizations also. Miss Beynon followed along the sainee une, and Mrs. Tlîempson, of Nethérhill, endorsed what. they had said. l'bey bad asked for ten'minutes in which te present their case; ail thc speeches, however, did net occupy quite tive minutes. As soon as they had fiuished apeaking the resolution t'as put and carried with only one disseniting vote. Personally, I was extrcmely proud of the delegation. They spoke learly and dstinctly, and touId be heard in every part of the large ebureh in wvhieh the meeting w.as beld, and which seats over two tlîousand. They stated their cases clearly and without a waste word, and Presidt4i t Maharg, of the central or- ganizàtion, said the mien might take a lessen f romn them. Home sweet Home. A ahack on tbe Prairie katcbewan; it was net giving the cern- At the meeting ýin Saskatoona last mnittee appointed by the women a fair yeur there were a large number of chance and tlîey declined. Miss women preseîit Mho were members of Frances Bevynon undertook te helip the the Home-makers' Clubs, and at that wemen, andthe convention in that of the time they were very anxiotîs Crain Growers' Association was duly Value of te have the women Grain called. There wvns a good attendance Freedom Growers unite withi them, but and it was very represeutative. On the a few, at least, of the wemen second day the nen's body finaly get wete,,,,,e enough te see that: this would round te the amendments of the consti- neot bo r the beat interest of tlieir tution and added a sub-section, which organization. The Homne-makers' Clubs states \"'wlerev'er ten women members have their place, anid a very important are enrolled in any local association they place it is, in the life of the women of inay form a wonieni's auxiliary for the Saskatchewan, but tbey are, te a con- pur-pose of studying and discussing ways sitierable extent, -under the control of and means for dealing with lvomen's the University and the Department ef questions and work. They inay cail such Agriculture, and therefore, politicai meetings as they desire, appoint officers questions may net bc taken up in their precisely in the saine manner as the local gathierings, that means that snch im- association, they rnaY provide for their portant reforhis as \"Votes for W'omen,\" own financing, and administer the sanie, \"the Dower La%,.,\" and better pretectioni in\u003cependent of the local association fund, of women and ciîildren cannot be taken providing they are al iembers of good up or advanced. The women Grain standing in the local. As seon as this Crowers will.lbe absoiîutely free in this aiendnîent passed the m-omien orgainzed respect, and as the men Grain Growers flieir own central association, electiiig have repeateilly declared thcmselves in Mis. McN\\aigton, of Pieche, Sask., as favor ef votes for women, thiere is ne presiden.t. doubit that this will form an important Tliuy feit. and righitty se, that they paîrt of the projected %vork ef the could net get 'very far ivith;out a paid u%oinen's auxiliary and they îuiil have secretary, and tliey n1ponted adlg- ample support from the Rien in carrying tien te wait on the e i's association, out anytlîiig that will fîîrtlicr this re- andl askýed for gr-ant from tie geîîcral form. They wilI aise be able te engage fitnds for this work. These delegates witlî greater activity in the propagandla a-ked for ten minutes in wluîch to state for co-operative trading and manv their case; they were introduced by C. things tlimt %wîll go te improve conuhi- A, Duiiiing, the retîring vie-presidvnt. t ions for thenmselv'cs and for theïrr cli- In nioving that theý beclieai-d. lie moved dren. aise that they bie granted $500 froni tue I was not able te personally attend g-eneral fuîîds te carry o11 their organiza- the wvomiens meetings'. being ebiliged te tien work. Thjis resolutien heing he present at those cf the 'mon, but 1 promptly, seconded. The %vonen a d- , aw and talkced witlî a number of dele- uressed the meeting. .Mrs. McNaughitoui gteai at tlie last session 1 was able spolie fi st, stating very simply tlîat Ito bc present for la feNw monienti, anîd MI 'III- p. PârcelPI id Edison BlueAmiberol Records travel well together Our Molto: Evemy EdisanRecord in stM\u0026k*Il d\".dmoumiY w. YOU vil L ha d hw zqtwiSk oI yoor order. 12 new Folk Dame. Records, 65 cetsCh. 'ou sL\"I-hàve afew lu. Ord.r by mumbe. 2240-Ace of Diamonds--DaniohbihFol ance. 2241-Bleking-Swedish FolkfDance. 2242-The Carrousel \u003cMerry-Go-Roufld) Swedilsh FilkfDance. 2243-Danish fDance of Greeting-flaniuii FolkfDanc. 2244-Highl*fld Pling-Scotch Folkfiance. 2243--Hîghland Schotlich-8cotch FolkfDance.- 2246The rishJig(St Patrlck's Day) IrishFlkfac 224-TIis Yo-SFolkh ih fanc 2248-Lassie's Dance-Swedish FolkfDance. 2249-Shoemakera' Dance-Daalsh Folkflanc. 2230--Clap Dance-Swedish FolkfDance. 2251-Trallen--Swedith FolkfDancs. Send for our mu\"ia monthly, il tells aab\"t musia stuum, md wOllb. sent 10, you ecdimonth Fre..Wh .wMta lm ée f uhmanasEdbms Plama graph ouncMpl.*thè b. am The Assiniboîa Music Store Everyhi'ng\"8 Mai n StMoose awSaak. To The Unprotecte.d! -Our claims âho t tnla9 cases oaly orn premium had been paid. 'renIwere due to accidents, Mad of the balance the causes meie impossible of forecastint bY aaY medical exainination. The. last twro who did aftea single payment left familles of fine and soies caudrea reupectively, practically without Protectin,, Sae for the. LAteInsurance. \" -from the Great-West Life Report for 1918 LET THE LESSON SINK. IN!1ý The security of Life Insuran.ce may be obtained AT LOWEST NET COST in The Great-West Life- Assurance Co. HEAD OFFICE - WINNIPEG ASK jF,0;t RATES AT 'fOUR OWN AGE -k - s~ . ~* ~ ossible juice,, ection Wibalors a for ~NIE ures, cart- Slens nap- ata- iest. ilty. L f feel- escrip- anteed double py a should have cnes that pletelY \u003e com- rengh tee of",
         "The. Western Home Monthlly WiDniPeg. Mfarel, 1914. aBoLY-FILLING FOUNTAIN PEN FREE FREE We wifl mail y ou absolutely free of al] charge, ane aelf-filling Founiain Pen, solid black rubber barrel, 14-k. gald plated nib. TIis pen is equal ta any $1.50 ta $200 values r --id is guaranteed ln every way. To procuq t'As pen, write us to-day for 12 packages or aur beautiful \"Oriental Sachet Perfume.\" StIl them at 10c. each, return us the mnoney Fnd the peu is yours by returu mail. We er2, giving this remarkable value for a iimited tirn-. anly ta introduce this new perfuîue. Address: Western Laboratories 195 Hargrave Street, Winnipeg, Man. at that'time toldý the-delegates thiat 1 would be 1pleased -tehbave tlient write to this page, and weuld be glad to givO them any help i*mypowr. Lqt me now repeat thatinvitation. The- page is open to the women Grain (Crowers as it bas glways been open to any otiier women in the-Canadian West Who feit that they eou.ld be helped in any way by writing te it. In addition to Mrs. McNaughton, as president, Miss Irma btocking was elected secretary-treasurdP. Owitig to tbe fact that the representation a'as not v'ery well distributed over the province, it was impossible for the convention to appoint directors for ail the districts, but the election of directors, so far as it bas gone, stands as follows:- District 1-Mrs. S. V. Haight, Keeler. District 3-Mrs. Grant, Redvers. District 4-Mrs. Hilton, Colfax. District 6-Mrs. Hawkes, Percival. District 7-Mrs. Flatt, Tantallon. District --Mrs. .Ames, IHanley. -District 9-Mrs. Anderson, Sutherland. District 13--'Mrs. Irene Thomfpson,- Netherhili. -District 15-Mrs. MeNeil, Expanse. The Department of Agriculture of Manitoba has had printed for the Home Economies Society a very fine course of lessons on Nursing, ,Personal Hygiene, Cookery, Foods, Laundry and Home Sewing. There are six or Economica eight lessons in each subject. Tbey are put up in such a form that it is possible to follow tbern with the greatest ease. They may bc used either as regular lessons ini connec- tion with the meeting of a home economica 'society, or they may be taken up personally and studied at home. They cau be obtained by writing to the De- partment of Agriculture, or to the Home Economies Section of the Manitoba Agricultural College. The one on nursing will be especially timely, following as it does the short course on nursing which bas proven ex- tremely popular. The cost and adultema- tion of foods and the theory of foods wilI be found of very general intereat, wlîile, 1 arn sure, wben a woman fands herseif confronted with the task of do- ing herown wa.shing fer the first time she ni il derive much help and benefit from the. lessens of the laundry. The personal h vgiene, wýhich takes.Up the humi4n body as a macAîne, should serve te impress on every woman who studies it the common sense of keeping ber body in a wholc- some and healthy condition. The wbolc course should help te make the Home Economies Society very interesting and at the same time serve to draw many ivoiren inte this society who otheiivise may not be attrac'ted to it. There is a great significance in the proininence which is given at the present timne by governments, educational insti- tutions and the press to al questions affecting women. 1 amn The Woman sure it is no exaggeration Question te say that to-day there are twenty columnns ini the newspapprs devoted te wornen's work, and problems compared to onie five years uigo, and while wô men whio strive for de- ý';iite reforrns are often discouî-aged at Cie little progress thev seenm to niake., thie world is rnoving slowly but sujrelv t, o the liglit, and wornen are comning t'O u.i own. The appointient of -s. 111li iCou as a judge of the Juvenile Coi-t ini Calgary is an ini nieuise step in jadvancc. Fit-e years ago this wollhave been au utter irnpossibilitv. Dti-ing the iliontlî Lethbridge lias 'ap)poiuîtî.d a w'oniaii as City Clerk, anothiei innova- tioni, as slie is the only woinan it Canada to vecenpy tliat position. '[lie assistant Citv rreasiirer of M'in- nlipeg lias for inany Years beeti a ivinanl, anid notlîing but prejudice pi-eveîiteîl lîi-r being made City Ti-castirer wlien a vaeancy occurred a few- years ago. Pî-obably by the, tinie XVinliipjeg want\u003e auotlier City Treasîi-rer, w-onuen tt-iîî hIttve(corne iiito tlieir own in this re- spect. Everywlieî-e thle dawn of a bet- ter day is breakiîg. Nothing oughit to leSseVn LiestifaC- t~~~~i 0111- hveu oir ](s 50 nitiias i ~tat ive disu pl)o\\ve ut 'n iî Svtwe ,ipl)toved ut aohji- og I inktrd~ Sliaw. 1The Lament of the OId Buccaneer' (irt Prize Poem) ,Said the shade of Henry Morgan t'O the shade of \u003eCaptain Kidd: 'Oh, -%e }ived about three huidred years 1 too sdon; Thotîgis we pirated 'with pleastîre, ,Just to get a littie treasure, Kow they beat us to a very differeîît tune. \"Tiiere are modern buccaneers who ma;ke tlîeir money out of ships, Though net just themea we diqd \u003c-n the main; ies l'or blheir mnethod isn't gory, Yet it's quite ae full of glory, Ai it doesu't bring the fear of hall sudi chain 1 \"Onùe we lived upon the water in a restiless, reckIess way,. Dauing knives, and guns, and winds, gyi( -wave%' and rocks-a; Now landdubbers get the treasure, In a more extensive measure, While they calmly live on water-in tile \"Wlien we raked the Spanigh galleonq in the Ctiribbean 8'ea, Little thought we, as w-e stowed :: wealth galore, Mefn would work a littie take-off 11v another sort of rake-off, And make larger coffers ceugh up ail the miore! \"As for war, -and lire, and. pillage, ýwlen Ive sacked the 'Spanish- towns. 1 We admit it wns% a rather wanton Py But the town-boss, without sackinÈ., lias a more substantial backingi. For heo n-ns the town, and makes the people puy. \"Trae, we neyer cared for mnetbod when tlhe money was in sigh.t, And wé' neyer let thse trusty cutlassl rust; And we neyer, neyer wrangled Wben a foe was te be strangled;?' New tbev de it more gentee4ly, with a trust! \"Xow thev talk a lot of niargins--well, we had some narrow caîls, And the dangers paid for ail the tre'gs- ures borne; But the margin's isot so risky When. the \"lambs\" so gay and frisky Answer to thse cal], and corne up toi be sliorn. \"Talk of captains of industry! We ean put tlîem ail to rotît, For in hiktory-making we bave had our slaîe; But. for iueky speeulation, And1( for great a(cumulation, We ert in it with the modern mil. lionaire!\" W. E. Gilroy. The Pursuit of Pleasure Much is said, anti just.ly said, against the pursuit of Pleastîre. It is becatii;, lvuer is fo]lowcd too often and al- nuîî,t universally as an end ini itself and nut as a means of contributing to the Iiiglier good. Moreoyer, what is named Piea-ou-e is called so falsely, and Pleas- u-e intînt bear the reproacît whieh fast- enis to any pleastirable excess. which he-ornes confirmed as a vice. Real pleas- ti-e. lasting pleasuî-e, pure pleasure, lias its springs not ini tle senses, but in the eniotions. Anything wvhielî feeds upofl l)lysieal senses nitist evcntually deeay a111( nausea te. Tliat hich feeds iupoui tlhe emotions wvaxes fat and strong and Y011119 by exci-cise an'd by. being fcd. Ncitlîer nrusie, oratou-y, pictures, uior an%- fortn of art falis upon the taste, but radhier deliolits the more it, is seen- auud lieard and appreciated and adnnrcd. Aund yet these are only aes'tiîetic eniua tiolis wlich. art awakens, but if we pas.s to the ligier level of morals and reli- gioni it is C stili. more apparent that real pleuisire springs fi-om the emotions and il',' the seilses. Wluat pleasure is more sNi eut thai t tat wvhich sprirugs from the neniorv of an act of love, especially M-lnit lia be)(en icvomplislied aguain4t i i u101or -! îiees- . B SASKATCHEWAN PROVINCIAL WINTER FAIR REGINA, MARON 10-13. 1914 $700wO IN PRIZES EXHiIBITS-Heavy and Light Horses; Heavjp Draught, Delivery and Roadster Teams; Beef Cattie, Sheep and Swine. FEÂ'URES-Live Stock Judging, Riding by Royal North-West Mounted Police, Sheep Dog Tlrials, Auction Sales of Pure- bre d Horses and Cattle; Orchestra Music and Chorus Singing by Regina Male Chorus Club. LECTURE S-Practical Discussions on Live Stock Subjects Led hy Practical Experts. Domestic Science Lectures and Demoiist rations of Interest to Ail Ladies. SINOLE TA ERATERS ON Aà= EAXLWATS The Fair will he held in the magi4ficent new $130,000 building. Write the Manager for a Programme or other information. ROBIERT SINTON D. T. ELDERKIN, President, Regina. Manager, Regina. When wrîting advertisers please mention The Western Home Monthly.",
         ",.Winnipeg, March, 1914. The Western Home IWonthlyr T Temperance Talk\u0026 Our Sins and Ignôrance Harold Begbie, the well-known re- ligions noveit, has written, in story forni a remiarkable exposition of flic 'Place liquor occupies and the evil it docs ta' the lives of certain classes in London: Three. men, stood one summer nighit in a doorway ini Pîccadiy Oircu:s, Iooking et the crowd. It was the hour when theatres and music halle disgorge their multitudes, and when restaurants aid taverne open their doors as wide as pos- sible ta lure the last shillings of the day. The air was filled with luminous mist; damp pavements reflected blurred light; roadways flashed with the g liding lampe of incessant vehicles. On every ide of the clamorous streets thousands of pea- pe were passing by,,their -bright eyes, pae1 faces, and the- linery- ef- theïr raï. ment lit up ini a startling intensity hy the glitter of ail this artificial illumina- tion. One of the three men in the doorway was an inspecto-r of police. He w'ore plain clothes. Policemen catching sight of him as they passed, visibly braced themselves, but~ did not salute. Of the other two men, one waa a famous physician, and the other a novelist. The police inspeefor was revealing ta these two mnen certain mysteries in the The iiispector stid quietly as the cab mn.vc(1 \u0026way, .and the crewd went fier- ward. again. \"He's more lucky than -most.. As \u0026 i-nie, these gentlemen, up from the provinces for a day or two's business and pleasure, fail into criminal banda, and wake up in the morning ta find themselves cleared elean out of watch, chai xpcket-book, purse, even stu(ls and IlZû~ It's the best weapon a criminal cani use, this alcohol.\" The novelist said ta the doctor, \"that laugh was horrible, wasn't it 7\" \"My dear fellow,\" answered the doc- tor, \"that laugli was the worst thing that bas made me sick and angry to- night. It's worse ta me than vice and crime. What does it mean? It means ignorance.\" He turned to the inspector. \"The worst encmy you have got ta con- te-nd ag\u0026iaïnst,\" he- naid, \"is ignorance- the Mad ignorance of rational human beings.\" \"The worst enemy, \" said the inspector, \"is drink.\" They walked away, and when the streeta, were emptying wènt ta the police station and sat for a few minutes in anc of the waiting raams.- The door of this room a ood open, and as they sat there they saw men and women braught by canstables into the station and Chicklets tide of iniquity which flows through the central streets of midnigbt London. Vice and crime mix in that tide, vice of the inost a#ý6cious as well as of the most weak and human character, crime of the most pcrverted as weli as of the most simple and ordinary nature. There are many well-dressed men in that crowd %vhio deserved penai servitude, many young girls and boys who were guilty of the grossest iniquity. Suddenly tbr6ugh the close-packed multitude there lurched a broad-slîoul- dered man, dressed in a grey flannel suit, with a straw bat pressed over bis eyes. The crowd opened before him, and bc staggered here and there, bis legp cross- ing over each other, bis feet pausing in the air, his body overbalancing ta this aide and ta that, as be staggered ta- wards the pavement. Sanie of the women caught bald af him, certain evil-looking mcei jostled bina, the driver of a motor- cab jumped down and eagerly opened the door ta reccive him. \"That's the cause af I]il te miscliief,' said the inspector. \"You mean drink?\" salît the dotor. \"It's at tbe bottam of everything,\" re- plied the inspector. A, policeman made bis way ta the drunken man, thrust aside the people wlo were thronging him, asked a few quiestions, and the u belped lim into tIte (ab. The main sprawled.lîclplessly îîpon the floor. Tliraugh the noise of thie street came tuie sourîd af laugliter. W,%oieii*s loif\u003ci an\u003ci Lilarious laugliter, and on trvery side of the cab thie faces of the watching crowd .suddenly shone with thle nierrînielit (J \u003eIniles. \"Cod ini leaen! ýexelained tlie \u003cbu i or; '\"tlat people should laugli, tlîat mii anîd wornen sboîîld laugh at sililia spectacle!\" charged with drunkennesa, violence and stealing. \"It's like this ail over Laondan,\"- ýre-,. marked the inspetr ginyj ax every night ofth week. A side, the cause af it ail is drink.' \"But behind the drink,\" said the doc- tar, \"is something else. The real men- ace ta ivilization is nat drink; it's Ignorance.\" \"If the public knew what it costs them in pounds, shillings and pence,\" said the inispector, \"they'd do samething more ta master this traffic. Wlîy, if it îvasn't for drink the prisons -,ould ail be empty, and most of tlhe workhouses could close tlîeir doors.\" \"And the lunatie asylunis,\" added tire (lotor. \"Yes, I suppose so.\" consented the in- spector. Tire doctor got up and began ta walk about the roorn. 'There are two as- piects of tluis niatter,\" lie said quietly, tlîoughtfully, as tlibugli speaking ta him- self. \"There's the religious aspect, ta begin ivth, tlîe aspect in which drunken- ness appears as something wicked. No (runkard, says the scripture, can enter the kingdom aofi Heaven. I suppose that is truc. Certainly, if religion is a fact, drunkenness is a sin. For a creature blessed with a Cod-given reason it is sîîrely a sin to degrade, corrupt,. and finally destray that great gift. But foir low many centuries have religions merl preached against drunkenness, organized' their fai-ces against driîînkecnnoss, and en- volled speciiîl armies ta make -,ar. upon Witlî w-bat (lied ?\" *'~1,its le~s peaemts said the \"-Tlat's truce,\" sa id the inspeetor. i(lent bel love it!\" criv(l the dmtor, wil tii -(Men aiiin at ion. -No 1 doi't believe It. Certain classes lîaî e b ecome 914. San c yeur inom* lte-daond tuekm ifo iMirurcthe Cokaliedt uai etued ad ye 904 WM- RENNIE CO- Limited3 A. at Tarento.. dontrnI aad Vaaeuv.r International Harvester 011,ý and Ga Enines «DiAu IDMAI COKNACUE Fm\u0026\" ucmurn e z2age Cita-\" EEuuAL lnm es Trau am nobhge Favumqm C\" io uu EW thln HAV E you a washing machine and Ha churn at your house? Do o pump water, saw woods ernd f eed, ru a cream separator? Doyau dothis work by band? If eo, you wlUbe able to save yourself much time for other work b7 lettmng an International où or gas engin, do tins drudgery for you. An International engine wMl lait many Yom work. ing for yen economîcally and without troule bo.. cause of such features as these: Aceurt 1 ron piston and lapped rings, off set cylinder hea loayrgo valves, detachable valve g»des, fuel pump, etc. The engines are of al t es vr*4ýritl stationary and portable- ait'and water-cooled- sizes froni 1 to 60-H. e .TIIy e rat on cheapeçt or most onet f uel P LearuailU about them at the local dealers , -If ho does not seil International engins write us for interesting catalogues and f u information. Drop uâa postaL card to-day. International Harvester Company of Canada, btd DRÀNCH HOUSES LULI(At ,am~m Cigay.Eduet., UEatm, Hault...L.i= 'ide, ~.Usa M. BUitshd. Ottaa. Qubec. Regima, Saakstoe,\u0026 ob.Wmmgpug York\" t I s. Rennie's, Seeds Grow- the .Finest VegetabIet and the Best Flowers- in the Land Success- in plantiiig, whether it be in planting an en- tire garden, a bed of either simple or intricate design, or an exten- sive fam -tract, depenïds u f many things, the principal one being the Quality of the SeedsJ are, absolutely dependable - have been sicie 1870-44 years ago. Their re- putation for unifçrm purity arný fertility-a reputation that has always keen strictly maintained -ie YOQR assurance of success in planting. Reninie'. CataIog. are nnusually compréeU4n- sive and xighty interesting..and instructive,.. They contain innumnerable hints and sug-- gestions of great. value on cultivatiqo. 'Anî. the descriptions are flot exaggerated, but enft in every case be relied upon. Lothe yen rs re, ferviit in a e, in thie p~ al 'When ing, a the When ith a *Well, risky ,oi be 1 ur vol 113 394 Péofaige Avon",
         "lskto.health. Among th.em'Y lu IMa dur Oowea,:au estimble lady of -1 biae fouii Xod\u0026a -lidaey Pilla vàay bemddcial,-Mm a.ewnsMates. \"If #MUdat I'gM sy vill belp aay suforer 1 *m glail te add 'my testimonial te wbat lim aamdy boun said?\" Ti.kduqa atrain ail the. refuse ma- 3 oui- if ftàe blood. If thoy are eut oforder this refuse romains in thé blood, sud becomes poison. That's w.y sound kldneyu mean pure blood and gZod eitt. Dodd'u Kiey ]Pilla make * inme and addres on the blank linos below, cnt out the coupon and mail» to lie Foso Coin. pnFoso Bldg., Cincinnai Ohio. Enclose ten cents,. in atamp rivr s an evidence of good faith a 1ui 31.00pchage will bc sent you at once b.mlprepaid, froc of charge and duty froe. Mail Vke ýcoupon Toda3 PREE $1.00 PACKAGE COUP~ON g 4946 Name .............................. ïCIty............. . Street.............. State ............ RF.Î) ........... MEN WANTED. Don't do bard work for Iow wagos wheu you cau bave easy work et a high wage. W. cananot spply the domand for aIn, repak men and Cas tractor operators. W. eali *you ina ew weeks. Outrsopsaore mtem *h«ed with alilthe latesi appliancos mand expert practical -eachors. Apply for hou catalogue. OMAR SONOOL of TRAIES and ARTS 447 Man Streot, Wnm Stop Uslng A Truss, are défieceat trnte the trusen mEn cne appcoetrmade Col. Ideave purpa etobol#, th pan ecureyi place. N. saffa e.or le t1 aed-no obnooxous PAI#JIN epria e.Cannet slip, go eannet1 e haMeor pres a aantuOie bene.. Rvp*rUoE Thou su n ds =ae1sceasfully treated themselves ot home wth. 1 3, ont indrajice train work _ Most 1q -- -obstinate cases cured. Boit se te vet - easy te appt, - Inx- pensive. Awarded laiod Medai. Procensaof recovegy is natural. au afterwards nefurtber uie for triasses. W .rev il b\u003e' * eedn 0 Trial of PlsuBe absolutely *Ses. Write teda\u003e. loua pUe i their habits; gentlemen dôn't got drunk at the table; drunken- noua la no* unknown in clubs, m'esses and wiril.roolns; but the drink habit ba xaâ,fwem the upper to\u0026 the Middle îàld the- lo,'or lasses-and in spreading amxottg women.. Go juto Manchester, Li Verpp1 Glasgow, Newcastle, Bristol- *any largo oity 'you like; you wifl find tha 'geatmaue~of, women, once the t~g othcuntry, have taken to the agnehabi ofdrinking, have con- traèed hia oatdeadly disease of \"It'IS quite truc about the women,\" Maid thi Ipeetor. The. doctor sttkdied his face for a mioment, noided, and then went on: \"e ligion ha Toughit bravely, but it bas not Yet conquered. If it' stili eau bo provèd that drink in responaible for three-fourtbs of thé crime, diseaso and lunacy of the country,-how can wo ilind consolation in a table of statistica wbich proves that the consumption of beer in Lsomothing leas? No; the battle jes tili against-u\u0026- And, -bebeve -me, if we. are not to b. wiped cleau out by this enemy, wo muet fight with other wveapons.\" Re approached the inapector. \"Yout Bay that drink is thue enemy; I say that behind that ia the greater enemy of ig- noranoe. People don't know-they don't know-that alcohol is a poison. It's the acientille aspect iiý_.which wo must show this evil of drink toounr ignorant mnulti- tudes. Parson and doctor mi, t unite. Let the parson show thiat a man bas bis soul by alcoholism; but let the doc-. tor also show that a man poisons his blood, destroys his tissues, anid oorr P ta the wbole fabric of bis organism by \"the sanie means. Let the doctor show that a drunkard, even a regular drinker who never gets drunk, commits a crime againat te'raeý-that his childreii suf- fer, that disease iia sjread by him tbrough ail génerationu!\" At that moment a couple of policemen entered the station with a young Muan between themt who waa well drcssed and of a bandsome appearanco, but dis- ordered and excited .by drink. \"For God's sake,\" he exclaimed to the sergeoant i charge, \"don't isk my naine; don't take the charge; let me pay nomne- thing.\"e The doctor turned to the novelist. \"Do you ueeo \" ho asked quietly. \"It's the social exposure hoe fears. There's not a thouglit in bis brain- of the crime ho bas cornmitted against bis own blood and. thé blood of bis .unboria cbildren. Ignorance' in aIl classes, calamitous ignorance!\" The sergeaut will keep him for an hour or two in the ce][,\" said the in- apector, \"and then lot hima go, if be's quiet. We don't take baîf the charges that corne in every night.\"l The doctor said, \"I applaud sucb mercy; but a man wbo gets drunk is as crirninal as the wretdh who snatches a watcb.\" \"There's only one real hope,.\" said the novelist. The other two men looked at hirn. \"W'ell T\" asked the doctor. '\u003eFaith in immortality and the sense of God.\" \"Tlîat's religion,\" said the doctor. \"And science,\" answered the novelist. As they walked lhorne together througli the almost deserted streets, tlîcy sav' a woman dressed like a hospital nurse speaking to a young girl in a doorway and offering ber a white flower. \"That's a reecue worker,\" said the novelist. \"S.Iie saves hundreds of lost girls every year. Do you know how slue doeà it? By love. And lier love is inspired by Christ. But for Christ she would not ho bore every niglit of the week walking these hateful pavements, and pleading with thèse womien who simply disgust the ordinary virtuous woman. Religion je something that science can neither explain nor surpass. 1 agree with what you said just now, but the devil ivili get it bis own way, in spite of al l te science in the world, un- tii evcrv man and woman realizes the i namortalit * of the sou!, acknovledIges moral responsibility, and apprehenids--ý\" Tuie doctor turned and looked at him. .\"Well T\" lhoasked. \"Perbaps I shallslock you; but trutly ' 1 believe thiat thiere is no hope f or the human race until it apprelieîds all tlîat Da meant by that phrasie, 'The Judgiuent Day y The Cap Fitted the Hatter A temperance ecturer once vijited the ebop of a hatter and as'ccd bim to give sometbing to't hocause.\" The sbopman coldly replied that lie had no interest in it. \"I arn eorry to hear that,\" said the lec- turer; \"for it showe nie that you are net ac- quainted with your own business.\" \"If you are more familiar with my busi- ness than I arn,\" said the man with spirit, \"I shall ha happy te take lessons of y ou.\" \"EWeil,\" said the lecturer, \"'you d cal in hat s, and intcnd to inake a littie money on every bat you seti?\"' \"Whatever sends customers to your shop and increases thvir ability to buy promotes your interests, doesn't it?\" \"Cert.ainiy.\" \"Wlhatevcr makes men content to wear old, wvorn-out hats, does you an injury?\" ',WeIl, sir, if you and I wcre to walk a- long the wharves and through the streets and bines of tIuis city, we shotid sec svores of men wcaring on thvir heads nierable slouch bats výhielî otagit years ago 10 havýe been tbrown jutoe fi li. Now~, why Won't those men corne and buy bats of you?\" \"That ie not a difficuit question to Lnswcr; they arc t(\u003e0 pour te buy hats. \"1 \"M'hat bas more infliivnve than liqîlot in eniptying their poeket's, andi mit onlv I ht, but injuring thvir selIf-resec,(t, so that they are willing te %vear old \u003clot lies?'' \",Notbing,\" raid the mani hastiiy. alicî'c is a donation for vour cause.I arn bcaten.\"-Allitce N\\cwvs. Winuipeg, March, 11914. Shoomakos Poultry Bo»kod Almanao for 1914 This valuable booke has 224 pages with many colored plates'et fowls true to M1e. It telle ail about chickens, their prices. their care, diseaies and rernedies. AUl about Incubators, their prices and thoir operation. AU about poultry housés and how to build thern. It's n encyclovedia of chiekendom. You need I. Only 15e. (1. 0. Shorniaker, Box 8 , Freei2ort,, III. Your rnoney back If flot satisfled. Make 20a Ray, ,with our wond.gful ~f finisbe hot tasM.s.aminue, e au hour. ne dri ec uaasense,. Photo ioet CaradButtone aU the rugel ikyTo. coinseonsu anywboee. ilicen lla V 5nt birpreni\u0026 . yeuowabau. Wrlte for Free 5BS. ?estumlaa. C AMUNSOAN amm PHM 00. 221 Ode ,e. Ch! DýlL from a Bone Spavin, Ring Bone, *Splint, Curb, Side Bone, or similar trouble and gets horse going sound. Doesnfot blister or remnovo the hair and horse can be worked. Page 17 in pamphlet with eàch bottle tells how. $2.00 a bottie deiivered. Horse Book 9 K free. ABSORBINE, JR., antiseptic liniment for inankilid. Reduces Painfut Swellings, En- Iarged Glands, Goitre, Wens, Bruises, Vari rose Veins, Varicosities,beals Oid Sores. Ailays P'ain. Wili teit You more if you write. $1 and F2a bottie at dealers or delivered. Book \"Evidence' free. Manufactured only bY W L YOUNG, .D.F. 138 Lymans DIdg.,Egontreal, Cmii. \"-r, .1 Tisel western Home pMon thly \"Irf I believe in anytbing at ail,\"t said the doctor, \"I believe in (iod'e rec4oiig. sWe are rnorally responsible: wçe know t te differenee between right anti .wrofg. e--ertainly we .shall have to gile account.\" 9 \"'Make nien realize that.\" said the novelist, \"alid The battlç is %Non.\" 'The doctor' said, aftýr a slîght pause, \" 'Perbaps. the day iay corne ihen ineil Dof science will ho reeognized as servants -of God, even as stewards of Ilis f mystories.\" \"'Yes,\" $Rad the novehist. \"Wbeu they are seen, ike that good wvonan. seeking and eaving the lost.\"-Scottish Temper- ance League New Year Tract. Nursery Rhvmes Revfle Mistreffs Mary, wise and wary, How doce your moncy go? With Temperance sound, rnany a pund We've got in the bank to show. 1 Pooe Mrs. -Homrest in a corner, Saying with many a sigb, He'a into that den, drinking again, What a sad wife arn I. Hi diddle diddle, the fooi's in the middle, A crowd geta round very soon: The littie boys laugb te sSe such fun, And the drunkard apes the baboon. Pide a cock homse to, Banbury Crose, To see a fat brewer get on aàfine horse, Rings on hie fingeÉe that everv one knows Rad te be paid for by somebody's woes. Daddy got drunk and clirnbed on a wall, Daddy got drunk and had a great fal, Ail the King's homses and ail the king's men Couldn't get Daddy to touch liquor again. Dicky Dunut, the Piper's son, Ho gt drnk sd tried to run, T'ripped bis tocs and broke bis nose, Silly Dicky Dunnt Sing a song of temperance, A pocket funl of gold, Four and twenty bank notes, 1In acupboard rollcd, Wben the door ie opencd, Ouit he notes we bring; Tell me where'e thc drinking man Can show you sudh a thing. The-Brewer's in tic counting house Counting out hie money, Hie wife is in the parlour Eating bread and honey, The drunkard's in the tap room, Dressed in ragged clothes, SSo n ay ho homade to see hecause of al hie woes. -British Temperance Advocate.",
         "Winnipeg, Mardi, 1914. - -- h Scotch Column 914. * * * In Schools. The Aberdeen Sehool Board are introducing (on -sanaitary grounds) \"bubbling fountains\" ln the ichools. Some of the natives describe the ar- rangement thus: \"The drinker oooks it up withoot need' a cupi\"l To Wag thie Tongue in Scots Easy keepin' the castie thats no be- sieged. Get yer rock and spindie ready; heaven will send the tow. Muckle water rifle bv the miiler disna ken. Some ane bas tnuld lier \"she was bonn'v.\" The bird maun flicker that hae but ae wing! The De'il's a busy bishop in bis ain dioeee. When my heid'sdoun, my boose is, theekit! There's nane sae weel shod but May slip. Neyer a bad but xight be waur. Aye sorrow at somcbody's door! Naething is jîl said tbat's no ili ta'en. Nne woo' Mae coorse but will tak' sofle color. There u'er was a bill but had a hooge ett its fit! A Lost Ring. The six-year-oid ii- ter of a grocer found a gold diamond ring at the bead of Loch Fyne. The father learned f rom neighbors tlîat a ring had been lst and searchied for yenrs ago, andj communicated with a lady ut .Johannesburg in Soutli Afriea. The ring wvac fouiîd ta be hers. lost six- tee yersago. The ring was restord and a reward sent. A Farewell to Bonde Teviotdale O)ur native land-our nativc vale-ý A long, a last adieu! Farewell to bonnie TeviotUale, And' Cheviot's mountains blue! Farewell, ye hbil of glorious deeds, Ye streams renowned ini sang; iFarewell, ye braes and blossomed meads O)ur hearts have loved so long! Farewell, y. blithesome, broomy knowes, Where thyme end harebeils grow; Farewell, the hoary, haunted howes, O'Ierhung with birk and sloe! Home of our love-aur fathers' home- Land of the brave and free- The sail le filapping on the foarn That bears fl5r far from thee! We seek a wild and distant shore, Beyond the western main; We leave thee ta return ne more, Nor view thy cliffs again! Our native land-our native vale- A long, a last adieu! Farewelto bonnie Teviotdale, And Scotland'a mountains blue! -Thomas Pringle Professor Blackie, of Edinburgh, had always an eye for the grotesque and the puzzling. ,- When 1 sent him eigbteen words which a Highland acquaintance had picked up among the Ojibway ]n- dians, and which he said were the same as in the Gaelie, Blackie répfled: \"I have eaxefully looked over your list of words, but arn not prepared to, swear by it. Etymologies are very alippery thinge, especially ln the banda of a half-trained Hlighlandman.\" The words were un- doubtedly ail names of thinge the In- dians had gt in tTade from the Gaelie agentà of trhe HRudson's Bay Company. Ye'streen, when to the trembling string, The dance gaed througli the lighted ha',y To thee my fancy took its wing, 1 sat, but neither heard nor saw;- Though this was fair, and, that was braw, And yon the toast o' a' the town, I sighed, and laid amang them a', «Ye arena Mary Morrison!\" Alexander Macpherson, of Killen, was one hundred years old Gfn the last day of the old year. A hardy, old High- lander! He had many, cahgratulatory letters and lelegramas, one frorn the King and Queca. ShaLe0. Oil-burning vessels of wax are apparently ail the vogue now lu Britain. Lui Linlithgowshire the manu- facture cf oil frorn the beds of alale-a kind of bastard coal formation - le Iikely to have a great \"boom.\" It is being very extensively manufaciaired. Why weep ye by the tide, ladye?1 Why weep ye by the tide?1 -LI'il wed ye to My youngeet son, And ye shall be his bride! And ye shail bie bis bride, ladye, Sâe comely te be seen;- But aye ehe loot the tears down-fa' ,jFor Jock o' Hazeldean!, -Scott Edinburgh University. In the past year the students were 3,261, of whom 549 were women. \"Master of Art\" de- grecs conferred.,276- \"Doctors of Science,\" 8, one a woman. Tie University had many legacies and gifta of money dur- *ng the ycar 1913. The population of Edinburgh is now 321,200. Professor Blackie ueed te tell qf a great occasion, when a speech was de- manded of hlm respecting Burns. The programme was long, and hie was near the bottom of it, and hie saw that the eolnpany were weary, so lie just pro- posed \"a toat\" and sat down. But neXt day the paliers had a long speech interspereed with \"hear, !ear!\" and \"ap- plause-a speech hoe neyer delivered. The difference ln latitude betweeu London and Edinburqh la indicatcd by the fact that the possible sunshine-sun- rise to cunset-was, for London, duriug the first week of this year, 54 hours, 36 minutes; for Edinburgh, 48 hours, 30 minutes. HIghland Mary. 1 have satisfied mny- self that Burns and Highland Mary (Mary Campbell) parted near Ayr on 14th May, 1786; and that she died at Greenock, between the 2lst and 25th October, in the saine year. And that lier age was between 22 and 23. She had some brothero, but only one sister, \"Annie,\" then 12 years old. - W. Wye Smith. Wben the fheviots cry to us out of the iit, In plaid of the purpie, or robes of the suoW, The whispering caîl of themn who shal resist? What heart shall not heed them, and go? qunshine and ramn, and the sea-mists raw, And the Bowmont's silent lute- The sun going down upon Hownam Law, And the stars over Cocklawfnot! Win. IL Ogilvie Old Lady Perth'and a French gentle- man were discuàsing the merits of cookery in their resjlective countries. The Frenchman made some disrespectful remarks about some of the Scottisb dishes. \"lWeel, weel,\"y said the Countess, G.some folk like parritch, and some like puddoeks\" (f rogs). Sheoting Game. Tn Dunbar, Berwick- shire, a. turkey escaped from a butcher- shop and flew to the roof of a high tene- ment. As there was no other way of securiflg it, a sportsman w'as got to shoot the \"game.\" Afforestation la the Highlands le urged in miany directions. In that moist cîinate there is no doubt the nountains 2ta1ten as a whole - were originally covpred with wood, and could be so again. In haîf a century it wotuld begin to bring wealth to the country. and f rom thie first give winter-emp]oyfient toý nianiv men in taking care of the grgw- iing forest. the. skin. OSi ciemtifioeêm~uiO han develoed the tOt*1V ne nu l amolv. Ile daily urne of thme «in luPhi~ olive surpauom any otho m« keeping the ikin nwf t, .uo* Palmolive* For ai.moth, demi cmpexon, for pe tpitfordlisaO.n perumforcol, 0et= 111.met' for imeiae herlaha or msoit u. orSh 1. etolenepu ditvca mrmrethamn ce.ou-4\u0026m0er uw ]PALOUYE UE*MSO I.. 09v. 0Rlepo-mkt h. lir 1, ru. and healt ~ad leexelent for, the scalp. It rinses ou a eiy sMd leavea hYo r ot and tracabi.. Pria. 50 ents. PALUIM E U a\" leanuus 1h.pOMorest he Mdia\"mdmd a delightful touch after the nset Pabve or ShaIpo f you ica de alne rae package cf ither wi!i b. maiied prePaid on *receipi of Prce. IL J. Johýn.. 00 i. LMd. 15\u002657 Geori» tee, orcuto, On. Agnerican /scoV .JJhenSwoepC. Lud. 't - 'j. t' -~ v '~-''--' The western Homne «monthly A Beaufy Secre 3,000 Year3 Otd The.Fgyptian maid of 3,000 yém ago *as famous for a perfect complex- ion--probably due to the use of olive cil lu combnationwith cil cf palm. W. know that no other products of Nature haïve been discovered ince ho equal palm and olive oilu benefi to C.E f f. loy with o 111e. \u003erces, Ail their a and \u003eedla y, 15N. t, IIL »Sel EL :mI one, imilar DUfd. \u003e the Page telle 'ered- nt for En- Vai- 0lays i and Book ly by , Can. BIG NEW CÂTAL [t is crammed fuL of BIG BARGAINS at iprises that gnat. a n 1 GR,,O\u0026 cent uwl idIES, BOOTS, HARDWMARE, VERInlCLE8.\u0026OIXLaadT» SUPPLIE8, aud numerous other articles for the ROUI w4 NAIt. of these atcles l fuUl GUARAN TEE» to give mteato or will b. refwided wlth ai freigbt chrg. SIDN for t\u003eswQNa\u003eU t'. entirely f ree-won't coat yen a cent, end it wil .the me.o considerable on your purchases. beddes gvlng you mereafnl tQ la only obtalmable at our store Gummuntoo4#, R@ad W F.O.B.r Our Mg Ste. etalog. Guaranteed for. two yur,. Study the construction of thi. Wagon carefll, every part la made of Sm tclams ipaterial and finiehed equaiiy as good as the blghest priced vehice. WHEELS-1 inch Rime, 40 luches Fron t, 44 Rear. Sarve Patent, Mor- coline Trimmings. Sweil Sides Stick Seat. SpriUff Cushion. GEAR-Double Reach Rear King Boit PifthWbWeel, 15-16 Long.Diane \"xes. Body 24 juches widc, Patent Leatherdaah. Shafts are weli braced and have fernald couple.re PAINTING-Body and SeatBlack-; Gea \u0026 Green. Write us for PÉUcS on Bugges and DomortsDol1voiý at yen Station THlE FARMERS9 SUPPLY COQ LIMITI3D Dept. W.H.M., 173-179 B3Dflatyfli Ave., WlnDpg,XaUn.",
         "The western. Home iWonthly Winnipeg, Mardi, 1914. loi s5m t\u003cahw. th U ifr.WObtmn ymw we. T i ai.w~s ihewakhma; ts t 1R~fT CH mCaL o io go Md e. tEPr.sPav THE LABEL Oit your paper wUlilteil when yaur Stud ln your renewal NOW 0 PATMORE' TREES, We eau offer you the BEST 0F SEED PRICEIL WB are wlling to ADVISE AND AS Wer a su pyvou the TOOLS to work wi YOU TO FIDA MARKET for your proc The West han now reached that stage wl description is in greater demand. WHY NOT GROW SOUE SPECIALTY? ONIONS are imi great demand at good price nm*n? They dc weil on new rich sol-buti The Young P.ple's Club: plan a course of study, and carry their plot and an analysis of the chief ts osblte purpose to a conclusion regardless of charaêters were emphasized in thç study. other attractions; others flnd that they À set discussion was held one e-,en ing Marion Dallas accomplish greater resuits under the as to \"cThe Hero of the Drama.\"1 At the stimulus of companionsiîip. We ail need close of the flrst season one of the boys the social influence to draw oit the best was overlîcard expresing himself as fol- Young People, whether in the cityr, -in us and keep us from bhein« nari'ow lows: \"If the fgllowe couI\u0026 only be town3, village or rural community de- and unappreciative of the human atnmos- nmade to feel how interesting Shake- uîad nmrneY foret of social life. Tihe phere and e'nvironmient Reading clubs speare's pinys are, they wouldn't waste Jack of organized social acivity amolng for young 'people supply these needs, time reading the.books theyr have to hd YOUBg men and women invariably leads especially in emaîl comimun ities where when their mother 18 around2' -bd to motal and physical and spiritual thse. stimulus of a large cij'cle of intinsate Caa\u0026 nLtrtr lb disaster. The questionabie forme of friends in lacking. This club waeranizedColubt. amusement ail owe their existence toThscu aorniet mta the fact that those who ehould lead Simple Reading Club. two-fold purpose: to acquire a wi(ler Young people into right avenues *of In a small town the teacher disýovered knowledge of Canadian literature and aétivlty for mind and body do ]lot tbat the boys of lier class were loafing to develop thse social life of thse com- recognfe-or refuse to recognize-tl«at abo t the streets and gaining access to munity. It proved a pronounced suc- man in a social animal and life and pape~ and books of a mnt harmful cess ins botiî departmnents. activîty muet express themsaelves in isatuIne She suggested that the boys One evessing was given to the study of nmre way. spend one evening each wccek at ber Canadian Sonigs and National Antheins. Social enjoyments foster rellnement and home and read some good book with ber. This field afforded an abundant ftindi the advantages accruing from Young Most of the boys responded to thse in- of material for a musical evening. people's clubà are even greater than vitation. They chose a play and se A subject wvhich i as also most in- those whicli accompany the clubs for assigned a part or character to eaclh teresting and full of possibilitieswa older- women, The pleasure from coin- msember of the elas. The history of thse \"olfe la Canadian Literturiie.e one- panionship should be even greater and period covered by tIhe play was read talk was given on \"Wolfe in Fiction.\" the club itself bas the possibilities for a 1so. Gradually the group of young Reference was muade to Thackeray's lalrger aohievemaentL Tboff inteq-eutedin fellows began to gaini an intelligent 'ýVirginiians\" and Heitty's \"ý%Vitis Wolfe the matter of organization should sece grasp of the truecnseasling of educative in Caniada.\" Special attention wvae last month'e paper for full particulars. \u003e-ading. The student instinct was given to Sir Gilbert Parker's \"Tite Sente What to Study, awakened and new talents developed. of tise MNighty.\" \"Wolfe in Poetry\" wau Much latent ability was discovered and support\u003eed by seleet ions front -)r. Jacke- Thie ie al*ayg the leading question an cager spirit of enjoyment in an en- way's poemns. A closing tribute wus for a new club to decide. It is wise to tirely new realm of life made possib . .îid is tihe nagn ifi cent -wiords of begin with a subject about which every The boys were permitted to bring a Chsarles Sangster to Wolfe and Mont- member knows something. A club friend-boy or girl-and the study calsi. should avoid scholasticisnî. Subjects of period was always followed by a fev.;' \"Thse St. Lawrence and the 'Saguenay\" human interest will weld the members minutes of social enjoyment. This ivas anotiser subject, tise historie and more than any one other tiîing. Every particular club was cartied on for a thse roinaîtic being strangely blendecl. member should answer the roll eall anidiumber of years and as tise members \"Canadian Dog Stories\" brouglit to ligist every member each evening be given a moved to other communities otiser clubs selections fromn Marshall Saunder's definite opportunity to take part in the were organized and proved just as \"Beautiful Joe,\" and Edgerton Youlig's discussion. These are axioms for the beneficial. \"HI-ector\" and the history-simple: and succeseful club for Young people. The programn followed in thîs instance pathetie-of \"-Rab\" by Dr. Br-own.*.- Reading Clubs. wvas as follows: Tise first year tlsey read Tihis club met fortnightly in tise 1ýomes \"The Merchant of Venice, Lee's \"Life of tise nembers. and retresiînsnts were Ruskin tells us to read a good book of Shakespeare\" and William ýWinter's served e\u0026cl eveising and a social hour every day. It may be a littie poem or Shnkespcare's 'Englanid;\" selectioîms spent. a choice bit of prose, but it opens up from Irving's Sketch Book, Stratford- avenue for tlsiniking an\u0026 re-actis on tAsie on-Avon. Tise teacîser prociîred picture Canadian Indians. life and character. There is much to post cards of aIl tise points of interest. Ts td fts al ain n be gine bythesoltar stdy f aSets may be secured froin tise larger tribes of Canada is welI worth a winter's book wbich cannot be gained in any book dealers made especially for tisstud. ,Tihe origin and. tiradjtiçnta of other way. Young people differ in purpose; if desired nsay be used with hsdy. ple are fully treated in Miske- temperament. Some youwsg people can the reflectoscope. A synopsis of the La' ia v rbso ieDmno. Butler's \"Wild Nortisland\" co'itaips -a plcturesque narrative of travels in- the forests in tise days of tise, fur trade. \"Tise New Norths\" by Cameron, describes a journey to tise North by water to-.tie inouth of tise MacKenzie River. -' The 'S'RELIÂBLE SEEDS paradise of thsernountain lmber le pictredin Wlco's \"anaianRockies.\" SIIR BS A \"P PLANTS Prowvse's \"History of Newfoundland\" is a tisorougisly accurate bistory of thse at the LOWEST PEAS FOR SEED can be grown to perfection in this early inliabitants of that island Doîhin- ST YOU how to climate, but the seed muet be sown early. ion. Dr. Grenfeil treats 'thse Coast VEGETABLE AND FIELD SEED of the HARDESTand peoples in bis own unsique nianner. th and can HELp EEST varieties. BosWihLn neett ffuewhnfgrown. hen produco of al e. Why not grow muet be sown early AUl of the BEST GRASSES, FODDERS, ROOTS, and SEED POTATOES are listed in our catalogue. Western rye grass, 12.00 per hundred; Canadian Blue graaa, $14.00; Cocks- foot or Orchard grass, $ 18.00; Alfalfa, clean, true stocka, $24.00 per hundred pounds. F.O.B. Brandon or Saskatoon. IIUT PEIZ COLLECTION, sASErATOON ROITICULTURAL S13Ow, 1913 1 Grown from Patmore's Relible Beeds .IN OUR NURSERIES we grow ail of the hardy varieties of e1RUIT TREES and PLANTS. We offer this year: 30,000 Currant and Gooseberry bushes 100,000 Raspberry and Strawberry Planta 30,000 Mapies, Ash and Elm from 1 to 10 feet 50,000 Popiars'and Willows 1 to 10 feet The Patmore Nursery Co., Ltd. ]Brandon, Man. Saskatoon, Sask. EVEYTNDiG lu HORTICULTURE Try some of the hardy and beautiful laure! or Golden Willows, 2 to 3 feet, at $5.00 per hundred, or the rapidly-growin.ý Scotch Pine 1 to 2 feet, at $ 15.00 per hundred. Our PRICES are LOW and our STOCK IS, RELIABLE. I 1HE PATMORE NURSERY CO. BRANDON, MANITOBA. Please send me your 1914 Catalogue on Garden and Fi d Seeds, Nursery Stock, Grasses, etc. N am e . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . Address............. ...................... ..... Canadian History. Some people acquire tiseir knowledge of hiistory mierely by' studying facts, wlsile others long for tise blending, of narrative or fiction ratiseir titan a bald statement of events and dates. For those who are fond of studying tise lîistory of Canada tlirotugh tise avenue of fiction, tIhe foliowhtg 114t of books will supply ittaterial for msore tliîai a winter's reading for any club. 1arknian tells the story of early Can adian life. \"Old France in the New World' by Douglas, is a survcy of tise lîistory of Canada in tise l7tis century. Tise roisantic story of Quebec is gral)lieiallv told in Dossgity's \"Cradie of New Franee.' \"Canadian Types in tise Old Regýiisse\" by Colby, groups varions asp ets of Frenchs colosization around( sueli cliaracters as Champlain, Lavai and Frontentac. Tise story of thse- Frenchs settlvnments on tise shsores of tise ]1av of Fuîsdy is toid by Hannay in Ilus \"IIistoî y of Acadia.' Wood's \"Èiglit for Canada\" is an aceurate account of tise long comîlict betiveen Engiand and Fransce ini thse N\\ewWorld. Bourinot's -'Uaîtada IUnder Britisi Rule\" emphasizes thse politicai history of Canada from tise early davys to thse lresent. Laut's \"CUiiadt. the Enpireqf tise Nortîs,\" is devoted to the romsansce of Canadian history. Probably tise best survey frosn Lltinse of tise eonquest to tise war of M S2 i îoitaitied in \"Tise Tistory Of Calitaîla\"1)v Llsî. A -work by tise sanie mitlî\u003cr..il( inaqi iin Mar of ISI'2\" is tise inîîî-4 ii (ihie horv- oftie vr foil Ille Briti-4s side. Bi'adley'Is \"Canada inl - I. s\u003e 48",
         "W-innipeg, March, 1914. chief study. even ing -At the he boys as fol- nly be Shake- waste to hide fleet a W i(er re and e com- ýdsuc- Ludy of ritheins. t fund ag. ost in. LS was , one iction.\", keray's Wolf e Il Was e Seats Jacke- e wus ds of uenay\" ie and lende(l. under'. r'ouig's le: and .Iýomes s were .j hour is d inter's m1 -of l Mte. inon.\" %ilis -a in- the tra(Ic. scibes to..the 'The ber is ckies.\", nd\" is f the )Oîin- Coast f acts, m, of x bald For g the LveIue s wvilI intel' Cin New )f the ntury. [le is ra(le )es inl e.oups 7ation iplain, f th\u0026~ f the in his At for d the and inot'5 asizes n the aut'à ,, is adin f romn ar of F, of sanfie s the fro ml Do It Now When you've got a job te do, SDo it now! If it's one you wish was through, De it nowv! If you're sure the job's your own. Just tackle it aie ne; Do't liem and baw and gran- Do it new! It doesn't pay to shirk- Do6 it now! If yeu want te ili a place And be useful te the race, Just get up and -take a brace- Do it nowv! Don't linger by the way- Do it now! You'I l]ose if you dlay- Do it now! If the other fellows wait Or postpone until it's late, You bit up a faster gait- Do it new! The Lttie Master The great hall of the castle was a won- derful place te play in. It was s0 long thiat when you wero at one end tho other end looked dim and shadowy evon by daylight, though te, be sure this was partly because the windows wero small and high up, and there wore ot many of them. Thero was net mucl furnituro. The great oaken table stood at one end, with the straight-backed cha irs areund it. and at the head the Baron's great chair with the welvos' heads carved on the armns. Thon there was a bigh screen, eovered with leather that had once boom gih(led, and a higl-backed settle or twe, and the huge sidebeard or drosser where Duncan kept the platters and tankards of silver and pewter and the few bits of china, the Lgdy's pesset-cup, amd the flowered bowl front which littie Elspat ate lier bread and milk. And thero was the enermous fireplace, with the black iron \"degs\" and somo welfskins and deer- skins in front of it; and that was ail, ('Nept-a very important exception, the ittle Master weuld bave said-tlio ban- tirs and weapons amd old armer that ung on the wall. We will talk about these another timne, lb-t now I must say again tlîat the hall W% as a wonderful place te play in. You cnid run races, and it did Vit takze many inrns te put Eispat quite ont of breath. Or voet couid ho robbers or dragons and ]ive in the Darksenîe Dens at the farther etid, away front the table and the fire, and rush eut on the people who passed through. Wýhen you were dr-agons you threatened te devour them, but when yon wore robbers you just carricd themn The- Western Home Mont hi y the -2btb Centuiry,\" and Morganes's Can- adign Life in Town, and Country, des- cribes Canada to-day. Canadian Polk Lore. The character, legends and folk lore of -the people\"of Quebec are sympathetie- aiiÉ treated in'NieJiolson's \"The French Canadian\" and Frechette's \"Christmas in French- Canad.e and Greenougl's * \"Cenadiafl Folkc Lif e and Polk Lore.\" 'The story of Murray Bay and the Èiàpeours associated with that vicinity il told by Professor G. M. Wrong in*bis \"kCanadian Manor.\" Liegar in bis \"In ie,.Days of Oher Canada Company\" deseribes the settiement of Upper Can- ad\u0026. Dawson's \"'The Saint Lawrence\" ia in exploration of Eastern Canada; Burpee's \"Search for the Western Sta\", explores the West. Western 1ur Trade. The dramatie storY Of the western fur . trade is told by Laut in \"The Conquest of the Great North-West,\" and Bryce'i \"REomantie Settiement of Lord Selkirk's Colonists,\" gives us a reliable account of the origin and history of the ]Red River Settlements. \"MacBth'tt \"Making of the Canadian West\" em- bôdies the reminiscences of a western T_ joneer and covers the, period of the Riel Rebellions. Begg ' \"istory of British Columbia\" contains a summary of British Columbia to the year 1894. Moricls' Northern Interior -of British Columbia\" throws new light on the history of the Indian fur trade and gold mining. The Littie' PInk Pige The littie pinkl pigs have' been rooting around,' Rooting areund ail night, Though I warned them well they must alumber sound Till the blink of the merning liglit 1 warned thern well, as the owner 1 gowned And snuggled them warrn and tight. But thougli I told them they mustn't pcep out, The little pink pigs have been rooting about; I warned them ono and I warned thern ton, So new they must go in the sock-and- shoe pen, The pon of the sock and shoe. First the sock and thon the shoe; it's nearly eight o'clock! teck the little pigs in the scck, Shoo the littie pigs in the shoe, Pen the littbe pigs in the pen, The pon of the shoe and sock. The little pink pigs, with a wriggle and dive Ail under the gown they rua; Whilo the owner watches me ceax and drive, And gigglos a gale at the fun, And squeals as I swoeep on a drove of five And capture tho five in one. O, the little pink pigs have been rooting about, Though I warned them well they mustn't peep eut; Se I capture five and I capture ton And drive them into the sock-and-she Pen, The pon of the sock and shee. First the sock and then the shoe, and thon the shoe and sock. Locký the littie pigs in the sock, Shoo 'the little pigs in the shoe, Pen the littie piqs in the Pen- Its almost eight e dlock! to your secret hola and they hiad to tel 4t story bý way of ransom. Mont of ton it was Cripple Giles, the lame kiteben boy, wbo helilped,.Duncan; but lie vas lmot a very interesting captive, for' lie onfly knew6dne story, and thst was vêiy short. This was. it: \"Said the man te Sandy, 'Will ye land me a mill?' «\"Said the man to Sandy, \u003cWiIl ye lend nie a mili?' \"Said the man to Sandy, 'Will ye lend« me a mill?' '0f course I will!' said Sandy. \"And Sandy lent the man a mili, And the man liad the boan of Saudy'5 Mill. '«Vi1l ye lend -me a milI?' said Sandy; '0f course 1 will!' said the man.\" Duncan was usually too busy to plpY or toit stories-that is, lhe neyer wo4ld bo a captive in the Darksome Dons; but somotimes, if lie feit very well (Duncan liad rhoumatismn a good deal), ho would b. -a. besieged- garrison, behind the --tail screen, and lho made a fine one. One day the children saw hlm sitting on hiseh igh stool beside the dresser,' poiishing the great silver grace-cu1I with a bit of soft leather, and hummîng te himself-it was always a good sign wben Duncan hummed. The children looked at each other. \" Shall we ?\" whispered Elopat. 4\"Yes! \" nodded the Little Master. Dowu they went on hande and knees, and crept behiad the ¶reat screen. It was wide as well as high, and they could Croce along behind it tili they were near the Lae garrison. T ho garrison sat aIl unconsetous, polishing-.and hummig something, with a refrain of \"With a hey lillelà and howlo Ian!\" .Suddeniy a cry rang ia bis cars: \"Sound out, trumpets! up scaling-lad- drs!\" In another minute -the Little Master was on hie knee, wavinig a glag, and Els- pat had hier arma around hie. nock, and bath were crying: \"Yield! yield, or we put ye to the sword!\". I yield mie! I yield me!\" cried thie steward. \"Hâtve a care of the grace-cup, my Lord. Ye weII-nigh kaoeked it out of my hand.\" Ho set the cup carefully on the dresser and looked at it proudly. 1 guarcante My stecIa te mldcrthe trm- moetion e010»d until yeouamc mmt Ibau mta Dear ir-Peacud me, by Par.?\"t.cuir poctofficcm fero8d.r.....:ItIauistSêodif=h Dot âar nt ctory Mal Fouyedaim or. them.Iqa mm r Mus ad yen wIlrot=rnthe.above mut PJ r o ............. ......... ....... . Aime btànufacturerof lUn WmrldFa.us'Sdemic Shoca\" 1farDrma ad OUcrW . A week maier lima tihe IaUc.m Mmrepréduce ia. *»the CimlWa Jewel. Au à rea.ticfi. Ae à rld grledini e ltcit cnl la ur field teos. I.X.L.,Toiuato prvdto b. a weck to ten dayu ene than the Spark'à Earliana L itanabusdancce ffruit lrgr1 n moeprlfe hnCha1k'a Jewel;i.a . ay number pi I mceilaresth pluentllTt. TheI.X.L. Tm toiwtout abiiccol lftheleadingcb w «mI7ery Tomato. DO bot e uriat with it. but plant yor tiar inyupl I.X.L. T Y\" qropwill a=youbig returnh. 2.4ecaufih illit ed ed. 3 ies arc a prfecetma of large,m\"mci.uia .c icatuddbdj 0iI S. Fit lat I zrcsnly mrly, mrmcuuiabuadaul , . il a ee. 4.Vien eampse mcd c.abc e id\u003cwc ladapart l b »thmatc 5. ic aruaigrwet ful n faiwc nac my fc uh la r o~ f tcl. L. Tenat, ouI SPECIAL opffER We wanir cvery ersn who uns seeda to sec our 1914 Sced Book and try thiasgmlodd Paui Tomate, and we wil end a packet fer 10e.with Secd B*. This book ianil of new photograPha of v egetables. Fruit» and Flowera. 8Sed yoiur addresm to-day. WI'- RENNIE C0- Limited WINNIPEG Al» ai Tomcate, Mentrcul ccd Vaacouvcr Whcn writing *\u0026vertiters plea mention The Western Home Montbly. .'- TR'Y MY\"STELs\" FREE OVER A MILLION WORKERS KNOW MY «\"STEELS\" to be the best footwearin the world for évery outdoor\u003e Save $26 man-the Farmer; the Dairy, Stock or Cremmery-mn; on Shoe Bina. the Fruit or VegetaM? power-'every mian or boy SvDco -for mud, ulush, rain or slop; sand, gravel oran rocks; snow or ice-for barnyard, stable1fel,; furrow, stubble, road, f orest or - cernent biora -for any climat. and under alcodtos MayI pove without ost, riskorb to outtat1 my \"4Steels\" are an ABSOLUTÉ NECMUS-Y in YOUR work? May 1 send a pair of 8£Steels\"your- size-for jour FREE, TEN-DAY TRYON ejust SEE and TRY my \"«SteeS\" e r you buy any other workshoe? LIGHIT, COIFORTABLE, ECONOMdICAL., WAltRPROOF enTHE WORLD'S GREATEsTr WORtKSHOE!\"« COST LESS-WEAR LONGER THAN ANY ALL LEATHERS Thee ae agrat anythiguabot m \"imua\" iatmfer me% -a t. 12 that m hem btter feowea fr ynIb a \" le .g..............3 other warkshoe or amy rubber boot yen eve or e- 6h5.. bolter for your WORK--Your HEALTH--ut Iela 9 in. ligh, extra grade of bothor. \"Steela\" are LIGHTER than a?-sali b\"sl or tan ............... ......8.0 workuhoe. boeause on. piece of lou=h, Bles 12 ia. higli, extra grade f ethoeig :rn\" MWteul ve l les than Iie mnythilknesee blak or tan.e................ ......60 Jeather youk bave beBedelinnlg wxta rdeaIlmlh. IsSteIm are more ÇOMPOIITABLE than auy st\" le ........ ........1.f00au otlir er odace beeat'hêyfit blakeorfoot-n......er wai» twist, harden., or agel out 0orShpe-j Baefe=t#a .weat\" your fet--reheve amg preoatero*0 huions. omlouses, ehillaiu fiat-foot. braken- BwdGi n. \u0026iLi................... mp down areli, etc. E00MCL aylds9l.hhctagaec ah. \"Bleds\" are more OO than sySu n ib meo;iobt othur worki'hoe because theïr flkUt celidleu a»d- black or Ian........... ...........8a.i0' one pair of \"Bteleui\" vinoulwearth Il irsMx\u003c\u003ePire'Eauh eIle oe. 4\"Steel awortb aIleal vie m.' e'Suuam omore BATIBFACTORT tom much a. the butI ail lather work@ahocE e MM.'ra olfdoor man than samyother worlcmloe beebusehuhight 1-... \u0026ive a mmrefooting andl a nngle ooo tep ' My Stu\"rua la ame smlap-eutnal twamq - ýeé hlut' m almcm atherworkshaua. Ina«»ca fecfe int are bolter P!tÔTPB(7FON lhan amy Oezté clW\u003eou. w th -r workslioe because lbey are abseuley *eoe ha brobihtisg. p, enta. rhul., iasîe tmln sve their'camt ii doclor sad drug TEE mm T % pair of «Bels\" athome butane Oood C\u003csedtonaa-,alél~W you buyanolei vorkheWrite le me-gel *uBteelsnI-..le epmfolbee ~xy\"Siula B W »àu-Tr thiemal hom- \" ia vlrro ekbâ et my r'ýk. Then, use Youw own Judgment about tb he I. arn ae kpiahem. Bond me a pootal or the-eoujd= I4ogsalmmrÎ1.peil~ ship*%. aeeisdirect Item my Racine. actooy, Iltelsoy t ev orls.ye promptly. No risk--ng obligationn alm-hallw oriony ç'blib. ne dlea-ne trouble 1lo st'ek\" Ne eofbu\u003en N vtaÀ'mtio lita ~ ~ Nc\u003e-\" PUB iirfm bsgnru.N.ik e.\"The 00\u003e t01.. .",
         "The western Home. ment hly Winnipeg, March, 1914. THEYOUNGMAN AND HIS PROBLEM - iXOT ÉBRE Boa ~\u003e tr t.lookforyour work.Te ile zmtee t pro frilont . door. .YoIUz can ýfâÈd withomt golagtoNew'ok o g Mwlthout te Québec. -Ton ucati thmfoiàgte Winnipeg. Y~o~sàu «a potWithout 'In .mile*' fw -pIuhm . ere'are men iho i te. t peuIicaeç,but -that iman ougbtfirst' te ehku p tii gr n iihuiecviiimmediat. vieinity. ~o .~e a oIok et your ewn p'remises. Fii up Yuom u ýwood pila,. Wàrk the. grass cutter on your 6\" Iawin.. Be tit-thi~t your-back yard fihalf way, dWent.-~àotablë aaying by Joseph Cook wa s: \"That seuIlta 1esitest t. God wii fa triking the bard- i Iýthe. eareet duty-\" CRETIVETHOUGET T\u003eio«aht power. in- the only thing which yen really P600W E verythiig eh.e can bc taken away frein yu.'j ldg'only remnains.' Yen os» think, tiierefore SYou can, tiiink pour way i, tiiink your way zxpthhmk your way under, tiink pyur way oier, Ualmk pu wa' ot and tiink. your wayon. The. ou ye fativ rce ta tiicught. The, more intense yârthought lai, -the. pester in your power. Yon hwVm..w.ll auigh only on. thing te do and that is- lbêit'ew te tink. Tiiougiit is everything. \"J .$» inthe - .Britishi W.ekly remarks: \"Thoxght -is, after aIl,4iioulythmig w, really'have; the. quly thing w. really kiqow.' Mr. Pierpont Mergan was known the. iO*brdy as ýtue owner cf tiie mansion inIf ew York, -~ ., ~nloin at Pri .'-gte; the ownor cf Yachts; if 'aitptoe~tes, of mueeuma, cf pricélesa col- lectos.. ht cf iiim, ewned tbem?1 ,Plainly, just hlb-tioiht.' As 506» as hie tiiinking in this venld oeusedàe'.had eeaied'teown* anytiiing here.\" -s . * a . AS RIGET I18 RIGET Steer by the. stars. Pick eut a few thinga wiic are firadarnental. Tie Up te tth. thinga wiih are vitaL. Wbatever yen doubt b. sure of God, Right and Conscience. Let this b. the. trinity entlù-oned in thy seul. Rigkteousness fa enwreught itothe. fabric of the. univers. as tue warp fa marriod te tth. woof. Elçhteumm sa orica weil in- every part of. God's vuverue. Rlghteousn.sa has the promise of the, yeara iiid fits ie eternity. Be right. .\"It is related,\" say the, editorsof a velume juat isaned entitled \"Essaya cp Liberty,» by Lord Acte», «it is related cf Frederick Robertson, ef Brigbton, that during oneocf bis perioe cf inteileetual perplexity b.e found that the only rope te heMd fast by was the conviction: 'It muet b. rigiit te do rigit?\" EE FAMILY FLÂSZ The family fiask fa a pied. cf furniture which la sometimes handed down frein generatie» te genera- tien. But, cf a truith, it c»» b. said. that it seldoin passes beyend the third or fourtii generatien, for the. very geod reason that the, generat ion passes down and out and the. flask fa left as a lenely tiiing o» the sii iap cf iiuman failure. Tii. man who wishes a long life, 'or a famîly name, carried onward for suc- cessive generations had btter fling.tii. flask te thé rear. A New England writer remarks: \"When for threo génerations a family uses ifq uer in exceàs, nature registers tho deterieration. Hia biegrapher tells us that the firet Webster represented colossal strengtu and sobriety. This giant iiad a son, Daniel, wlho repreaented colossal strength and moderate drinki4,j.hJle his son represented one wiio made the amuefflnt of bis ancestors te b. his occupation.\" ~DO'T -FORCE YOUR BRAIN Get the litile things eut'cf the. way, se that yen c»» have. room for the.. things wiic are worth wi'iile. Decidel little questions off. hund. q.et .tiem'eut cf theway.. hatifgo e doblunder occasienally, the uùivesý wll n te t pieces. Save room, time and lefaure for the thinge whicii are.important. Neyer décide à great question 'in a hurry. Take time te think, cogitate, contrast and compare. Your mind wiil crystailize if.yen only give fi time. Charles Kingsley says cf Turner, the. great painter, that h.e spent heurs and heurs in the mere contemplation cf nature witiiout using brush or pencil. An authentie 4 stery ia told cf bow Turner was once known te have à spent a whole day sitting upc» a rock throwitig f pebbles into a lake. Wiien eveninig came bis brother painters shewed hum their sketches and 'rallied hiîu upc» havfng dorie netiiing. N. saîdî' «\u003cI have don. thf, ai lésât: I have learncd.how a lake loka when pebbles are tiirown into f t.' ~5LGerdo, D.ý\u003e., Central Congneatlonal Ciurch, Wim Keep on good terme with yourself. Kpep your coîmaceieeffriendly, té your :meémory. lkemémher that 4, th iget ye frepct self. respect. Thone is ntin hWd '*1» .bring' you Ù\u0026muea\u0026tisfaction as. a'pure l1f.. Thé. cleanest thing \u003efa a dlean record. So,l b. straight 'Do not compromise. - Do not eqùivo- cate. Do not asic 1-fa sent. on the. fence'. Be fit-ý footed,- outspiekeà, -and easy of -cemprehension2 on aill -vital mattera. Not so. mucii for the. sake of the world, as for yoiýréelf- and i o own pi.ace and joy. Hld ini mmd the, fact tha4 you muet lhve with your- self ankd die by yourself.- When a mn- thinka, lhe in always al\u0026one. Be true to yoursélf. A popular -writer remarka: \"A London friend i. the commercial worid told. me ho* a certain business matter had arisen between himself and an acquaintance, ama à T-Uïe *o-r1d Th.le rÎyrikd'Bwmihf there to b. for me out of this piece of business?'- meaning secret commission. 'That in not quit. the way 1 do business,' was my.friend's answer. TBut nobody need know-no one could find -out.'«Oh, yen, some one would.know.' 'Who-how?' 'ýQh, tiiere'à one who would know.' Th man tiiought he scented a religions reference, and became sareastic: «Oh, is.- that viiere you are-fs tiiat the. sort cf man you are?' 'Theres one man would know,' quietly persistedl my friend, 'and there's ne pDràon whoee gâod opinion I value as I value isi. and that'a myseif; I'd always know.\"' We are net bard on the man:who-smokes.- be.cause we are convinoed.that. if smoking were th.e niy ei in the. world thé. huma» family w;ould b. very happy. But for the. chain-amoker we have 4mail respect, and for -the. mani who .amokei dûriug busines hours *e bave. ne great admiration.. About the worst intro- duction for.: a young man- who. la'aeekinig te achieve sueff*a-in the business wôrld-is the odor of bad tobacce or the stencii cf an old pipe. Cnt ito-ut; te ail sucii we commend th. story cf the. eccentric but hard-working painter Whistler. Ceminig into lus painting elass one morning lie found an Englisii student smoking iei pipe. \"You should b. very careful,» Whistler said te hlm, \"You know yen might et intereated in your work and let yu ieg THE REÂSON FOR rÂILUR It ia an easy tiiing when a man fails te blame him; te charge hia defeat te a Iack cf commonsense or, what is worse, te lazineas or foolishness. But there are, nevertiieless, scores of young men whio. are te blame -for their own minfortunes. They invite defeat. -Tiiey have ail the circumtances arranged for a \"sluxnp.\" They carry about *ith them the signe and. symbols of carelessnes and .indifference. In mitter cf dress, toilet, and sanitation they are decidedly.objectionable. A shabbily dressed young man appli.d te tthe manager.cf a big departinent stdre--foy employment. «Wiiat can yen do?\" askcd the manager. \"Most anything,\" answered the appli- cant. \"Càn you dusti\" «Yesn indced.\" «\"Then why don't yen begn'oin your balt?\" The fellow hadn't thougbt cf that. \"Can yen ci.»» leather goods ?\" \"Oh, yes.\"_ «Tii.» it's1 carelessneass on your part that your shoca are not dlean.\"' The fellow hadn't thought cf that -cither. \"«Weil, cau 1ou scrub?\" «Yen, fndeed,\" was the reply. \"Then.» can give yeunosme- thing te do. Go out .and try your strength on that colaer yen have on. But don't corne back.\"' A FIGHTING CHANCE Alwaya give yourself' a fighting chance. Hav:e on board your siiip as many stronganciiors as yen have rocin for. Tic up te tithe ciurcii, the Sunday sciiool, tho Y.M.C.A., and the business science clasa. Cnt ont the things whicb have bec» tee much for otiier people sncb as tobacco, drink, gay companions and low bor» amusements. Give yourself a figiiting chance, W. clip the. fcllewing from an fnteresting -periodical: \"Charles R. Ross telle cf a yeung West- ern farmer who had bec» converted. It had bee» bis custoin when geing te tthe village te tie hie teai by the. hetel and visit the bar-room. After hie con- version h. atill continued te tic hie team te tth. hotel main hitching post. Tii. trained and watciiful eye cf a geod old deacon noticed this, and after congratu- lating the. yeuth upc» hie, new start i» life, said, \"George, I arn a good . deal older than yen, and I will b. pardoncd, I know, if I make a suggestion eut cf my wide Christian experience. - No inatter how strong yen tiiink yen are, take my advice and at once change your itching I)st.\" It M'as sensible advfce. If h. had sti Il gone te tthe old,,Place, and got in witii the old friends at the bar, wvho eau tel but h. would have :been tempted te mmr back, and penbape in an evil heur had fallen. \"Evil coum- munications corrupt good marinera.\" ÂNBW TYPE OPORÂýTQR It la always easy te \"«hold a meeting.\" And.almost glwaya- as easy to get- a speaker. 0f course wheî: a man speaka we make , an. allowance and leave. a margin for use temperi.ment, t't ie cf the -audience,' the. particular occasion. and aise -for the. faet that we have jasked hum te apeak. 1» factw. ask.me» to speak, very often, in hope that under the pressure cf platform enthu 'siasm they wiil bie tempted te say moue, or at leastte speak with a groater .omphasis than they would in ordinary conversation. Which leada us te remark that thero fa a demand for a new 'type of. orator, namely the private otater--the mn, who, Wiioreever hoe fa, fin the street or behind the, counter, will apeak hie mipd with conviction and courage. Borne one aid concerning 'Hugh Price Hugiqe:-\"h. was always expressing what othera theught, and -wiia-t -they lhad not' the cour etéo-Say.\" CROMWELL'S PICTURE Den't ask for toc much praise or accept it even if it is offered te you. If they compliment yen on theo size cf yeur congregation, tell tbem that ycur church fa \"central\" If they congratulate yen on your large majority in the lat electien, modestly remark that you have lived three times longer in the ne.14bourhocd than had your unfortunate political opponent. If yen are congratulated on a stray speech -whicii- happened Îo b. happfly, \"«sane, com., prehensive and practical\" let it b. known that -it was a condensation cf thirty years' experience ini your special line cf prefessional business. If men point te yen ,with- pride as an filustration cf long_ life; business,,sagacity, commercial honior and public spirit,, inforin tiiem that yen are simply a favourite chuldj cf cirétimstanoe and \"«a cbip cf the. old bleck.\"1 Net many men are se outapeken as Cromwell was wheft hesat te Cooper for hie miniature: \"Paint me asI arn,\" sad h., \"warts and ail.\" BE-SWIFT BUT DON'T HURRY Éustie la net matie, The man.who la «\"flying te te piecea\" fa net getting theie. The. merchant wbo ia in a swirl because lie doca net knew \"which way te turn\" fa net doing thinge. Mental excitement je, net business execution. Tii. man who is bringing thinge te pass is usually quiet, serene and self-com- posed. Nerve energy is toc valuable te waste it in sighs, moans and useleas exclamations. Stndy the. succesaful man: how steady lio is :-Anî eminent French surgeon used te say te hiuastudents when they were engaged in difficult and delicate operations, i which eolness and firmnesa were needed, \"Gentlemen, don't lie i» a hurry, for there's ne time te loe..\" BE STRAIGET I» the. long ru» nothing will hclp you se much with people as their belief concerning you that yen are straight. Even those who are angry with you because you wilI net fall fn lin. with their rascality, will have the. greater confidence in you when their wratii bas sobered down -into a sober second thought. In the heur cf emergency me» turn te the man who bas provedhimacîlf straight i» spite cf every trying circuistance. A capitalist wrote from the. continent of Europe te a young merchant in England proposing a very questionable transaction and received the following reply: \"I do not attend te business in that way.\"1 Some two years elapsed whcn the English- man received from bis former correspondent the request that lie take bis son in his office as \u0026 clcrk, adding significantly, \"eI desire my son te lear» holV te do business in your way.\"1 TWO STANDARDS There are two ways cf looking at life-through red glasses or throughi blue. You can mneasure the distance bctween thie base ef the mountain and its brow and exclaim: \"I have climbed it!\" or you can ineasure the f mmeasurable distance betwedn the higheîst.peak and the nearest star and affirm that ne airsh pipill ever span suchi a stretcii cf atmospherical be.Kng George of England, at the close cf the~ Revolutionary War, i» which he had lest thirteen colonies, proclaimed a'day cf thanksgiving because cf the return cf peace. fis chaplain said te hum: \"For what would your majesty have us give thanks? for the fact that you have lost thirteen cf the brigiitest jewels of your crowii?\" \"No, not for that,\" said the king. \"Beeause we ]lave 'added millions te our national debt?\" NO, 'not for tlîat,\" said the king. \"Because tens cf tlîousands of people cf the saine race have been destroved ?\" \"No, net for that,\" said thli king. \"Why, then ?\" insisted the chaplain, \"and for what shail we give. tlianks?\" \"Thank God,\" said the khîig, with great Velîe men ee, \"thank God becailse mnatters are i 'vorse.\"",
         "Wlnnldpeg,«Maroh, 1914. The We~tern Home Monthly AComplete Story by Annie m. Stewart 1 almost whien a leave. a Luirhice,' \u0026et that ýmon te saure of to Say mpliasis Which r a new he man, kind the ion and h Prie Sothers it even you oit at youi- you on îodestly r in the Political L. Stray e, com-l b it was in yout n point ng,, hife; c spirit,, te ehildl .\"Net a wheft ne as I It wam ýa tny room mand Very sparsely furished. The fleor, save for the '»arthrug,.- was. carpetiesi, and tho boards, -once stained brown, Bowed white and rough in places. At one cor- ner of the fireplaco stood an old desk, ïn the other a.capaclous and shabby arma- chair. fTerê were books evorywhore, books of aIl kinds, sizes, and conditions. A anis.1 bookease was crammed full of - them; they littered the #loor, the top of tbe desk, the table by the window. The mantelpioce bore au u-itidy array of miscellaneous articles, from alman- -ta, -tom --envelopos, ,empt.y match- boxes, and old pipes, to a child's broken toy iln a dog's collar. The whole room wore a, desolate, dreary, lifeless look; the bare boards, ib.u.ty furiiture, the tumbled books, aeemedte-watn - waiting hope- lèsaly-for the ttoeh cf some quickening pr esonce, some gracicus personality that should make cf the dreary wbole a fit- ting for its tenant. Ovor the mantelpiece hung tbroe pie- fures, the only beantiful things ia the ru;om-ono, a copy cf Watts's \"Love and Death,\" the second a print cf Reynolds's \"ÂAge cf Innocence\" and between these an 'enlazged phutiogrspbcf a.womnan, little more tiban a girl, not exacV1y leautiful perhaps, but Bweeter in ber gr-ace and youtb than the luster cf flowers in ber band, she stood beside a tmLll rose-bush bending a little-with haîf- parted lips-as if to kisa ber sister roses. Bebind, tbrough the leafy foliage cf June, against which ber fair head and white dress shone witb an almost radiant clearneas, came a glimpse cf a statehy, iv'y-covered, turreted bouse- ber home, the home she had noverý re-entered after lier wedding-day. She had been Gilbert Evans's wife, an~d she had been dead nearly one year. At bis desk, beneath a glaribg fun- shaded gas-jet, sat Gilbert' writing, or, rather, alternately writing ind tearing up what ho lad written. One or two books, whicbho b ad pushed roughly aside with bis elbow from the top cf the desk, lay upon the floor, their pages widespread, as if mutely appeiling against snob ignominy. One, a cheap edition cf \"David Copperfeld\" had opened at a picture cf Dora, the \"child- wife.» It eaught Gilbert's oye at lengtl, and ho picked it up and tbrust it hur- riedly into A drawer cf the desk, i-ile the memory cf another girl, another ah- most child-wife, came vividly back to bim. Involuntarily, ho glanced at the picture above the mantelpiece, and as quickly turned bis eyes away. For ber ilame, also, bad boen Dora, and aIe, like ber namesake, had faded early iu the blossom-time cf life. A clock somewhere in the hQuse struck the hour, and ho looked up with a start. He seemied n-vous, irritable.Pro'- aently ho srose, and, witl a gesture of disgust, threw down the pen and, push- ing the desk aside, flung himself wearily into the armchair. Ho sat still, very stili, bis elbows on bis knees, bit hbead buried in bis bands, gazing moodily into the beart cf the dying lire. So silent was ho, that the hurried, thin ticking cf a smal dock on the mantelpiece seemed to fil the air with its insistency. Yet, li the silence, in that dreary, commoxiplace, unlovely room, a duel wal being fouglit, a duel which is eternal, thé duellists the powers cf Rigît and Wrong, the meeting-place the heart cf mani, and the priz-a humaü Soul. And the strife was keen and bitter, as it ever is where the prize is worth the winning., For Gilbert Evans had corne te a Part- ing cf the ways, and as ho decided now, as ho chose the bigher or the lower path, so would bis future be. On the one hand, bis old life, commopplace enough, per- haps, witb its monotonous daily round of work and sleep; on the other, a neW career, an impreved position, wbere bis talents, cramped 90 long, miglit find fuller scope, where life would mean something more than a constant strug- gle to make ends meet. FIW,19D aund QARDEN SELECTED for theWS nourACTS WORTHREEMERM Steele, Briggs Seeds Have an established reputation for reliabflity a7d are known ail over Canada as- the *ubet that grow.\" Sthave Blggs S.dan umbroken succesion of \u0026atronage witla customi-rs doing businesscninalawt n i ver 40 YUIU Are coa.tantly en mroe aqand *aé slecton- -the succesao ouBeuflnve elghlhenoughf for the. next. Steel., Brlggs S..ds Have a continuons record of proreseemoding tran.acted in the spirit of old auhlWeZ bsiessta tegrity and laitus BOO KLETS'ON CUTR \"HOW TO OROW THEE E Eleven bookiets (cojyrght ai lqbt one .lU52page%,ail leèalmgyl rlees The firet of the kind publised lCanpàdsa'1.00 for 'the net, but RETO CUSTOMERS. I$$ N PRIZES FoItCOMftarTToN Our eaukl *and eful opld186-page r. -pueti**.hg~ requeat.h sFDtaio STEELE, BRIGGS, SEED ,C04 LImIW1 WINNIPEG Canada'. Oreatest Seed fHoues,.C fA Ijev*ty washdày-,If you dé, ypur r wa an I I EIX.L, VACUUM WA4 But gaining go much, what iias'théee to forfeit? Oly bis self-respect, only honor! And, to a man of bis staip, these were nô empty words. Gilbert Evans had been, from boyhod, employed by a certain flrma of. manufacturers, 'the head of whic'h had showwn bim innumer- able kindnesses, and bad indeed, treated him. more as a son than an, employ'ee. But it was a small business, iately a decay-_ Ling one. Gilbert, however, liad, alm.ost 1by aecideut4, atumbled acrosua anew idea, 1which, if capable of practical fulfilment,- would, he f elt sure, revolutionizo their mode of manufacturing, and bring back the prosperity go fast leaving them.. But, in some mysterious way, a rival and- powerf-ul firm-had -caught air hxkling- Lof the secret, and had begun experiment- ing on theit own account. It soemed only a question of time before the efforts of the larger flrm, with their greater facilities and more lavish outlay, would be auccesaful. But one thing, the turu- *ing-point of the whole idea, was lacking; the shell the rival flrm had managed to produce, but the kernel, thie very heart of the invention, was known to one man only, the man in whose braixi the idea had flrst taken birth--Gilbert Evans. The rival flrm stooped to bribery. Gilbert -had. heard several hints of what was impending, and -when the offer came-an offer inluding a large salary and a responisible position, as the prie of ceming over te thé enemy - hie was scarelysurrised. He despatchod bis re- fusai promptly and considered th Thon bis wife died, and, in the anxloty of hier ilîness and the awful anguish of lier death, ahl worldly concçerns were, for à. time, as dust and ashr to bim. .fter, when life beganslowly to as- sume normal proportions once more, when ho found himself we- ihtod -th the heavy expenses which eillness always bringa, and with the caro of a littie.son of seven years, to whom he was to be, hiencforth father and mother bath, some sane, sweet influence seemed tQ baye gone froin him, and ini a despergteýlefort to make money more speedily hoe beganl to speculate, with what, se far, had proved disastrous resuits. It was thon, when things at the fac- tory were not geing on se well, when bis employer, to wbose aid,- financial and otherwise, ho owed go much, was losing hope, and his experiments were oating up more money than they seemed hlkely to produce in the immediate future that a second offer came to him, baited with more glittering ures, a larger alary, easy hors a slendid laboratory at bis dposai wherein t bring bis ideas to funl fruit ion! So much for bis work! .And for bimself relief from the daily drudgery Of work-a-day life, from the deadly, droary round of labor and sleep wbich was siowly but sure'ly.duiling al bis finer faculties, bis nobler aspirations; leisure to flnd himself, te féel himself once more a man, and not mnereîy a machine, to live bis life as ho had meant to live it byr the light of bis lest ideals, to rescue bis talents from disuse,.to do something *ith bis self. And for bis little son, what of bis pros- pects? If hoe chose expediency instead of 0honor, ingratitude instead of gratitude, bow would it be with the child? De was a deicate, sensitive little mortal, and Gilbert often feared that the life of the conn cilshool, the only sehool ho could afford, was becoming too bard and roughi for bixn. From hie mxotiher, wbo ¶iad ad gentie blood in ber veins, ho ba in- herited many, dainty littie ways of speech and manner, and these Gilbert- dreaded hie must inevitably loge beneath ithe ridicule of bis playmates, to niany of ,whom anythiiig that savored of gentle blood was dubhed affectation, and to be wel-mannered was to' be considered be- neath contemipt. A better scbool, legsasor- did surroundixigs, and more care and at- tention than bie mas tlikely to receive froin the roughbanded, if kind-hearted \"ýgeneral,\" of whicb the Evans household considted, tfor the Child, were surely worth seeking. Or if--Cil-bert had of late often con- gideIred this Iast possibilit.y, probably becauCs in the vehemcnec of his grief if e had l0est 'wat it had f or bim- SEND IN YOIUIL LNEWAL NOW T HE LABEL onI you.r Paper will tell you when your ying te nt who eh wavy nent j», ringing f-com- e it in dy the minent n they ens, ini flemen, se.\", muel tt you h you icality, k their ought. n who trying tinent posng d the n that nglish- it the Scherk, n how iough re the nd its u can n the at ne erical f the irteeli use cf \"For s ? for 2htest id the Sour king. sainle \"said .9and s aid cause",
         "The WsternHome.tufothly %WlinnipM, Marcb,* 1914. lie himueif were soon to foiiow bis wife What of the boy then? He had a fewrelations, fewer friends, noue to wbom h is child could look for help. Il. wife .liad znarried hlm in the facs, of beérp.arents' anger, and -even ber death didnée-bring forgiveëness.-- So he-ý-e .alone-stood. between bis »an zd*dMtttion.* Bpt for how much Alread- the trouble lie .bad undergone, \u0026:ud the. daiiy disappointments alnd u*tmies 'of bis buiness,*were heg«Inning te tel ou hlm.The doctor talkedwarn- iugly of a nervoua'breakdown a d or- déred ruat, change, a holiday, advice wbich, in. the rsn-state of affaire, had a*ill heieeofheing taken! Uniest, as lie bad of late expected, the firm totaily cillapaed, and he had, perforce, te, take a hé«cUdy for god 'and ail. But, en the other hand, if he aceRted thiâs offer; if -lie -chose -m-oneyand pési- tion'before honor, and, forgettinir allthe many klndnesses bis oid master rad ever sbovu hlm, elected to repay him 'with in- gratitude, and deserted the sinking ship iistead of dosng his utmost to refloat her, what then ? The. remembrance of al bis own youth hdmsiaed, of ail that he bad hoped bis son'a lfe 'wouId liold, of thé University b. a4neverýentered,' but where the boy miýglt;Mid ail that he had bad to forego, miglit eveiL enter the profesjiculie had bi-ea, tbrougli want oft means, forced te, ruPh\"ûli, rose before bis eyes. No! The bqy-sbouId never be bampered as lie had bqenif rit iay in bis power to nake it otUtrwise! All this and more! But at wtprice T' ýHekpew tbat it wouid be deariy bqght, klew aiso that lied Dora lived h4pre wbite sulwould bave pre- f*re poet:0 tediabonor-even te that d 'îa1 r r,:of. which the world knows neugh', hich ila oly visible te man's seul sud the Great Potter ou wbose Wbeel it' was faahioned. tiin u a uwor;cd where tlee tronvot wina, a venld that ,by preeept and èec- amele daiiy enfonces the-tnutb of the old saysng,«\"T bat, le may 14e vise liastise pwer,» aWvend vliereih be bad ofily h)mBelt oaiy bis o*wtalents, te trust, te seeure- a footholdl-for hisaseif and ' the clhid-would bein lasfter yeaîm ouq*e là teèîiteoêier concience if leho Xt'his \"hmne of bettermeat sip. bY uà- hiededt FAnd the boy? Sùreiy if Dora could see bîm and know, sbe wouid understassd, and for -the boy's sake fergiveýh 1 hl ' He vent to bis desk, puiied out :a freali sbeei et paper, and wrote hia sc- ceptance. Signinig it burriedlY and wit)1- out a second glance lie puàbed -it'hastily ,ntoan envelope, ada1ressed and stampéd it, and apranz te bis feet with a giance at the cocok.- Tiere vas stilil ime 1e catch tie post, the piliar-box vas j# enteide. A few minutes and the letteBr wvouid,be gene,. gene lriretrievably.. Tnvoiu'ntariiy bis cye rested. for'\u0026a moment on th? portrait et bis vite. Was it mérely fancy or did the face in the photegrapli lose semething et its swebt iglitness lu tbat moment? . Did a gt deeper even than Death viden suddenly between him and. the dead girl lie ioved?1 He dared net looek\u0026gain, as, with the letter ln bis baud, lie turned tewards tise door. IL Sonnie couid net eieep. Me lied serewed hie eyes up tighlty and triedliard te slip jute Dreamland after Sarali, ot the rough bandse uid the untidy bead, hai- ing tucked hlm up.lu his cet and put eut tise galad betaken lier siip-shed vay dowustira, t t father's supper read'y. Me had kept t tightiy closed for visat seemedte hlm an incredible space et time, until hi. cylilds retused. te re- main devu any longer, and no e l ay vide awake sud trembiing, ataring iste the darkness, the baffling darkness thýt slireuded 'éach familier objeet lu the roem in impenetrable myàtery. Lest Chance for a FREE DINNER SET., Offer Expires'on MARCH 531st 1914.0 IThe above illustration anly begins to do justice ta this handsme combination color, oft and velvety in tone. A neat, embossed desgn follows the edge of every * which we have decided ta gve away P e piece. Ail handies and edges are traced with gld. Each set is guaranteed byTee SOtan D me to our readers. l e Western Home Monthly and by Messrs. Robinson \u0026C. h e-nown en ls IThe combination Dinner and Tea Set Consista of 47 plecea and la made of Winnipeg merchants. Ail thaý you have to do in order ta get this setjetandu we have ever seen. ý. The floral decaratson is printed under the glaze sn a rch fi- a magnificient reward for such a little labor. For any further particuiars writ- th b-tEgW esSmtPocern.Th H o mei oseo te al M ouJraterh seenneubcrpios aTh. esen om onhl t nedolr pic. url 7 .52 ~ Strange mysterlous shapes iurked bie- hind tb e wardrobe; a litge, formiess sbadow that 'lu dàytirne resoived iteîf into- the homeiy dressing-table stood glrimly in the window-a namnelees, Siln- i jter terrer bld. behind the baif-open, door!' But not merely the dread of lie- îing alone and- wide-awake- in-.the awe- sème darkness képt. Sonnie's eyes open. Something that 'seemied more dreadful, much more dreadful; to his sensitive littie hegt, than the. darkness b ad banlshed sleep. Nie cbIld-eons3eience, .what he, ilu bis baby tongue cailed \"'something inside,\" was uneasy, because, to-day, at school, be. bad nearly cheated, âearly-but not quite, at lessous. Re bad reeisted, but the temptation had been very strong, and the misérable thouglit that be might bave fallen made bis cheeks tingie and hie beart ache. Few eidren cheat liabituaiiy and as -a matter _ofcourse.- Some-may do se, tbýroug)h lazineàs,, a greater n umbe -r tbrough fear' of punishment for errera, but toe aru the 'epithet of \u003cîcbeat\" le a miafortune not. to be regarded with equanfinity by any normaliy constituted se oboy or girl. To Sonnie, witb bis .âne instincts,hi sensitive, seif-aeusing littie seul, the thouglit that be bad nar- rewly eseaped deserving it became in- supportable. If mether-up there among thse angels, but still iooking dowu te watch ber boy with ioving eyes-if mother knew, what muet she think of hlmrT Mother, wbo liad tauglit hlm tîat to do rigbt regard- les. of consequencés wu. the only course Possible te a rnanly boy-a boy wbo was going teolie. 'a imniy man!i'Mother wudcry! With the vivid imagination of childhlood. with which-lie bad been dowered lu over-fuill measure, lie pic- tured te himaelf lis 'mother weeping ln that far, radiant o.untry, perbaps refus- ing te listen te, the anigelie words of comn- fort because ber littie son liad wanted- to pass, as is own, another boys answer te bis sume. Chiidike, lie saw nothing 'incengruous iu the picture! That mother cou id exïst withoub caring for and loving hlin as decply ais before was te him. a thiiig impossible II, AInd which of us, eider and. wiser as we thiuk, eau afford to simile af hlm y But if the angeis did not wiah..to grieve mother, and if, happily, she did not iknow, there was stili fatheir-father, who, ln Sonnie's eyes, was thse best, the wisest, the eleverest of menm tg whosu wrongdoing was sureiy ineonceivabie! Wbat would -father think of hlm.? .Wouid bie, perbapa, refuse te take hlm eut'ou Saturday afternoons as hie usual- ly did, for their customary rambie in the country-the country that m\"Y be reached \u003ey a traincar-wben Sonnie iearned the difference between a beech. tree and a bawthern, a biackbird and a crow, and father told hlm tales of the real, wild, couutrified country, where he had passed hie humble, liappy-go-lucky, ba\"-eoted--ehildhood-l' Would \u0026IL that have te lie forfeited? Even the precious bedoide taîks, when Sonnie did most of thse talking and father lietened, wile Sonnie debated whètber lie ehouid bc a cab-driver when he grew up, because then lie wouid get as many rides as1,he pleased, or a salor, because it must b e lovely te sleep in a bammock, or a drummer in a brase band, because the drum made sucis a délightful noise when you banged With ail your miglit, or- But by the time the drum- mer bad been considered Sennie was generally on thse verge et sicep, and bhis ambitions were mcrging drowaïlyiy to dreams. Would this aise lie a thing of the paut.? Even to-nighit lie remembered ýwith an added pang, father had banded hinm ové te Sarah much carlier than usual. Rad lie beard anything? Did lie, witl thse semi-omniscienco which. children .attri- bute te grown-ups, know? And while 'tee pitiful te condemn, had lie found it impcsble te love any longer the li\u0026rle, hielionored, guilty boy, of whom lie lied been so prend?",
         "1914. lugruous Sr cold ing hin, a thiug wieer as hlm y viah- te she did -father, lst, thé D whont eivable! ake hlm e usual- e in the là'y be Sennie t beech- 1 and a Sof the rhere he o-lucky, \u0026IL that 8, when ng anld debated er when uld get à, mailor, ep in a se band, ~lightful al your e drum- aie was and -lis [ly Into ie past.? with an i evt d. Rad ith the a .attri. d1 whie ound it a làttie, le led The. WoenH medont hiy Ç'iîleMarch, 1914. .The- thouglitof hie fathers Bslent1 Wcru proved too much for Sonnie. He1 foît that it was imnpossible te remain ini lied afly longer;-thati corne what might, he'muet, at ail hazÉardàs, make confession, whetber absolution or condemnation came of it. Fear'of the darkne ss, of tbe shadows lurking. within the room and *ithout; of -the' long passage and' the dimly-lit stars, was as nothing to the thkiught of-the love ie bail, perbaps, al- ready forfeited. He slipped trembling* fiom betweefl the cosy blankete\u003e. and crept fearfully dowustairs.,' Thehouse wae very silent. Eyen the etaire, unidieturbed by' hie- light weigbt, fobore té itter their cutomary proteet- ing squeak, 'and, he reached. the foot of them in .afety. For a momnent hie paused, and' haif turned liack. But ane glance up the gloomy taircase qjuehched hie haif- formed wish to -retreat wth hie- heart uneased of its burden. TremblinJ, yet eager, half-afraid to enter, and stillmôre afr.aid to go back, hé reached the study door With - a' rush' at the very mom~ent when hie fatleropefled.iît, a letter in his band, and what seemed, even to Sonnie's eyes, a strange, unfamiliar look on his face. Gilbert. Evans paused and gazed at hie simail son in amazemrent. A 'Why, what's the matter ?\" lie said. \"Wby aren't yeu in bed ?\" \"I couldn't sleep,\" stammered Sonnie. \"'Couldn't aleep? What'a wrong? Are you cold ?'. .But Sonnie, now that the crucial 1moment had been reached, waes suent. Hie father picked him up and carried him into thé warm room. There was etili another post, lie reflected, and, after ,Il, it mattered littie whether hie answer weôt sooner or later, when go it muet. ,',Besidèe, something wae. certainly the matter with Sonnie. \u003cXow that lie thouçhtof it, lie remembered that tbe child s face had been flushed; lie liad been strangely reeervéd and illïat-ease before geing to lied. (Joulà d he ljl? Heaven forbidi Hie heart throlihed pas- sionately at the thouglit, as hée strained his boy to him defliatly. If the child were taken, all that wae best in hum would surely go aise. Lif e would then, indeed, lose ail motive. Work would lie aimiese, ambition dead. .With -a pang lie realized how, unskilled lie was in childrei's ailments, and thouglit helpessiy of Sarah's uttér. Wn capabili 'ty. Why-why-ha4thé bsy's mQther died? Sonnie, méanwhule, happy. in the seeurity of father's arme and henéath the linspiriting influences et light and heat, lxad forgotten thé littie outcaet lhe had. pietteed -himnself lieceming in the fear-inducinig darkness 'uptaire, and was giadually regaining confidence and hope. If hiâ crime was no lss e hinous, yet, sturely, fathér's love was str6nger and more forbearing than' he had imagined. Gradually. it liecame easy for him to speak. Pulling bhis father'e head down te hlm hèB whispered intohis éar a fùIîl and un- expurgated account of thé day's mis- doings.. \"A'1 thouglit p'r'aps mothér would be 'shamed of me, up beside thé angéls, 'cos'mother said I was neyer and neyer to make her. 'shaméd. 'Sides a man doesn't cheat, mother told me.\" Never and nevée make lier ashamed! A inan doesn't ' cheat! The words beat, into Gibert Evans'5 iieart with a strangé nkew meaning. From the lips of. a liabe lie .heard bis own con-~ démnation. And hie Cod e of honor that had grown lax te comply with. the world's requi rements, té whom all ie law- f it] that le expedient, suddenly seemed to him a mean and ignoble thing, seén with the clear eyes of a child'e innocence. \"Fathér.\" The whisper came. again, more #~emulously. For wby wae father so silent? Was hé, after ahl, angry- ashalned of him? Sonnie'à lips trembled, althougli there wvas no relaxing un the warm clasp of the arme around him. \"You isn't aligry? You isn't ashamed of me? I didn't mean to. I didn't- really. But I wanted to-awful muchi You isn't very angry, father T\" Angry! Angry with him! Poor, littie, innocent, troubled soul! Wlio was hc- bce who had indeed stoopcd to temptation -he whom his ewn conscience accused, wlîom ail honest men wouid accuse dic they know-to be angry with a chid? arme and kised hum with an.- lnteusity that almoat etartled thé child, while*.it ruade hie little liéart béat wildly with jey. Se father' had forgiven hlm! More- seeémed te love him a mucli as liéfore! Sonnie nestled, doser with a sighi of :re- liéf. But thé kise implied moere than fer- givenese, aithouîgi te Sonnie that .waà ail-sufficing. He did net knoiw that- lu that kisesau- ethér seul, a seoul -mare. buidçiýedi'rmore troulld, than. hie own, had' vowéd, ré- péntance, had'Ugh absolution, 4hd seen its'ewn ragrsiens- ln the lrght ef hie white innocee!' Holding hie 'littie son tightly with- one arm, Gilbert Evans. iftèd thé iittêr, eéaled and ready'fer despitch, from the talile,.where liehad thrown it, land,.with- eut *a nmoment's hésitation, droppedî in l.- te thé f:ire. It burnéd very. slowly, .writhiiug iki a living thing' as thé\"famées crépt ax4 lic~\u0026aI~un4t1shuiilhugand cutling im *otently,'Ubfore' thé. consuming f.r ànd as' tburned, se burned*-away, lie.- neath thé purifying flamée f a high Té- solve, the falsé idéals that had lirouglit it inta being lu the heart of thé' wrîtér. 1Seupie watchéd. with fasciuated eye the littié tengués of. flamé léaping -and spreading over thé paper; woudéred, tee, why fathér stared at it se ftxéedly until thé fire had died down, snd al that ré-- mained was but a'ittle heap of grey ashes. Thé flame pléaséd hlm, and hé was sorry whén théy liad died down sei quick- ly. They seéméd disappointed at finding nothing lsé te humu \"Burn, soeémore, father,\" héc ried. \"Thé firée ays it wauts soeémore. It sys it's hungry.\"y Fathér lifted hlm te hie shouldér. \"'Therél's ne more te hurn, Sonnie,\" jlhé answered géutiy. \"lIt was only a létier that fathér le sorry hé éver wrote. The firé le thé best placé for it \" Sonnié opeuéd quéstionug éyee. Fathér aise, it appearéd, haïd soimething te con- fes. ~Would mothér havéeliéen shaméd if se saw it?\" hé asked gravély. Gilbert bowéd hie, lhad. \"-Mother wouilà have liéen véry, véry mucli aehamed, my lfttle sou. -But shée won't uow. ,Shé -shal neyer b.:aàhaméd agaku, 'if 1 I n eauhll i .» Senn ie nodded wisély. \"«Ne, mother said neyer, neyer te maké lier 'shamed' Then, with a lIttIé uestling movemnent,' Sennie laid bie head on bie fathér's ehoulder. Sleép had kiesed hie eyelids at la t.- Gilbrt Evans lient hie dark head ovér théeflxen eue that lay upon his breast. \"lWe'll belli éach othér te remémber that,» hé whiepered more te himeelf than te thé chld. \"'And may God help botli'of us, son o' mine.\" Seed Cataloguo\u0026 R0olvod Rennie'e New Seed Annual for 1914 je a book ef 120 pages with over 400 haîf tenes, direct from photographe, showing Lactual résulte withaut -.exaggératieii- of Rennie's Sééds, Plants, aud Bulbe.. It le handsoeély bound in lithegrapluéd covérs and centaine évrything ilu eéds,L plants 1and lijeWorth . while for plantifig on 1théeCnaian gardén or on.,thé. farS~. Rénni's seéds are recognized-,'i*',,thé higliet.* autheritiés as thé béat 'for our Canadian climate, lieing tproughly tetéd fer germination and purity st 1their trial grounide and liy .thé» Govern*. iment at Ottawa. Thé ceet oe- living. \"ai hé matérialli reducéd liy grewiing your own vegétalle, aud Wm. Rérmie Co-;, rLimitéd, Who. bave stores at T6ioht'o -Montreal, Wiuuipég and Vauceuvér ,wil mail a copy ef their eeéd annual free\"ô6f -charge ta anyane writiug their néareet store for a cepy. Al Who are watching thée ound Ilan- cial devlopméiit of Canada wl l écin- terested ta observe that during thé uéxt few wééksThé Great-West Lifé Assur- rance Company will reacli one hundred imillions Mif business iu forcé. This leaa 1 record of spéedy expansion hitherto un- ,equaled, accemplishéd lu léss than twe a and twentY years. IDEAI.-GRAIN PICKLER the IDEAL G1RAIN PICELER mixes and treats the seed thoroughly and wîth leus solition than anyr other machine made, Br r the tirne the grain gets through thé mixlng cylinder the tehgtion has corne in contact 'with every 'smut germ on every pickle of gucasi-g instant déath to the diseas. À!!CXt8 sluion that is, not used .while going through the process s run into a pail under thé machine . and can le use\u0026'- aver ;ati.,' ther' machines waste this. Idea1 fclkléir treattd seed insures your crop ainst smut. Yen. cAri. tréat over 100 ýbus. per heur and do it ighit Guaranteed for 10,years and we give you a 10 dàys' tri4l eut.. ou your own fara; if not'satisfactory 'yr. rnoneiy refunded.chee'i-ully. The regglar pflce af this va ihne la'- $20 when sold throug aÈçnts. This .Çason we are' geing te' selU: 5\u003e00 -rdéîal-plellers direct from our factory. to farm st thé factory pricé of $15 each, thus sav*ag yen thé agent's commission cf' ;.U 'par ,cent.' Ord'er 'aQw -and 'make sure of:.meé _e.f thèse- simnple, .durable ,IDEAL picklers-'t factèr7 ntice. We - will ship- C.O.D.' if y o wlsb. \u0026e know' they'« will please yen. -Forl further patiulars gét aur pickler. bookiet.. It's freée. Tue BRettMyS*ufacturinz Co. UL 5 3' Wianpeg,Ma.i Aqwfl W lnoiXleem Cabint ijour Home viii SAVE YOUR wIY -Muos of uuueoeusay seps that make Kitchen wovk a Drudger Ber wor k wil! hée a pleasure instead of a Irnrden witk this modern Kitchen Çabinet. *l has ail of thé con- vèalendès of thé most éxpénsive kind. Wlt costré duced fully ane half, made cf oak% Igeld finish, luchés high; teop of basé 26x41 whte waed Basé la ftted wlth metal cake or bread box, cutlery drawver, board. Full set cf spicé canistérs, with rack; 'LARGE SIPTER FILOUR BIN,\u003c glass front CHINA CLOBSET lia ane shelf ând fitted with faacy frosté glass dooVu. sold undér aur gwarantee of satisfaction or ré un ot nrtiase money -atid frelght charges. Pnice complets 19g.75. Crockery aud ceokery utensils net lncluded iu r\u003ence. Write for catalog showlng complète lins prlccd pe etleus than regular rotai! pices. Wingold Stoveý Co. Ltd. 7 v 4-\u0026-1811 I W. Pay Cash R A Daily, for This lunealy.orne feature that ban made this Comp»aW; nue of thé most succcés4a in the couutXy,; Bend un siTrial Shpment ynwilU bs surs of H.TGHEST PRI CES. CANS nuppidFE whill you try us ot V have bzcn 'in buossîaq17 YEARS and snome cf thé bést-known produces .shlpta usnyar attor year. IT WILL PAY YOU, ,QO. iroe;,cans prom3ly-r- tumud.We psyai chargés. \"lb.e Old Roiablo Creamery.\" The Brandon., Creamery \u0026SupplY Go. r i ,We have a few vacancies for subscription agents. The worlc is pleasant agd profitable. Write us for particulars.",
         "rhô western Home moithly 'Younrg -People Rreslde Games Tii. wind in howing down the. chir- bey, end peraps th* .min aid eleet ame beating agint he _ýlfdîw pane, but ~wat chil4 cames that it is a stormy biglât outeide? The \"è'n'iomy ire is al agiow and ablaze w ith the ceals of MM\" cheer. It sparkles aid crackies and burna merrily enough te make one for- Cet the weatber.. There in a dish of ap- pie. to ottil front of the ire, and theme are cheetints, tee, and ýmrshmal- Iows.' A vmm red rug le epread on thle iffer, aid, the cbildren, in bath gown. and lippers, are sitting up for a bappy bol\u0026uni tbefore bedtime to playg e -fresidie game.-and whak ebailtiiey bol Games for _playlng in front of an -open- ire e9hoùld bo mostly thinking aid gnessirsg gae.. A child desmt wnt te romp andpglay tee much about the nursery in bis lippers and bath gowns. Wbhat.he dges want te de i. to ait by the dire, ourled up on tbe liber, and just ,watch. the coals while ho makes hie \"thuinking machine work,\" as Br'er Rab- bit isd te *say. These are. a few flreside, games tbat will help a child te do j6st that. \"I Iave My Liove,\" in played by a lino of children, wrh6 start with a lot of que.-. tiens about my Love, wbioh muet' bo anewered amording to the letters of the alphabet Tih. A's might mun thue way: *I love my love wifýh an A because hi i Adorable. 1 bate'him with ai A, because hoie.i Ancient. Hoe took me ýto Âppl*dore and treatedl meý to Arrowroot and Apricots. Hia namne'à i\"aii., and ho cornes f roml The B's may run as follows,-\" 9 ' love my love with -a B, because h% i. Brilliant. I hato him with a B, because hfe is Booriah. He took me te Banbury and treated me te Barberries and Biscuits. His name is -Bob, and ho comes from Babylon.\" Each child mnust tell the story and I ini tho miesiîg ideas in the sentences witb word. that begin with bis special letter of tbe alphabet. Sbould ho failt or besitate, another player may fill, in the gap-and- movf iipL -the line -after -the- manner of an old-fasbioned spelling match, te tako. the place of the cbild Who failed. Tbei player wbo etays longest at tii. head of the lino may hane tho biggoat roasted apple for a prizo. Ps and 9'. ls another fine fireelde? game. The players sit in a circle, and one stand., askcing éach i turn a ques- tien, as: 'The Sultan of Turlcey bas gone forth with ail bis men -te batt le. Tell me where ho bas gene, but mmnd your Pe and Q's.\" The cbuld questioîed must anewer, quickiy, naming a city in Tur- key beginîing witb a letter before P in the order of the alphabet. .Anotber question is put immediately. \"Tho -Sultan of Turkey, with ail bis men, was eîtertaincd at -. Tell me where, but mind your P's and Q's.\" In roplying, ne letter of the alphabet used previously may bo repeated, se the Tt la most dlsheartenlng to be told by your physicien that nothing short of an operation will cure you of piles. The ex- pense, the suffering, the risk, is too great, and so you endure the mlsery of this wretcbed alilment. But why flot be cured by Dr. Chase's Ointment. Relief is prompt, cure certain and lasting, when you use persistently this great soothing, healing ointment. Mr. J. Maw.r, Roden, Man., write: -~ . \"Dr. Chase's Ointment i. a wonderîul pre- paration.' I had itching piles for five or six years and though 1 tried two doctors' ~f prescriptiobs and used many other pre- parations could flot obtain much benefit. The doctor told me there was no cure for me, and that 1 would have to undergo an operation. -1 bought a box of Dr. Chase's Oint- ment and was completely cured in one week. As this was six montbs ago and there bas been no return of the old trouble, lir. Ifawer I believe that the cure ie a Permanent one.\" Dr. Chase's Ointment bas a truly wonderful record of cu]res to back it up. Many cases of 10, 20, 30 years' standing have been cured by ité%se. 60 cents a box; al dealers. Sample box free, if you mention this paper. Edmanson, Bates \u0026 Go., Limitcd, Toronto. D 10Mh a 7 game is a djg¶cult one and a tax' upofl a child's wits. It baàs unlimitod variations, and may b. appliod te animals or flowers: as .well as geography, The questioner may ask: \"The circus bas .como tq town. Te~ll me .which animal'roared the loudest- Which came from Africa; Whicb wore borns an*dhoofs; - ~Which carried bis bouse on bis back; But mind your P's and Q's.» Varying the game to ýmake it -a literary one, the'child asks: \"Charles Dickens wrote a book. Tel me the titie, but mind your P's and Qs.\" Tbe children sit in a row te play the Ship Alphabet. One cbild i. chosen for the schoolmast1r, and he asks the chliId at the. head. of the lime: \"The letter?\" \"B,\" ansýwors the child, pcrhaps, al- tbougb any lettor may be choson. \"The name of the sbip T\" the school- masterthon askis of the next cbild ini the line. \"Bounc 'B -it \"th e chld replies, or an equally absurd name whicb suggests itself to bim. \"The name of the Captain \" is the next question. \"The name of ber cargo? The name of ber portT\" f ollow rapidly. As the schoolmastor put. oach question, ho counts ton. The cbild must answer thc question within that time. This will he founq difficult, espccially if- tbe letter chosen was an unusual one. The success- fui players meve up the lino, taking the places -of those wbo failed. Making up limericks in front of an open fire will be found a whole lot of fun. The best way te describe st limerick is te roally quote one that some chldren made up one evening in tbe nursery: uThere was a fat mai of Tobago, Wbo lived on saltpetrc aid sago, Wbcî asked wbat he'd drink, Ho said bc'd take ink, Because it.was good for lumbago.\" A group of ebildirci ray play a game of Suggestions. The first cbild in the circle voicos the first idea which cernes te bim -treacle, perbaps, or something quite as absurd. The next player thon gives immediately the idea suggested te him by treacle-jug, perhîaps, or bread. Fellowing jug cornes the îext ehild's idea -potter---ý-and the fun of the game is te soc bew far, after oie or two rounds, the chiidren bave gene from the first idea, or suggestion. Acting eut one's favorite stories will afferd a great deal of fireside fui. One child muet beave the roem, and those who romain decide what fairy or boeuse- hold tale tbey wil net, without costume or stage eetting. If the stery of Cmn- derella i. obosen, the smallest little girl croucbes by the fire, pretending ta cry, wbile two larger cbildren play that they are dressing themeelves in ail manier of finery anid go through the pantomime ef starting away for the bal. Tne cbild whe went eutside is thon called back te the reom, anid tries te guess the title of the story that i. being acted. Aid by this tume the fireside games will have grown se bilarieus that mother will corne upstairs, saying, \"Bedtime,\" and the garnos will bave te be centinued te-morrowv nigbt. Ma Can't Vote Ma's a graduate of college, nnd she's read most everything She ean talk in French aid Cerman, she can paint and she can sig. Beattiful! She's like a picture! When she talks she makes you think 0f the sweetest kind of music, and she doesn't smeke or drinkç. Oh, 1 can't begin te tell you aIl thîe poems she can quote; Slhe knows more than baîf the lawyers do; but mn can't vote. Winnlpeg, March, 1914. Ma is wiser than our coachman, for he's 1not agraduate,. And'I doubt if ho could tell yeti wlo is governing the etate. lie has neyer etudied 'grainmar, and Vil ,bot ho doesn't.klow %ehether Caesar live4I a thousand 'or twa thousand years ago. He could nover tell us how Vo, keep the ship of state afloat,. 1 For he doeen't know there's such thing--but ma can't. vote. Mrs. Gooking dae our waehing, for she bas to help along, Taking care of ber si x ebjîdren, theugh ber husband's big and strong. When ho gets a job, he only holds it till ho draws bis pay, Then he spends bis cash for whiskey, or else gambles it away. f suppose bis brain's ne bigger than the brain of any gent, And be'd trade bis ballot for a drink-. -but ma can't vote! -Chicago Record Herald. The Gaylords and Noelsens hbave always been neiglibors and intimate f riends. So wltien John Gnylord, at twenty.four, as, fine a fellow a@ over was, began te ee. what an altogether cbarming girl MUolly Nelson wus, there was, îaturally, ne opposition. hn4eed, as the \"affair\"' beeame serieus it wae evident te aH, including John aid Molly themselves, that thie parents concerned, were deligbted as ye.t there was no formai announcenient, but evcry one knew that it was \"und4 gtood,\" and eveîing after evening Jobti talked te Mollyon the front porch, ofteà lingcring after thbe other Nelsons had. retire\u0026d .1 The surprise of the two - was cona*, quently great when one eveniflg a shutfling step wvas heard in the hall;aiÈl presently Mr. Nelson appoared. in slip- per sand dressing-gown, candie in hand\u0026 Quite evidently be had gone te bcd and then got up-for somie purpese.., \"WThy, father, what is the matteri\" MOlly's cheeks were hurning, as ber. father stood there besitating and eyeing John closely. John, leaning agninst thbe door-post, where ho mad steod for the last fifteen minutes saying good nighlt to Molly, foît decidecily Uhemforta7.le ~ unider Mr, Nelson's gaze. In fact, it was embarrassing aIl reund. But John is a voung i-au whe goes straigbt to the point. 1. aiything wreng, Mr. Nelsone\" ho begai, directly. \"Arn I te infer that you object te niy beiîg bore?\" \"'Well, no. not exaetly, John.)y Mr. Nelson ceughed slightly, bositating. \"lt only that mother ait I would like te get a little sleep.\", \"Father,\" cried Molly, quite indignait, \"we couldn't have heen disturbing any ene! John lbas been talking very low-\"' \"I don't doubt that, rny dear,\" M4r. Nel- son was beginniîg te enjoy tie situa- tien. \"It'. net that, nor have 1 aîy obi jectien te John's talkiîg te you. In fact, 1 havent aîy objection in the world to John. nor te bis conduict, exrpt-»\" Mr. Nelson is open te suspicion of hav' ing prolenged the matter unnccessa.rily at tlîis point. \"Except in oie thing. Mrs. Nelson aid I do objeet seriously, my dear John, te the habit you seem te have formed this evening of leaning against the bell-push. Our bedroom is ncxt te the kitehen, aid this continuous bell- riîging_ is not coîduolvo te repose\" Return In-Klnd Mark Twain once, asked a neiglibor if lie înight lîorrow a set of bis boeks. The neig-hhor replieý(d ungraciously that ho was welronie to rend thîem in bis librarY, M'len y pa is-riig etes a îuist but lie flai a rule never te let hic, ooOkS rnwys r iiagleterave ]bis lieuse. Sorne weeks later the alam, naysborlingovr r as foarh moake ist ii n Iiissng ing ar. tola n of _Mark Twain's lawn-mower. make his\"nirtning eler.said i Mark, \"but sunce If lie needs advice, lier jiîdginent, lie ive madeit a ride nver te lot it leave adnits, is alw ' ys, hest niv 1:îwn vonivill lie el)liged te use it Fvcy dy sc gves hiin q -tstîeT'-Ladie' Home Journal. iostlv at bis o\\Vfl r et Sue ccp t aekof ]'gislatïonu ani i taxed on bonds and sfocks, rverv one complains of ilis miemory, Botshenovr ~Sa l00k il at the alit 110 one(Oipl\u003eaifls of his judgment.-' saered ballot-box. James J. Hitll. s ~ ~ t, - The Oj--ctIon to John",
         "Winnipeg, Much, 1914. 1914. for he's Lwlîo is and lIlI *or twa eep ,the such a for she tholugh la it tili Bkey, or han the drink- Fred'k Dyer l'Il send you the Drafts the same day I get your coupon-fresh from the laboratory, ready ta begin their soothing work the minute you put' thernian. They are relieving every stage and condition ai this cruel disease, whether chronic or acute-~muscui5r, Sciatie. Lumbago or Gout-no matter where located or bow severe. Tbey are bringing comnft to oid men and women who have suffered al their lives, as well as ail the milder stages. Don't neglect rheumatism, I urge You, for 1 know the horrible torture and defarmity it so often leads ta. Send to-day for the Drafts. I send themn on free trial because I know wbat they are doing for Tnany thousands and 1 have faith that ~AAK-- they can cure you likewise. Try the Drafts whien you jet tbem. Then, If you are fully satisfied with the benefit received, send me One Dollar. If mot, tbey cost you nothing. ,I take your word. Address, Frederick Dyer, 339-J Oliver Bldg., Jackson, Michigan. Send no mor'ey -just the coupon. Write to.day-now. Musie ess FM in your cwn bomne. lusie Lessons PnOrgan, Volin. Guitar, Banjo, Cornet, Sight Singing, Maridolin or Cello. Lessons weekly. Beginners or advanccd pup- ils. Expense ,postage and mnusic only. This is amau Thousands write: * Wish had knowncf you before.1 Booklet telling how senltfree. Add. U.S. SCHOOL 0F MUSIC. Box 63, 225-5th Ave., N.Y. City, ~~-------------- The Western Home Mon thly SuridaylReading Consider 'rhe Mies of the'field, whose l We are as they; - Like them fade away, As doth a leaf. ,Coasxl.er The sparrows of, the. air. of smi 1count Our God doth iew Whiether they fali or mount- He guards us too. Consider The liles that do neither spin n, Yeet are most fair- What profit ail this care And ail his tolt . Consider The bird%~ that bave no barn nor God_ gives them food- Much more our Father seeL\u003cs To do us goo\u0026. Was adly Ru. Down.i MIIburW'S Heart and Neuve .PRIS Built Mrs. Frank Blotigh, Sarnia, Ont., wrtesest-aI embrace the opportunity to write you saying that I bave used Mil- burn's Heart and Nerve PlUs, and found them very helpful to me. I was very e dlrm down, and was taking doctor's iedicine. My son, out West, *wrote me saying, o'Mother! you use the Mil- burns Heart and Nerve PilUs, they will be better for you than doctor's medicne. Tis I, did with good resuits. I often rcomen\u003cl them to other people, My doctor did not know I was using them, he used to' say IWhyl I neyer saw an\u003e, one's heart gain up like yours has. You do flot need any more medicine.\"' Milburn's Heart- and Nerve Plls are ,,\u00260. per box, 3 boxes for $1.25, at al dealers, or maîled direct on recept of ~roby The T. Milburn Co., Limited, MEAIL ME THIS FRRE COUPON with your naine and address plainly writtefl. Naine............................... Address .............................. Youl1 ecevepipaid, a $1 pair of- rafts ta try Free, as explained below. Prederick Dyer, Dept. 339-J, Jackson, MVich. To evoryono s\u0026uffering with R-he um atis m 1 Mako thl8siUfmftmd Offer The Gospel an Artesian Well The late D. L. Moodyin luilustrating the different classes into which Christ- jans can be divided, and in explaining the best kind of a Christian to be, once used Lhe following graphie illustration: \"When I was a boy I used to have te pump water for the cattie. Ah, how many times I have pumped with that old right hand until it ached, and many imes 1 used to puimp 'when 1 could net get any water, and I was taught that when the pump was dry 1 must pour a pail cf water down the pump and then I could get the wa ter up. \"'That js what Obristians wsnt-a wel of living water. We wili have plenty of grace to spare-Sl we need ourselves and plenty for others. We have got into the way now of digging artesian irells better. They don't pumrp now to get the water. But when they dig the irel tlaey eut dem- througli the gravel and throulgh the dlay perbaps 1,000 or 2,000 feut, not stopping irben they can pump the water up, but they cut te a lcwer stratum and the irater fiws up abun- (lo.nt!y of itself. \"And so we ought every one of us te b)e like artesian ivellg. Ced has got grace enough for every one cf us, and if we were only full of the Holy Ghost whaf power me would have.\" wltOxdo bai \u0026M .fato ,a,\u0026 st i old \u0026 TO-DAY. éJi B.wax. of frauda IaitaoLAi, W dganped wih .11k NAME, I . *'I meyoit Fiee î mi he yàmu du1 Ifth Avenue. 11mw Tork ia Neal 5-Day Drink Treatment Sweeping the. Country \u003cNtigsucceeds like success.\" The best evidence of menit in any discoverY.la the actual results achieved by it. The NEAL 3-DAY TREATMENT, in spitc of Smrn skeptïcal opposition fromn uninformed critics bas during the past three yeara demuonstralcd beyond ail question its aight ta the title, 'World's Most Successfuli-Drink Trcatmiept. This great movement for the redemption of humanity fromn the f rightful effeets o- e liquor habit, bas swept the country fromn end ta end. Millions of dolIlars- have beZ Iîl-, vested in NEAL INSTITUTES-miions of people are vitally intereýted-Ithousalwi$ of patients cured-thousands oifbornes made happy. There are now 60 NEAL INSTITM\"ES in successful operation turning out thousands af cured patients, and the grand work ýi3 grcwing by leaps and bounds. The public are readily coming into the knowledgc',tb'at here at last is a positiveiy sale and absolutely efficient and permanent treatmient. for alcobol and drug addictions. Tbey know that there is no longer an' excuse for the danger- ous and painful hypoder.mic needle used four or five times daily for four ta seven, weçs- no further excuse for tbe employyient cf lpbwerful opiates and injurious' drugs wîth'tbeir badl after-effects. Ail who want complete information as ta this wonderful work sbould cli, write or phone tbe NEAL ýINSTITUTE'. 3124 Victoria Ave. W. .Regina, Sask. Calgary, Alta. 405 Broa4way Winnipeg, Man. Aki ru neighbor ta take, The Western Home otl Askyour Wrîte for specid' ciubbing offers M nhY f r-f-n 'f No Sabbath It wou]d be difficuit te find a more striking picture of a land where the Sabbcth had been forgotten thau this, written by a Scottish pitr \"«Think how the abstrction 'of; tje Sabbath would hopelessiy ensiave the' working lasses with whom we are iden- tified. Think of labor, thus going on in one xonotonous and continuons and eternal cycle- mbe for ever on the rack, the finger for ever playing, the eyeballs for ever straining, the brow for- ever sweating, the feet for ever plodding, and brain for ever throbbing, the shouider for. over drooping, the loins for ever aching, and' ther restiese mid for ever scheming. Thinir of the beauty it would efface, of the rnerry- 1 eartedness it would extinguish, of the giant strength it wouid tame, of the re- sources of niature that it would exhaust, of the aspirations it would crush, of the sickness it wouid breed, of the projects it would wreck, of the groans it wouid extirt of the lives it would immolate, of the cheerlesa graves it would pre- maturely dig. See them tQiling and moiling, sweating sud fretting, grinding and hew.ing, weaving and spinning, sow.- ing and gatbering, mowing and reaping, raising and building, digging and plant- ing unioadinýg and. storing, .striîi»g snd strugglinia 4l'the garder. and »in the field, in the grsnary and in the. barn, in the factory -and iu the miii, lu the warehouse and iu the ehop,- ou the mouil- tain' andlun te ditch, on the roadiide and in the iwôod, in theý city and in the country* on the tes. and on the shore, on. the earth in days of brightness andi o! gloom. What a sad picture would the worid present if we had no Sa'b- ba th 1 erald. always ds3. So Four, as, Sto Ree 1 MUoily 'y, no beame icluding t the Ae as cemPni, \"undeid, g Johft h, ofteh ts had cna* ilg à all;aild\u0026 n slip. i hand. *d and ter\" as ber eyeing nst the r the Lnight ortale round. goes n\" ho 'r that Mr. It'oe ignant, g any low-\", r. Nel- eitua- ny ohi n fact, word f hav' ssa.rily Nelson dear bave [gainst ext te ibell- bor if . The t he brarY, books er the",
         "nez me \u0026 Oan Ummo WUmm. ~Toebe ~ ~ Uace met ~6ss Yo~ ~Idm . lood 6\" ffl a ck.s e beoaptSUyoutgwma todu\"a. Wood\u0026try MAV m. Fr.fo iaqbc W##t idM a cam$ ale o - ~ dur' !III:ý7 %ho IM MIlliutrated soralste ct 1 conter- vice». 4 dolas tb match 2 amalidoilieu for s*Ut *Bd Popepr shaker. alf £amed on a plice or W~ An Li»a .Ji yd. long. Thiomplete $et sent as au introductory offer lit qai n fiftse crn.Bond coin -Do etame acaat.dNhlwder~eue IoN. go UW. GREAT SALE $2 SprIng Costume Skirt for $1 Cardage Pali Bl1ous, or Overali res, Wwfmttrayye Weoh\" Wptern Born Mothj a Ivel talorbulitYork- sbie 5rg~CouumeSkrt. wtb aeve T¶oes andaiadaan.a oo ral wlkng dth. Wtt, ren. bio.or Mirie.togther wlhee of ta 1Bloue or verali te eWpry cuftomer. We bave reMeved many thouunds or lestlmonfale frow al i.0 tryns? ce sen 4us1ibail to4aywlth correct lenth, waitandhip neurernents anS -. wll Sesatch Proplyey. aS I1: the iq.atty e kethaouhe un tas4I this splendid Costume Bklt Addrel-flept. 256 11MITS UNLIMITED Goduat* !radford, Hngland Itemlttances to e mi.b oney order or Tewestern Home Mon thty Winnipeg, Mardi, 1914. Spring Embricleries, ReadoeuwIUl pleae note that price. are quoted for mng where working materiala are apecifled. embroidered articles The .\u0026pril design for tbe. Birthday PHl- su--huwa a beautiflul -spray of asl *tinted in their gorgeolfp colorings. Great1 interest has been shown in this seriez, and we are sure our readers wiIl ap- *preciate this design. The flowers may be *embroidered solidly or tipped long and, short,' if preferred, while the lettering la worked in over-and-over satin stitch in brown. The-motto only requires ouit- ining, and fine, black silk is suitable for thia. The spring 9season is the time to P%-j pare the furnishings for the baby car- -ring.,- and -tbê ca-r-iage- robe and-pilbow- wil, doubtiesa interest many of our readera. This is 'stamped on corded pique~, and the design is for solid over- and-over embroidery. Long eyelets are shown tbrough which ribbons may be No. 6301. Afghan. Stamped on Pique.................. $ .75 Cotton to embroider................. .25 laoed, and attractively finish tiais pretty Afhan.The baby pillow matches in de- sign, ai one of the useful lacing variety, and cones in two pieoes back No.630 sows an infant's shawl stamed on soft woollen voije, and silk 's quoted to embroider this. The de- sign matches the Afghan and baby pilbow. stamped go'ode only -except- We do Bot aspply w\"u No. 6404. April. Cushion, front and back ............... $ .60 Lace to edge ........................ .75 Silk to embroider ................*.... .75 Fringe for ends if preferred ........... .60 No. 6300. Baby Pillow. Stamped on Pique.................... $.60 Cotton to enibroider................... .25 No. 6306. Infant's kimona is also stamped on the -sare material as the baby shawl, and this may be em- broidered in either white or colors. If preferred, the littie fiowers could be worked in blues and the border in white, or pink coloring is attractive and dainty. Any further information regarding the embroidering of articles shown in our needlework column will ho cheerfully No. 6304. Infant's Shawl Stamped on vol..........$ .75 SiIk to embroider................. ....5 furnished on receipt of a stamped en- velope. f Articles illustrated in this column will be found on sale at ail the up-to-date ,,tores, but if they cannot be obtained in thiis manner, they ivili be sent post 'paid on receipt of the prices quoted. When ordering, kindly mention the de- .-#sign number and article, thus avoiding any possibility of mnistake. Allow at least a week for filling order fromn the tinte it is received. No. 6306. Kimona. Stamped on Voile................... $ .50 Silk to emibroider..................... .25 True eloquence consists in1 saviing what is needed, and in saying oilly wlîat 'is meeded.-LordMol. Perfect braverY ami truc courage is to do without a witness ail that ive would dIo withi the whole world looking oi.- Maurice Maeterlinck. TTED rI EEDUI Vor Imm, EIWN ANID GUEUx Pillow Top and Back This handnome conventionaC\"14U oiqn pub ~naway absolutely fre noy rder oi troduce hom. PiLll Tp ia a 'de .of Pur i:,o 4n Riuim Orash;:stampod anda nd tîi readytbeeml~ÔTdè 11. 4 . f _nt[rooi prepaidlt yousendus 35 cen t tc ver the regularretailprie cf 6 akein. cf Elding's Pure Oilk Royal ]los. to commence the wr with and 5 cents for postage. Outfiti neludos: On.ePIloirT 8mi109 17M StInchés, stampe and hand ittd on pure linen Rua= crash One Pfflow Back. OneEaayDiagram Lesson, ahowing you juatexactlyhow totakeevery stith. 1 Bx Ekein. flekUng's Noyai 81k fflu. AIL SENT FOR ONLY 35c. AND YOUR DEALERS- NAME. R0W TO ONT TEE COMPLETE OUTPIT. Justenclose 35 centsi nhtamps orsilver and the haane of yourdealer. This eiceptioa4l attractive offe1ris made to 1 utroduce BELD. ING'8 PURE BILK ROYAL- FLOSi nt4 oueyhm aaa and may be withdrawa a D ODA. onot delay. Jist aend 35 cents i n stampe or ailver and the name of your dealer and we wi 1 sond you the entire outfit. Write TO-DAY. B.ldlng Paul Cartielli, Ltmifed, Deptk 304, MONTEEAL. THE LABEL On your paper will tell when your subÈcription expires. Send in1 your renewal NOW 'i",
         "-Winnipeg, Mam!h, 1914. » The Western Home mlonthly Farnurs and Their Hlred HeIp Nor. Fred R. Hall Tis jil not written witli tbe intention oftrying to convey tlie impression that mlfarmers are intentionally thoughless -orcëriminally ca-reees hitheïr treatmeiït of farin help. However, a good mlny of them are careless and many are entirely devôid of any degree of justice where help in concerned. in the fret place they desire a \"strictly texnperate ana steady hired mnan, mnarried Referencel required. 1 A mnan possessing the requirements applies for the position. if lie happens to advance tbe idea that considerin\u0026 the fact that hie je required to furnish references, it wouid lie oniy fair to receive the saie of the farmer, his remark je considered impertinent and lis 5ppicaiondismad asundeairable.-- I will1 state'briefly tbe conditions we found wben answering one of 'these advertisements. Tbe farmer gave no reference (tliey neyer do) but stated in a letter that lie was a 'cburch eider. We bired at the usual *agres and moved to hlm. When we got there we began to :t hie, references, viz., two years before la ad four families in bis house and the mnuwho was moving out stated hie had off ered to move about every three to six weeks since hie had been there. The bouse was fair-sized having five rooms but out of repair-leaky roof, dirty and ragged waH paper and of the eight wbere we iived. Others bave pite du g and when they become full the buildings are mo ed.Vryfew are bulit so tliey can- be clMa eoften and kept anywbere near beathfiil. And the ideal \"xnethodt of running watcr la practically neyer found. I bave before me directions for a cement '.septie tank\" 50 const-ructed--that -the ciainis mnade for it is that the sewage is purified until it je rnereiy clear water. This wouid give the rural home ail the toilet and bath conveniences enjoyed by their city friends with even more sa.nitary conditions. The estixnated cost is about $45.00P including sand and gravel, which nearly every farmer can get witlh very littie expenÉe. The use of chioride of lime in these toilets would do much toward reir.eyn the conditions, but je seldoin used (iii act, 1 have found people who didn't know what fwas or its use). Even agenerous supply ofwoodashes, of which most farmers h ave an abundance, would work wonders but are seldom used, tley are often piled in an unsiglitly lip in the back yard. In this locality, wvhidl isl ow snd full of springet the majority of the wells 4re open wells, L.e., not drivn but are usually png dug out about six to ten feet deep, Mith a wooden pump placed in tlemn wFich lias a Cylinder strapped upon the side, in wbich t be valve wo- by a wooden rod connected to tbe pump handie. Under tbe preva-iling conditions ail wnste water drains directly into tbe well and the place thrcugh which the rod work s laïaways open. Wimnnpeg Rivr Crossnng docte in the house oniy one had a whole latch and alock and key. Sme had a strap on, some a wooden button snd some nothing at all. The cellar was simply a hole dug ln the ground, whlch had caved in and liad no liglit, ventilation or cellar stairs. We liad no cisteru but lad a good drîven wel l the back yard and a weil- sodded front yard. The horses were the most disagreeable and viscious lot we ever lad to landie. One was balky and a runaway, se when lie wasn't doing one lie was trying to do the other. Anotler was a kicker, biter and a runaway and a persn landling him was in constant danger. -The farmer forbade any kind of punialiment being rneted out to tlieliorse, and after escaping injury several times my husband refused to drive him any more. Then this good dhurci eIder offered to give my liusband a \"Iicking,1' and said if lie didn't drive hMi e coud quit, whicli le did. We packed our goode and ieft thein in the house until we could find some place to move, took a fourteen-montbs'-old baby i our arms, together with a large liandbag, telescope, etc., and walked about two and one-lii miles to the depot, witli seven liorses -stand ing i the barn. 'rhe next place we got on a f arm was a bouse censisting of two living roome and two smalbedrooms, with no wcll, cistern, ellar, woodsbed, porches, window or door sereens, no sod upon yard, ne shade trees or anytbing else for comfort. We staycd tbree weelç and moved again and found living conditions slightly improved as wc have more bouse room, a wel, and well- sodded front yard, but no cellar, cistern or screen doors. But the sanitary condi- t ions about the fairm are perfectly awful ThIe toilets on tbe rnajority of farms are wooden buildings, many of -wýhich have no pit under thein, wbich was the case with tw'o of the tbree places I have mcntioried Recently 1 noticed a musin bag tied over the spout of one of these wells and, upon qu r, found it was used to strain w or ut of the drinking water. Another one of these wells is on sandy soul, the loose boa.rd cover on a level with the grud. The chicken coop is about eight fcet to the ri'7ht, the hog pen about ten f eet away and the open swill barrel within six feet o it. The wvooden sil pa set in the swill barrel ail the time. Te hired man dips up part of a pail of swiil, sets it upon the platform of the weil and flls the pail. The resuit je that al which slops over or runs off the sides of the p ail runs through the cracks directly into t he water. This water also furnishes water for the bouse. In localities where there are no natural springs, the wells are usuaiiy good driven weiis. A cernent platform would cost about $1.50 or $2.00 and would prevent much of this filth. in the water. A small garden ie often mentioned in the bargain wbich the man is usuaily expected to work '\u003codd spelis,\" which means one end or the other of a fourteen to sixteen- hour day. If it ever gets powed it usually grows up to weeds unlese h has grown-up chidren or bis wife tends it. Saturday nigit lie and bis f amily walk or drive down town, to do the weck'.- trading and find the local mercbunt's store-front decorated with some young village hopefuls, seated on a soap box wbo aim such exccedingly witty ana intelligent remarks at the p9ssers-by that you wonder what sehool they graduated from and who their inothers are. AS for as Our experience goes tbat is the extent of tbe hired man's social world. Mothers can easily know when their children ,re troubled with wurms, add hey lose no timne in applying the best of remediea-Mother Graves' Worm Exterminator. 'SHARPLES*,MILitER The Modern Way nDairyiig- \"T6 get awaýy fromired help troubles and to ensure the production of dlean milk on an economical basis I decided, after investig- tion, to put in the SHARP- LES MILKER. I was convinced inasmucli as it is milking the best herds in the country, it should be worth--a trial. * 'I canilk,strip andweigh the milk from 25 cows in an hour and a half with my two-unit outfit. With the regular one-man equipment of three units 30 cows an hour can be milked.- I can do this work easily single handed., I have used the machine seven months and intend to increase the equipment.?y Sueh endorsement by actual users says ail that need be said. The naine, of this user wiil be furnished on request THE SHARPLES SEPARATOR CO. WEST CHESTER PA. Winnipeg, Canada Toronto, Canada A4 gencies Et nrWhére aaut i Canado w *odwood orderu. copper tanke end boflei% Slf.regalthg.N udr~ ~y usa adapted to Canadian climate. IncuibatoranBodeubpd miewlhta mometera8 lampe egg testera-readY to urne whea You\"et te 7MN MER OUARINYK-sDD mmS'MW TmIL Incbator fnishedilunaturdal oorashàln'the hlgh grade Calihals hmwoo lumber used -flot pàinted to cover IfrlrmaterlaL 1I1 U oemn mr machines with cthera we feel sure of yaur order. Do't buy - -i pyat ivetiae efreyu buy. Remember ouri= m Brogdeg oersfeigh dûdty charges. wII-tSTSB WISCONSIN UNCUBATOR Co. D.xaà RACIN06WISe TRAPPERS É CIr And parhilhest priew for n»u Fox . 1\u003cn. Mere. RatL. wlvs sud alohrus o and: olneng. etfatte.I Americe. Send for Free Price Lit andSh'ppngTaza. No ommlaaioa ROES FUR COUPAY Deptz\u003e et. Lourjrs.. gu Wb .4' -. 4 .'~ ~s About the Fa=m N lack wng you ) YOUR ilver and BELD- uat @end blne or Iwe wt -DAY. sDept.",
         "~a uda et mar. - thaumuwlmavthe i 1te the \u0026e that Canad usmo mu..ue tbrd of tba poulty uMd '0cousMsdin utbua coetiy, uam land\"Mprofits go acrues.ti bud toeAmîelama (armer Who in oeUsd up te aupplythe ahotmalg PIMthe amut speuil M Cuatoma un\"-Md long \u0026egt hauts isuort- reqg.d Po.tby from tue Statua yS vINatma\" bave un cgot 117 mi ggs on ops an e. pt trai vinOW yh Cm ML-.hC na ltumewt t eBaja:hmba vaUi#Au 1 Esod.,odad on In abtui an a àopsi' omp \u0026M IVOdir. a.li gg e a Malas Mt\u0026q av apa -w Vary The whole idea or thi e erles Way of Poultiy Ra ung18ta taise the ~'gretest number of the mttnget ciekmaat the toast cutiyofmncyand with the toast eotuex cf\u0026lime. f We know Ihat aI'rmc'a egular duties do mot bcave hl uc ime olook aftercbkna mn we have bot ail onteoges1 powcting a syutem 1herby a fuet cmu aeca of 400 O 021 bck 9 the Peertos Way in tesa iethnh cau lokaater 3o00f 4o the old way. The Bookiet Toila Toux Hfow We want1 to tl n all about it so that youcanatdy tii. question (rom ail autos belote yu spond a do!lar.- We have wrtten abook called «'Mouey lu Rgga,\"which we want to place in the banda of every up-to-date Canadian (armer We want yon ta read and study tliim book. It wiil cost you lthe price of a post card, and it wifl be thc means of adding hundreds of dollars to your incomne every year. mail thia coupon NOW. Loo Nanti. Ce. Ld.. Peiaro\u0026.. Ont. Pi«»s aad me the booket -Momy in- Name LEE UACTURING CO. LIrD. LEE 'ÎUPZ\u0026ÇOMM EOAD PEMB90KE3~I~CANADA Evar 0\u003cliam.fme. suabunk- duargyai. ta remedy thea. onditions Mud give th* rbelp àoifStelS\u003eIliving' quailer and decoit oonideam ; but de SthTh7ere are goine farneswho do vS e onsidwatm but they arc mot \u003c\u003eftua looklng for help, 1 know Cone of lime Who hh bd Ic marnmenjor about 1cm Yeus but they are mot thc men who raislith e y 0\u003c inaufficiont faim ielp. Tlu fa\"mpapota aiwar'sBay, 1-Youne 84a oty oS the foi,'but 1 woud uafit misud r- l hIf a- do sta 11 '702 are àa-cq téà[nicws lc reputation of larme,. warting he1pt and tlacm rou wiil know whthe tbe poition in desîrable or flot.\"1 Our experienm as relatei have ai boom wfith a nems Tick re»amuci faries desire a marriei mcm in iii.: Re kmows aamploe nnwiil nt sMay and subiit ta thceinjustises h. wif receive as h. can bave with Very little inconvenience, while with a married mms it mots hlm from, $15 ta 30 eer time he movos ami canmquently ho wii subiit to, thingB a single man wiil mot. -TheresItàl itant- mcm -ï-rauh-woikhI Itowm for $1.75 and\u003c p tda and work Item haurs tia pfor .(0 per Imonth ami work from fourteen ta sxtee.» I lours~e day as théy alwaya do. Wita littie thougit the fariner couli. do Much ta renedy the scarcity ofarm Jietp. _______ White Wyand\"-, It la fully twonty years since.the. Wyandotte was introducei ta the. poultry- loving public, but it la only during the. past twelve years that it bas made important advancos. Des popularity now canmot bc doubted, for it las eon dual parte and is esteemed wherever kept, and it is one of the. best utility breeda 'mter exhaustive testa-to b. a splendid winter layer and capital table fowl. It la du the former capacity (saya a writer du an Englièh journal), that the White Wyan- datte may do weil cîther in the close confinement of an enclomed run or on a free range, and la y good-sizd tinted brown egg, wbilst tiie cbickens are easy ta rear nAerica, wher. tiioy origina- ted, they are heldindu igiirepute, ami a lien fran ths breedisl stalci ta have beaten ail records duntI States, laying1 273d1 igsn twelve months. It canmot1 b. di laIWhite Wyandotte rap nestediliens have in Britain, made indiva dual records of 227 tao ven 265 and 288 eggs under certain conditions ami careful selection. TIiey are ieciiedly bandsome as well as usefuL. Their snowwhite plumage asf enhancei by a boautifully-workoi rosec comb, foilowing a curve of the. head, ai blooi-rei face, also a wol-poisei. body f] on staut yeilow legs. This Aibino fowlc finis more foilowors each Year, anýi if i'ts U utility pints continue to, be persistently f, UwalcZed,' il wil certainly ancrease in favor oach year. Il la net difficulItao breei and even fron ordinary stock good type tirds are frequontly brei wbich wwm a prises in the show pen, wbere th. classes s are usually liberally upprtci. The. 1 White Wyandotte, when pennedindutlh. 0 pink of condition, withh potless purity Of jh colr, 5 away anab Ectaof irtion iE in ti show; ani lends i\u0026seifta the fancier's f skill. n Fattenlng Poultry for Market ii. common practice in poultry packing iioues is tofeoi oach lot 21 dasor less. Tiie market or traie suppliedadte rosulta secured by tue feeder determine tue bnt of the. feeding perlio. Many milk-fed chiekens are fei for 21 days, but resulta securedina feeding indicate thal a more profitable gain canho ecuredindua ehorerf eing peioi, provided lhe sanie prioe prpun cena be securei for the fiisheipouet. In Englani and Canada bina are fattenoi for at leasItire. weeks, and if one uses a craznming machinei t probabl pays te bced fer that leagho f tlme, If, thie birds are small anrthib tbeymayteofoi longer liait heavier~ bU.mertIoZ wich are fairly wellfiesbed the (cci ing season advances lbe Iendcncy among f eeders la ta shorten the. lengh of tbc fecding period, reducing il as low as 14 days it mnany casa. Many binas are merely t'finisied' by feeding for 10 le, 12 days, and these are net generally ciasci j as mfilk-fed poultry. 1 Mk ttwdug Pratically al of the. specia feeding il, thua countrr involves 1he use of milk, thua proiucmng,\"mil-fed\" chlickns.Ths have beon exporteca me xet Milk,-while tkejleast expeonsie, e cista ho lteenmost esmlential constituent of the, ration, ani whon a feeder Cannot get MWl in mre for ieh.generally doms mot atteni pt ta falten poulry înmnerciaIy. Te potdependa on various factors, anY Of *hÎch arc local, mmd muat ho workei Out -bY-MaclimniviiuaL -1Among thoe atorl- are 1h. supply and ceaI of the chick'ens, wbicii depends lmrgély on the competitioli of other buvers; le ie * ficilijffl;s the ot'fteesnMIes th availability ami cost of effcient Jabot; lhemarket mmi ho price whichlie packer can socure for bis finisbci product. Oflen th. packer has tofeed hiepoult!y to suit the demanida of bis market, but generally if a mnhba a high clam produet h.e can make bis own market, catering somewhat ta popular fancies. Besies teselocal factors thore arc Bosrtidoiss tis. tu- sueces -mafeedmg station where oly are fallene- Firet du importance as te manager of tb. station, or feeder, who must thoroughly understand al lbh details of lhe workr and have a wefl-trained, observant oye, quick ta note lhe condition and appetite of the stock. Suacesm or failure depends p rimariiy on Ibis mm who must have the nakof caring fornbina,. The feeding station must ho arranged ta economize labor and ta provide the best possible ventilation. CJndiIions must ho of mmcii a nature as to, keep the birds quiet and contentai, mmd at the marne lime cause thon ta consume a large amount of feed, du arier ta make profitable gains. Varlous Mothoda In Vogue Tii. Engliah feeder does net consider that lhe bird bas been propenly fattened until il bas been finished witii a crainming machine. Most ôf the large feeders have usei crainming machines in, tle. United, States but have net founi lthem adaptai ta teir conditions. Tiiere are two factars which may. help ta account for Ibis atiue:Frt very few feeders in Ibis country have bec» able ta use a crammin machine succeSfuily and kcep the binds contentai; and, second, the Irade bas net, been educated ta the increased value of a machine foi bird. However, the method is occasionally found in use where there ig a special market for birds wbich bave boom crammed. Some feeders in Ibis country have obtamnei gooi resuits witii the machine in one section,, and maie an absolute failure of lhe sme method under different conditions. la Englani the art of fatten- iag by machine is oftan handed down from father to mon, thua proiucing first clams feeders. The cramxmng machine la ased ta sme extent du Ibis country for fattcning iens whicii do not give good resuits on trougi feeding. LIn cramming, the birds are foi frein seven tafourte»n days from the trougbis, and are tien crainmei Iwioe daily for frein seven te tan lays until tbey are marketei. Ile oper gauges lhe proper anieunt Of fecite force into tiie birds by holding is hani on lhe bird's crep. If lhe crop is net almost or entirely empty aIJ-te nexît feing lime the' b:ird a fot givenam additional feei. Pen Fattening la Easy Mcthod Anotber mehod wbich la used b a consiierable extent on a amail scale du Great Britain la pen fattening. This metbod is adaptei for use on the f arm, where lhe fariner doca net care bo go to the trouble of crate fattening, or where the price received for well-fed birds ioes net warrant the extra labor and feost of the latter methoi. Pen fattening bae in some cases given very good resuits, but it is flot as reliable as crate fat tening, aithough the labor cost is less. It la usei eerallyinafattening iucks. 'IIe quality of fiesh secured by crate fatterung la usually btter than that obtained by pen fattenmg. Haw ta Mako a Good Hotbed One of the Most important requisites of a successful garden is a good bot bed. Ilncreasing the length of the season by four wceks, it enabies one to have larie plants rcaiy for transplant ing b thie time thiere is ne longer danger of frosts or cold Wimilpeg, match, 1914. Ili yO OFF U~AID III nhe washboird i-h\" been a bard taskmnastcr for generations, but now the washingumachine han takenits-place.. The New Century land Washer climinates the back.. breaking rubbing, thus making washing a picasure instead of a hardship. 'It ruas casily and doesa htter and quicker work than Uic aid method. No othor machine cau b. bufft on the. New Century pnpie. bcuse te feat.. ueamarepatente\u0026dThe ru. .proof steel rng. that preronte warping. ad mi of woar toiat. if.. Soc it at your deaira or @ond to uglor inorsatson. CUNUE-DOWSWEtL tmld ameut§%ont Trade M ares NdDeIG na Write f or bookiet and cirtular, ternis, etc. Feathiersto\"laugh \u0026 Co. Fred. Bl. Featherstonhaugh .KC.. M.G. Cerald S. Rtoxhurgh ,B.).. Sr. 209- 10 Bankc ol Nova Scotia. Portue Ave.h (Corner of Garry) WUNNIpEIG When writing advcrtisers please mfefltifl The Western Home Monthly. The Western Home Mont hiY TUEBOARD",
         "11914. Winnipeg, lMaixh, 1914. è\" 1 on any 1Pýadbr f arn, t4erefore, gsed by a hors stable to fumnish the i.eesar manuro, a hotbed can bè'imade pmor ls profablnfd a source of Uot esatisfaction. .Generally spejTng, its construction Ohould takeplace about the first of March, but no , exact time in . 1i ocaity,.of corecan b. determin( , as ail will depewà upon the weather conditions, wich arm always more or less uncertain. --WyMàtever thelocality, though, the bed ubould Dot be started until there is evéýry vidence that winter bas given away to opriflg. The frit step, then, is to procure a Mifficient quantity of horse manure from the stables and sdd to this from tbree- fourths to an equal anjount of leaves which should bave been gàthered and sived for the purpose the flu before. Ra mixed thoroighly, tramnp the Disslow1n in usive ayr, each of about equal dimensions i every way, so thtIWermefltatiofl will commence at once. evçn tho ugh the weather be severely cold M soon as fermentation becomes active, which will manifest itielf by the escapimg steamfrom the heap, the mass shoul be turned ahd treated as before. In two or tbhe da\"e the second fermentation wil commence md the composition wil then be ready Ïor the pit. This should be dug thirty inches deep andi any size desired. If a permanent hotbed ws wanted, it should bc walled up al round with brick laid in cernent, double hickness, and level with the surface of the surrounding earth. And the site, by Seme near Wknipeg-G.T*P the way, should b. a dry sheltered one facing, if possible, to tLe south sud protected from the cold north winds by either an evergreen hedge or a tiglit board fence. Three by six feet ia the general size of hotbed sashes, and the number of these ivantedi must Le determined by the amount of vegetables required by the family. If only the plants of cabbage, cauliflowers celiory, tomatoes, egg plants, lettuce aud Zcprs are to be grown, one sash might adequate for a family of six. But if tQ hotbed is te be used for the growing of lettuce, radishes, cucuinbers sud the like in addi'tion te the plants te be transplanted te the open, and it can be a large number of sash will be needed. Ïrhis poit each one must decide for himself. It is not inappropriate te remark that a hotbcd only needs a trial to demonstrate what a valuable adjunet it la to any garden. It la the best possible place for the growing of melons sud cucumbers, which =a be started alter the first of the radishes and lettticc are out of the way. 'Vines, i fact, will do much better and produce more abundantly i a frame than mn the open, provided proper care is taken te raise the sash, whenever the temperature will permit for a circulation of air, and that the glass la whitcwashcd as soon as the sun's raya become pom-erful. With the eëception of a heavy dlay, the soil used in hotbeds need not differ fromn what the garden affords, but for early crops a light, sandy loam la the most favorable. New ldeas ln Rural Schools The population of rural communities is necessarily scattering. The nature of f arming renders it impossible for people to herd tegether as la the case in many other idustries. This lias its good side, but also ita bad. There are no rural alumn for the breeding of poverty and crime; but on the other hand, there is an isolation and mnonoteny tbý.t 'tend to become deadening in their cffects on the The rural community affords f ew op- portunities for social recreations sud amusements. Not only are people widely separated from each other by distance but the work of the farm is exacting, and often requires ail the hours of the day not derndel for sleep. While the cty offers many opportunities for choice of recreation or amusement, the country affords none. The city worker has his eveninga, usually Satrdy altemnoon, sud ail day Sunday free to use as he chooses. Such is not the case on the farm; for after the day i the field the chores muet be donc, sud the stock cared for. And even on Sunday, the routie must be carried out. The work of the farm has a tendency, therefore, te become rnuch cft a grid, sud certainly will become so unless some limit la set te the exactions of f arm labor on the ture nesd strength of the worker. It separates the idividual from his feilows i the greater part cf the f arm works and gives hirm little oppor- tunity for social recreations or play. One of the best evidences that the con- ditions of 11e an7d work on the farm need te be iniproved is the number of people who are leaving the farin for the cty. This movement bas been cspcciailyrapid during the last thirty years of our bistory, and has contmnued until approxixnately one-haif of our Feople now live i tewns or cities. Not only la this loss of agri.- cultural population serious te farming itscif, creating a sbortage of labor for the work of the farm, but it resuits in crowd- ing other occupations already too full. There is no doubt tbat we bave too many lawyers, doctors, mercbants, clerks, and the like for the nuxnber of workers engaged Attacked by Asthma. The first fearful sensation is of suffocation, which hoiur by hour becomes more desperate 'and hopeless. To suchi a case the relief afforcfrd by Dr. T. D. Kellogg's Asthma Remedy seema noting lcss than miracuious. Its i'elp is quiekly apparent and soon the dreadfui ettàck is mastered. The asthmnatic \"who has found eut the dependability of this sterling rerre(Iv will lie%-er be without it. Il is soid everywhere. STOCK to a fine owder, mix them tbercughly and ive t to you at their bet, ntrational 8tOk 1Yocd hin iswhy a abeseefui cf international Stock Food -withe ergular grain feed toues up the \"istemi cf herses, gives them new tife, and a glossy ceat cf hair t. ith ie best thing ,you can give a hoe reIndigestion, liver trouble. coughs, influenza, bide bound or blcc! trouble. International Stock Food is equally aod for horaqs,cattle, sheep andhcga. Itkep the systemin anathy condition and promotes rapld growth For *ale by dealera everywhere. Ml INIENTIONfaL ST«K Vase ce. UNlUS. 70»M!. ont,. Cas. The Western Home P*onthly 59 individ-uaL. Stress and overstrain doms flot all corne fromn excitement and the rush of competition; it may equally well originate in lack of variety and unrelieved ~ ~ . routine, Hollw true this is,is seen in the fact that insanity, caused in this instance chiefly by the stress of monotony, prevails among the farming people of frontier' cominunities out of ail proportion to the normal ratio. F'inginatuially the most healthiful o'the ind ustrial occupations. The work is for the greatér part done in tte open air sud sunshine, and possesses sufilcient variety to be interesting. The rual POP- ulation constitutes the high vitality clasm of the nation, and inust be constsutly drawn upon to supply the brain, brawn, sud nerve for the work of the city. The farmner is, on the whole, prosperous; hie is, thrfr~hopeful sud cheerful, sud labors in o spirit. That many farmers and f armes wives break down or age pre- maturely la due, flot to the inherent nature~ of -their work, but to a lack of balance i the life of the farin. It is not so much the work that kils, as the con- tinuity of thbe work unrelieved by periodo o a\" e ofmres sud rrtion Witthe oppor ConcreteHgHoe type of healthfül. living, no inconsiderable dF 4 g lqr proportion-.of our agricultural' populationd are shortening their lives sud lowering Enable you to raise igrhq an their eff c nform to he msayovet funa-better pork without'heayier fecding. A sud failure t ofr otems ud-teai mental and elementary laws of hygienic iconcrete feeding floor permitsth n-1 living, especiaily with reference to, the mals to clean up ail the fced without waute. and relief f rom labor that cornes through eiiae h osblt fyu oscnrcil change sud recreation. a,,. .- I the leat- steel MaN '--r 'S gns ,m5, etc. Co. G. Lge Avl mentionà",
         "The Western Home MonthlY WMpohluvely mod my nrdcryoue Nl orw Tralnln and Colt BrekingAB SLUTBLY PRRE. Tventy-fie tbousaud PAIMERS and borsenr have tknmy reguar course snd found that il don e wtorà. Sveu Ifyou bave only ont hors., k winl ay yoifta omaster ywon erfuj s\"stem. Thie Beery Course ls the resuIt of a Bou s Hetie'swork as a tamer and trMler of borses. As one of My atudouts has said. \"The bh. éehg never been foaled that Prof. Beoey cannot bandie.\" My irecord proves it. W. su asew A\" m e aSwea Cot M bal The Beery Course 'gives bÈOue'.e q« wbMhaj you tbe priceles ecrets of Yott iii do It by m y siml, ~, allfetlmé-enablez uto rmdeWa.buransystor.'n,\u003c master any boras-ta elltbe alot of monoy lucolt tralnrg. ëI ton of suy borne t malie *1.200le 3.000 the maue of hvrbos yu Xap of my graduai.. ame bsndle-anM yutarse making bigmoy'a oes uau.ibruetraataat orn o MY. mmdcl a mua.iion.Yo mdm M Coup= tout iatcoe ceve the U4 r7ni: US t mm a â»V tmwaTBIjUeEKIR. This ruai. aIpeoiaI oer Mar noe r e. intm..lt ria8aveM mkaIii tt, n PIROF. JESS E MEY G eoret or p~Ilus-m RING GEORGE NAVqY PLUG OHEDWKNG PTOBACCO 88 IN A CLASS BY TSELFI It sr asss i others in quality and lavour because the process ywhich it is made ciffers frour others-It is deli- ciously sweet and non-irritating. SOLD EVERYWHERE: 10o A PLUQ ROCK CITY TODACCOCo., Manufacturers, QUEBEC Winnipeg, Marobh, 1914. ns. of the dictum of any ro, but because ýy, they are a fundaniental demand of human ta nature, and muet ho reckoned with. fr -Fromi \"New Ideals in Itural Sebools\", re by George H. Botta, Ph. D. Publislie\u003c by Hougbton, Mifflin \u0026 Co., New York. Home-Mado Cheeso ini fundamental productive vocationt Sinaller farima, cultivated intensively would be a great economic advantage t the country, and would take caré of a f larger p oportion of oui people than an now engaged in apiculture. Al students of social affairs agree t4- the moveinents of -aur people to town and chies ehould be checked and the tidg turned the other way. So important i the matt.er considered that a concerte( nat1onim- movement has- recently -beer umdertaken le study the conditions o rural life with a 'view lo making it mon attractive and so stopping the drain t the city. Mfiddle-aged fariners move le the towi or city for two principal reasona; ta edu- cate teir children and to escape froin th( monotony of rural life. Young peopIE desert the farin for the city for a variety of reons, prommnent among which area desire for better education, escape from the manotony and grind of the farm ifll and the opruztfr tesôei7sThvan- tages and recreations of the city. That the retired fariner la usualy disapointed and unhappy in bis tw home, and that the youth often finds h ga oaf the city Foon ta fade, la true. But this does not salve the problein. The flux ta the towii or city stili goes on, and will con- tinue le do so until the natural deuir foi social and intellectual opportumitiges and for recreation and amusement la ado- quately met in rural 111e. Farnng as an industry bas- already felt the effects of a new interest ln rural lie. Probably no other. indiustrial occu- pation has.undergone such rapid changes within the last generation as bas agricul ture. The rapid advanoei the value ai land, the introduction of new farnn o f ar machinery, and above ail the appli- cation of science ta the raising ofi cros and stock, have almost recontructed the work ai the farzn, within a decade. Special \"«corn trains\" and \"idairy trains\"y have traversed nearly every country in ianY states, teaching fariners scientific mnethoda. Lecturers on scientifle agri- culture have found their way into rnany communities. The Federal Governinent bas encouraged i every way the spread of information and the development of enthusiami in agriculture. The agricul- tural schools bave given courses of ip- struction during the winter le farinera. Farinera'institutes have been organized; corn-judging and stock-judging cantests have been held; prizes have been offered for the best resuits in the raising of grain vegetables, or stock. New varletiesmoi grains have been introduced, improved inethada of cultivation discoverc and ineans ai eniching '-and conserving the soil deviaed. Stock-breeding, and the cmreOf animais larapidly becoming a science. Farnung bida fair ta becoine one of the skilled occupations. Agriculturalwealth is rapidly increasing both through the riae in the value of lanci and through improved methods of farnu- mng. The conditions ai 11f e an the farm have greatly improved during the last decade. Rural telephonea reach alinost every home; free mail delivery is being rapidly extended in alniost every section of the country; the automobile is coming le be a Part af the equipment of many farina; and the trolley is rapidly pushing out along the country roads. Yet, lu spite ai these hopeful tendencis the rural carnmunity shows signs ofeide- teriaration in many Places. Rural popu- lation is steadily decreasing in proportion le the total aggregate of population. In- terest in education li ta osbb h fan chldrn hveeducational opportun- ities below those of any other class of our people. For, while town and city schools have been improving until they show a high type of efficiency, the rural school has barely held its awn, or bas, in many places, even gone backward.- The rural commu- nity confronta a puzzlin ,r problem which la still far fram solution. Certain points of attack, upon this proh- lem are, however, pcrfectlY cîcar and ob- viouq. First, educationai facilities mnust -be irnproved for rural children, and their education be better adapted to farrn hf c; second, greater opportunities rnust be provided for recreation and social inter- course for both young and oldj; titird, the, prograrn of iarrn work rMust be arranged to alowreaonaletiie frcst and rcc- reation; fourth, booksý,, Picttres, lectures, concerts, and enterti!hxient, ilust be as .ace'esqible to the farmi as to the t.own. Tii,ý \u0026coiiditions mubt bcejct., lot bccause I id We have made cheese by the follow.' ni lng r'feipe-wifth gaad -succeas%--f dr year,- re says a correspondent of an American to journal. Place sweet, whole miik in a wooden or iron vessel, do not use tin, heat ta temperature of 86 or 90 degree, nadd rennet, preferably in a tabiet 'which has been dissoived in half a glass le of water, caver and, let stand for le thirty minutes or until a g'ood curd is Y formeci. a When curded, cut in squares one-hlaf Sinch in size and hieat slawly to 100 de- -grees.---fUcheese kni e,-is- not at hazid,- use any long-bladed knife. L5\u003e stand dfor one hour, when the curd and whey- kshould bie separated. Remove the whey, le put the curd ia a collander, press with bande till dry as possible. *Salt ta Staste, mnixing thoroughly. Now place i -press which has been lined with chieese ir cloth and let reinain about t-wenty-four Shours under considerable pressure. Place -on a dry shelf in. the cellar and in from one to Vhree weeks the cheese is ready rfor use. They seIl readily for twelve and a half ta fourteen cents per pound, an ttinies we cannot aupply the demand.1 To make a- press, we have a tinner f te make a boop of tin about eight f inches high and eight inches in diani- eter. This we perforate, bhaving the perforation onc and one-half inehes apart to allow the wbey te pass ont. freely. It can be easily seen that there, la littie expense in making, wbile-tli\u0026 profit is far greater than ini butter mak-ng. ; Animal Surgery 1 There is a supposition, abroad. thaï broken bones in animals will net \"sà readily unite as they do in humn beinga. This, however, is quite a mis- take, as, if afforded the opportunity, the saine reparative proces-s takes place. The reason for so frequently. destroy- ing animais 'which break their limbs is generally economie. There are fractures ai many kinds, saine of thein -simple, some of theni compound. The compound fractures are, oi -course, most difficult ta treat, par- ticuiarly if there is comminution ai the bone to the extent that part of it pro- trudes; in sucli a case treatinent ils not usually effective. Animal surgery on ranches is of ton somewhat crude, but it is none the 1o*s effective. Thus, for instance, in t' case ai a punctured waund, searchiZ with a red-hot j oker is not unknown, and piugging with turpentino or har4 tobacco may suggest a somewhat rough and, ready means ai attaining an end, but it is certainly antiseptic, and prob- ably satisfactory. Resources In Farmlng The progressive farmer, says the 'ieid,\" is always on the lookout for any means afi iîproving his position, and ready ta seize any opportunity for deing 80 that maY present itseli. 1He is not given tao drastie changes for reasons that can be appreciated by the practical mind, but lie does no' hesitate when occasion suggests ta xodify his practice either withi regardti t cropping c r ta stock raising. Circumstances require caution in adopting new methods, and esîpecially new puirsuits,, for permanent, as «%vell as temlporary, loss inay resuit f roma an îmlw'ise departure from. estab- lished custoni. The fear ai seriaus error A Pili that Proves Its Value.-Those of weak stomacht will ind strength in Parmelee's N'egetable ]'ill, becau1se tliey serve to main- tain the healthf ,l action of the stomach and th1e liver, irregularities in which are m~ost di stressing. Dypeptics are well acquainted withi them andi valne titei at their proper worth. Thcey have afforded relief when othier p)rcparationis have failed, and have effected cures in ailments of long standing where other uuiedici,îes w cre found unavailing. Zý",
         "ý1914. .t bocause Of humuan seblools\" Ptiblisled ew York. The Western Home Monthly 6 Winnipeg, Mareh, 1914. irain a ne'w'policy need'not restrain one tramtettv experiîm unt, but, on the ,4~trary, should induce efforts to dis- caver ihiproved methoda along these Un~es.q1 .Thor Bman of prudence will test the meits of ail untried pursuit before em- barking extensivéIy upon it. Paper'cal- cuItons have littie fascination for himn, because they Lave se, often bien unful- illed in practice, and, therefore, bow- evir re\u0026seuing the -inost carefully drawnestiatesmay-be,-,he will put thein to test under',his normal condi- tions of eoil -and climate before incur- ring a new uncertainty. To bis mind the customs established upon genera. tions of experience are sufficiently apeculative; he will require some defi- nite data. te go upon before he wipl intensify an eleinent that is already tIo conspicuous i farming. Many a mah, however, has transformed bis farmn or bis system of management lhy well- planned experimentation. The Grapplo Plant Did yau ever read a description of an African thoru cailed the grapple plant or hook-thorn? It reminds me of the power which ardent spirits have over their vc- time. It grows along the ground, or trails its lon g branches from the trees, sud when in boom is very beautiful in ap- pearance, covered wth its large and abuj dant bloseome of a rich purpie hue. But branches are closely vocered with sharp ba bed thorne set in p airs. Th1ese are bad enough, but as the plant matures and the purpie'petals fail off the seed vessels are developed; and these are covered with a multitude of sharp and very strong hooked thorne. This seed vessel aplite in the mid- dle, sud the two aides separate widely from each other, so as to form an array of oocks pointmng 'n opposite directions. , These thorne are as sharp as needies and stee-like in strength, and if but on'i catches the uuwary traveiers coat sleeve hie is held a prisoner at once. Hie8lrs movement te escape bends the long sien- der branches, and hock after hook fixes snd nearly caught in aId branches, let us do ail we can tctprevent their spreading and to save such as we may frors thoe that do infest the Iand.-W. H. Eagler,. in \"Church Advocate.\" A darky preacher was lost in the'happy oelection p his -tex±, whieh he repeated ini vigoreua accents of pleading. .1 \"Oh, bredern, at de las' day -dere'. gwine -to be sheep and there's gwiie to be goate. 'WbaW' gwia. to4be shee au? who's gwine te, be goats ? Let's ail try te, b. like do I'1' wnite Iambe, bredern. Sball w. ho de goate, esistera? 1aw, we's gwine to be de sheep. Who's gw!ne t,.\u003e be de'sheep, bredern, an' who'e gwym. toeb.de goats? Ta' care ehyoesuls, sistera tae,,care of youh souls. Re- mç'pber,:. dere'à gwiie. te be goats an' ah e.Who's gwine oe h.de sheeip Wn wbosgwine te be de gpats?\" Juet then a eolitary Irisinan who had been sitting ïn the back cf the. ehurch, lisen g tilVd, TOuuMndid \"oi1 b. he gent. Go on; tell us the jeke, Eider. OVi'U h. the goat!\" e follow. or years, Americau ilk in a use tin, degrees, t. tablet f a glass and for curd is one-blf 100 de- at hand, e\u003e stand ad whey- lin whey, ess with Satte place ini h cheese nty-four re. Place in f rom is ready .twelve r pound, ply the t. tinner t eight m diam- ing the inche's usa ont. it thero- Lile -the' butter Ld that net sàô human a mis- ity, the place. testroy- imba is kinds, f them resl are, t, par- of the it pro- Sisnt i cf ton he les in tlze archig known, r bard ý rough mn end, 1 prob- its point upon him. .Struggling tb escape only trebles the nuinher of the thorned enemies. The only way of escape* is to wait a moment and eut off the clinging seed vessels carefully, and then, when clear of the bush,. remove them one by one. This plant wua often fatal to the English soldiers in the Kaffir wars, seizing and, holding a man, prisoner- until -the weapon of the wary Kaffir reached'hie heart. * Every Dinking saloon is a living mat- ured grapple plant. And se, long as they are licensed places of resort, they' will be sure of plenty of victime. Once caught it ie almost impossible to escape. Only an entire cutting off can save one. When the sword of the law can sever the root of the error, there will be ho pe. If a man is toc tightly held to free himsecf, and if the plant le.stili leftito throw out itspm- ticement to him, either he will fàll, or in sone way muet be taken beyonid' the reach of the mnare. The afest tbing to be done ie to root ujut.tIre-plint- altogether7 -And i-thisu cannot be done, and a continuai conteet is3 to be kept up with thoee constantly M -. FREE GIFTS Three Big Dollies. GWUTBIG DOLL, 27 MMCES TAUL, AMD 28MM DOgIES,ALL RBADY TO OUT OUT# We have a great, big, handsorne, life-size doll, 27 luches tail, look- ing for a littie marna. She is just the flnest playmate any littie girl could wish for and you will love ber as soon as you see her pretty face and big brown eyes, ber pink cheeks and light curly hair. In addition to the great, big dolly we also send two smaller dollies, making three dollies in ail. You wil have lots of fun playing together and need't be afraid of hurting the big marna dolly and lier bwo baby doUas, because they wo't break, soit their hair or lose their pretty eyes. These three dollies are -starnped in briglit colors on strong cloth and mother can sew them up ou the machine in Ion minutes. You can set these he doles dowu,' beud their arma and liMba of clothes and play ail day long. are movable and the dolls won't break How To Get These Don't Delay Signlng This Coupol- Dollies Free Offer Linited to Sept. 30 Send un a yearly subscription to The Western Home Monthly at $1.00 and thesel three beautiful dollie-one big one and two smaller one\u0026--will be sent you by return mail. Nov, in case you do not get a NEW oubscriptiofl. J ut get y our papa or ma- rna to EXTENU your own f amily sub- leription for one ycar. Send us this oubscription, and byretura mailwe will send you the three beautiful dollies- Absolutely Fre! The Western Home Monthly, Winlpeg. Enclosed fLud S.00 for \"One Full Year subscription bo The Western Home Monthly. Send Three Doilies to ........... .......at ....... ................. and paper to ........................... Box ....... Town..................... Province................................ efl has onough. dollios i I iv - -I - .4.. c. A Prosent Need of the lJp-to.Date Iarm *\"We may do witbout friends W. may do without books But civilized mani Cannot do without cooka.- Parapiirasing the thonght of this famiflier ditty, there are- tome thni a farm can-i d witbout, but the modern1r«m that e 3e. ta take i place as att-oçopiomicai prodûçe and show a maximum net profit éannot dt, without naturel asphalt ta hclp out la Its economy of manaqtraient. ___ One Tuh~eonl~bT 1hu r Fe-xpse at the start is thé roofiag of \u0026U 0, the billd ings as well as tbelr upttp.AM as tiieré la usually a freat deal af surfac e rooling question lu often a serons orne front a flnan- cial standpoint Thia la a place where naturel asphait stepu lu wlth a satlsfactory solution. Genuine naturel asphait. snc as le found lu Trinidad Lake on tii. sla4d. of Ts\"d and. Bermudes Lake in Venezuela lu1 a- turels everlating waterproofer.\"1 It bas beeh comâmercialiued in coml\u003emrtl'#y reCêit yesrs la may wayu. On. ai the. mont Important le i~ Its use for red ofng . sch za . a Ë rau, sun, wind, snow, boit, co1d, anm ie It cames lu sucii shape tinat. It ca eço811 be of roofkpg for buildings cf ti. cliàl- managea farm. But the, use of, naturelaal dogsui~t stop here. lits absolute wat« pr='ugqbta#. ties art an admirable check M where. Hence, inla i...f n makes aý valuable coatlng for sa. ç~ * foundations, cellar vallu, concret.iools concrete silos and lunumerable places whr complete drynesu or vaterprooing lau noces- Sari. This waterproofing quallty aita adapta -li for preventing rust on metal work, s80 tht natural asphalt pint ia now araiiab for 'ueon steel girders, iran fences, pema8 or anytiiing which la çxposed ta oC:--- lufluences. Anotiier Important fýX*- ue for natumal aapialt arises fromt lis value la presetvhug wood £rom decay. pence Yi«Ita »tunWtd with asplt tle and all imiber, used wheire 'iWpd-re - tlii from dampness or decqy I i n aryor - sirable, la greatly a,= in u durb lty. In many of the places on* the. àýodntn farm n where it la necessary for efjlilencyad. economy to go band la band nat\"ral asphalt steps -li and 1proves n9it ocly iti value but - its indispeabiity. Caribou lAke. Ontaria. 's the for any n, and r doing is not IeasonS actical when ractice r te require S, and ianeflt, resuit estab- s error iose of -melee's ) Minl- LCh and e mfost uaix ted proper n othier effected e other FOR T HE -CI4ILD We Want to Play_ With You LOTS BIGGHR THAN A'BABY These three beautiful doles will xnake any litti. girl or boy happy. They won't breakc and we believe they are the mout populoiý' plaything you can give your chilidren or littie friends. Actual size of big dolly, 27 inches. tail. 'It is so large that baby'\u0026 owu clothes fit lb. Every littie girl wants a big doli., Think of thie joy and hapnu these three dollies will brlng ito yeur owu home whente t! ones see the m. Thousands of littie oies ail over the country will be madie happy with these three dollies. Af ber your litIle girl gets ber doua aau Your neiglibors' children wilwant dolla just like hers. The supply of dols la limnited anrd we will fil! al orders as long as ou-r aupply e\" n- et'oll h ables us to do so. 'I",
         "u Thé Weatei'n Home 1Monthi y Fiitons: and Patterns -MWuh, nomo MO$bIYUIlfl audsi sbr eltoe .ow osn oezpt pi 100, Or*b umber t tbedmlowmted\u0026 A '~ Iu n lvly natrlois éors Ovetyand new Anomihr w\u003evlty la Jacquard eotton~, a Matmrd \"tht reemesa a dyed table \" lh.Tbin l but for suite and tailored LoaeIr Oc9ILf tafftas in plain colorg andi ) fne àJgured designe are wI l«. e orprevailing drapery. icabw-w.l fabrica are very 9o, an\u003ed Shot rencats are seen, tliey are juait tee long to be'boleros. On emre - tbe funk. i ct~oand squar-% 4aa.- texe witb à abigle button, others show ~ ~êod1~ qtaway wiUi tiny vest. PXUsiewý tunlug, floue--q and ýyff1eo am *lOwu on the new skirt iodla Tii. tuie las een in single, double \u0026uW tiipli tiers, \u0026Moi a\"deturnes, box plalted style incl the popular Minaret. The tunie may be iu varions lengbhé, it Mnay be shorter in front, lonserin bacJ dY'iee ersa It ayétait- from the front panel or from, the baek. It may be a real tunie, or simulsted by trimininge in tuie effect. The peg thp akirt will continue ite popularity, and this alse, pez'mite, of various forme of treatment. A uew Meature in this style is the caught-up- in-front effect, wh7xeh slwulatcs a tunie. Some new skirt styles show the drapery in the back orq t the aides, with plain front. Busti ý back ekirts are ultra faaluionahle. XA-ebar-ming littie party drèffs le made of eoft white sllk chiffon daintily draped ever white shadow lace on blouse, and with a lace chemisette and underaleevea. A touch of eolor la see; in the draped girdle, of pale pink messaline. The wust of t1#ls modal is madinluJaese style.1 The aldrt bas a tunlo with Points at the Vides A new thrâe tier skirt wiUl look veXY' styliel in serge or plaid cheviot,. This makes an ideal skirt for general utjlity. wear. A pretty drese Of washitble ratine in a new shade of tan, has a waist made 1with the \"'dip shouldtsrs.\" -It i. eut 'low pver a yoke of broeaded silk, the \"r\" neck opening hui a frili of net. The skirt bas a deep tuck at the aide, where iê- -joins -a-draped- portion~ fiat is capght UP at the back te give just a semblance of \"buatle\" fulness.1 A dainty blouse la imade of fine white ail] over embroidered voile. It bas a vest of whilte Brusselîs net fastened with white crochet buttons The neck is eut inu'Ir' shape and finished with a double frili of 'white net and a varlety baud oÉ velvet ribbon. The aleeves in \"ccap\" style are fin.ished at the wrist with frilîs. Another charxning blouse la fasbioned rromCanon rep, ad hs aruffle- of- -self materil extending around, the neck and down each side of the f ront, falling in graceful folds. The sîceves are fin- ished at the wrist in the same way. A, stylish dress was developed in ma- hogany brown silk foulard. The waist ['bey beat ail the old Ideas What is mnore warmnth-giving andl invigorating on a cold day than a steaming deicious cup of Oxo 1 What can.le quicker than dropping*an Oxo Cube' j a cupful of hot water t With a \u0026scuit it makes a ight satisfying meal-ready in a miinute-and just that rich strengthening beef-nourishnxent the body neéds. \\~And the delightfulness of it!1 ready at any moment w-9 ithout trouble. Before a morning-'s shoppin-after the theatre-on a journey-at bcdtimne-no mattei J ,when, the handy littie Cubes in their dainty tin are at your service. A daily cuP of Oxo is an excel- lent safeguard agaist the \"grp' Tinsoci 4. 10. 50 \u0026 100 Cubes. The first impression on entering a room decorated with \"Alabastine\" * tints is one of Beauty. But-while D the effects are charming ln the high- est degree, yet \"Alabastine\" i8 the moat economical wall finish. You can make every room in your home glow cheerily by using \"Alabastine- \"Alabastine\" tints impart that soothing, restful effect so much desired by people of good taste.' Anyone can apply \"Alabastine- Mix with cold water and appiy with .fat bristie brush. With the numerous tinta and white, any color scherne Scan be easily produced. \"'Alabastine is just the famed Alabaster rock ground \"' into a fine cerent- -hence its bewitching and permanent colors. It won't rub off. You can re-decorate at any time- one coat makes an excellent foundation for another. Free Stencils: Our staff of trained decorators will Sdraw up any color scheme for you free of charge. f 'We also supply free stencils suitable for your s purpose. \"Alabastine\" is sold by ail Hardware and Paint Dealers. Write for full particulars Ï..'«.\"-:.-.*.--and free booklet. The Alabastine Co., Limited 21 45 Willci St, Paris, Canada. 9299 9799. A Good Coat Style. Girl's Ceat. Cheviot, zinelene, velvet, corduroy, serge, or broad cloth are al suitable for this model. The' fronts are do)uble breasted; and the coilar la trimmed with a shaped bandL. The coat is fiaished in Balkan style. The pattera lu cut in five sizes: 8,'10, 12, 14 and 16 years. It reqires 31/ yards of 44-inch material for a 10 vcar size. A pattern of this illustratio n îailed to any address on re- Ceipt of Oce. in silver or stamps. Tiinie cferts are ever popular at pres- eut, especially for sîcader figures. Tlie dlesigui here port raved shiows a pretty style. It. was developed i lm oo ve] vet, efhode in sel\"'color. A vest of white stiede triMnmed with Bout- arhe brai] i,ý toPý bv a chemisette Of sa tin, to iin teli tlie *velvet. A girdle of the s:ani4e niaterial finishies tIte waist. A ularrow trinimiuoe of skunk merves asl a4ditiohinl trinning on tunic and waist. This attractive dTess -iâ com- la made with a vent of Bmssuelî net and white Veise embroldery, oruamented with faney peari huttonsi A turm dowa collez of the embroidery te edged, wîth a. net ruffle. The aleeve in eut in ont with the front yoke at t.he back, and lengt.hened by a close 1itting }ower r. tion, edged with a net frili. TheXJrt has a tunie., with two crosewjse tuckî in front; at the back the tunLoe ends are crossed and plaited' into the bei.t. A 'dain.ty frock of hnported. white crepe. with pretty Dresca n fiowers shows the waist wth a. vesit of gathered Brun. sels net, trimane with colored mesealin@ buttons and. loops. The waList in faaah. ioned wit'h kimono liloulder, and bas lace underaleeves. The skirt ba\u0026 a double gathered tunic, slasbed at te side. A cruEshed girnle of messelne la crossd over the front of the waist, and fastened with ornamental buttons just be.ow the. bust. Dresses for growing girls are thown in Middy, Balkan and Rusalan styles, Iiish-- linen, linene, ginghamn, galûtea, wasihable ratine, repp and eponge aie suitable materiala. A smart model1 in Russian peasant style is mnade of lighit blue repp embreidered in white. TLe dress bas a. plait at eacili \u0026ide of 'the front and back, stitched down te the waistline. The free edges are scal- loped on neck, eleeves and beit. The front of aleeve and dTress is buttoned to the back over the ahoulders. A neat school dress made up in blîîe and brown plaid gingham shows the fronts made with a broad plait outlin-\u003e ing a vest of plaid cut onK the bias, thus form.ing an; apparent contrast. Button trimÂmed tabs hold the tie ends, iu placp that extend beneath the front edr-' of a broad collar in white linene.' The cufs are in white alise. The skirt showe deep panel like plaita li front and back, and~ ie joined te the waist with a. broali beit.",
         "Wlnnipeç, March~, 1914. The- Western Home Monthly Blue serge was. used for this, design, whioh is finished with a high nockclos- iug. It ha*saimxple linea, a jauzity col- ar and cufs, -nd wiR lookr equally well- iflannel, galatet, madras, gngham, vol- vet, or orduroy. The pattern la cut A W T E in fur ies: adf 3;.ad6-inh ara ItTA SWfg Ti n3four sizes o3, 4, i 6 'yaria fo le yer\" uizê 4io i net and mamented arn downt ged -w:th ý iont ack, and IWer r. [ho _,it se tucki ends are Ilt. e. White ra showq od Brui. Deeealins in fadh- has lace a double ide. A crossed fastened e.Ow the. e thown, 1 style\u0026. galatea, inge aile lode1 in of lighit L. TLe ef 'the te tlue re aia- Tie Uttoned in blu: mes the outlin. as,~ thue Button in placp dr' of The t showe d back, P. broaé 9833. A natty and e omnfortable dress. Gil's dress in Russian blouse style, with chemisette, and with long or shorter sleeve. Brewn and white striped' galatea, wit'h trimming of white, are here shown. Blue serge with chemisette of red, and collar and euffe to ma4 ih would aIse be effec- tive. Gingham, ehaimbrey, voile, per- cale, linen or linene are ail suitable for this model, wMhl a comfortable and smart in ite simple Unes. The broad collar *jei îed to the chcriette. which closes iu front and is arranged under the blouse. The gored skirt lias plait@ at the front seaxus. The pattern is cut in four sizes: 8, 10), 12 and 14 vears. It requires 4 yards of 44-inch inaterial for a 10 year size. A pattern of thi% iflustrailoi mailed to any address on receipt of 10e. in fil- «ver or sts.mps. -ý Boys' Russian Suit with Knickerbockers. 9845. A.Comnfrtable Suit for the Littie Boy. A pattern of this illustration xnailed te any address o-' receipt of 10c. in ailver or sta.mps. Planai, blaxiket élotIx fiannélette, crepe, lawn, canmbric, cashmere or silk may be used for this design. The neck has a deep epening, and. Is finished witb a wide coi.ar. The iehort comfortable jsîeves are topped by neat cuffa. The gewn is loose fitting, tho fuinees being beld to the ferm by a beit. The pattern is eut in three sizes: small, medium and large. It requires 5% yards of 44-ineh material fer a mdim size. A pattern of his illuStration mailed to any address on receipt of 106. in ail- ver or etanps. 82.Aeomrfort\u0026ble deirable biodel. Ladies' house gowu or Ioungîug 'robe. k ) For Hard WorkejrÏ-1' There is nothing more 'esuanin and nourishingthanSymington'sSoups., There are z i equally deliclous vvistis equally who1esoméý equaily Weiç000 Put a packet into watedsir, aI and there you are ~ steamng qum tofti st ;eVer 4ted.\u0026 w.UP MUfliawny Grecs P«c Tonu Cdu7, Scotch Drotb Oz Tau 0mb. Peu Mook Turtti Lentil White Vetabb. SeUing Agents- SCOTT, BATHGATE \u0026 Co. 149. NoQtre Dame St.,Winnipeg When writing advertiaers pies.. mentio4%. W R~ omoeIIoutbly. 9843-98W. A «Unique and Styligh Model. posed of Ladies' Waist Pattern 9843 and Ladies' Skirt Pattern 9820. The wnmist is eut in six sizes: 32, 34, 36, 38 40 and 42 inches bust measure. The skirt in five sizes: 22, 24, 26, 28 and 30 inches waist measure. It requires 71/2 yards of 40- inch, material for a 36-inch size. Ths Illustration calis for two separate patterns which wili be mailed te any addTess on'receipt of 10e for each pat- tern in lv*;ýor stampe. luroy, )e fer loube 1 with nshed ut ini rS. It tterial f this n re- pres- Ti!e )retty ce] or A Bout- te of girdle waist. erves and cern- wuwjwmm",
         "The, Western Home Mionthly ________ \u003e1 EVAN\" MROAT LIPOLY rIUMOPA tilles *They give relief at once, and the Ir contlnued use restores strength and tone ta the throat and vocal organs, If you speak or slng in public, always keep Evmns' Antiseptia Throat Pastilles at hand. 174 For Frt $aple.,wr/te IIusic Lessonsl FOR ALL In Your Own Home- FREE A wonderful offel' to every lover of music, whether a beginner or an advanced Nlyeint-i lemon. (or a less num ber if you desire) for Piano, Organ, Violin, Banjo, =ont Sight Singing, Mandolin or 'CeIlo given free ta make our borne tudy courues for these instruments known in your locality.. You get one or two lessons weekly, mnd your only expenhe during the time you take the lessons will be the cout of postage and the music you use, which is amall. Hundreds of pupils write: \"Wish had known of your school before.Y \"Have learned more in one terni \\in my home than in thrce ternis with private teachers.\" \"Everything iS 50 thorough and comnplete.*\" \"The lessons are marvels of simplicity, and my eleven- year-old boy ha.sflot bail the leaut trouble to learn.\" One minister writes: \"As cach succeeding lesson cornes 1 amn more and more f ully persuadeil I madc no mis- take ini becoming your pupil.\" Don 't say you cannot learn music, but SEND COUPON (Letter or Postcard wifl do). We furnlsh a, book- let that you would like to have. It gives much fuller informa- tion a bo ut ou r School, our Faculty and our Lessons than we could pos- sibly tell you in this ]imîted space. Write today, using attached coupon U.S. SCHOOL'0F MUSIC, 225 Fil tI Ave., Box 63, New York City. Gentlemen- Please send me particulars of the Free Scholarship offer. 1 desire to learn the instrument after which I have markedX. It is understood that this places me under no obligations what ever. PIANO ORGAN VIOLIN GUITAR MANDOLIN BANJO CORNET 'CE LLO SIGHT SINGING Namý ............................................... Address ......................................... CATALOGUE 0F LATEST FASHIONS TRIs is a finely printed and illustrated catalogue, showiing about' five hundred up-to-date styles for Misses, Women and Children. A copy will be mailed to any address on receipt of 10 cents. WETEN HOME MONTHLY WunNIG Your Pajpful Cal!ou!es TOE-KOM FORT The tissue f ood and f oot tonic Cures Corns, Callouses, Ingroxiing Nails. Relieves Tired, Aebing, Perspiring Feet, Bunions, Blistered Feet and ail Fo.ot Ailments. Shoe Dealersand Druggi.-ts, or by mai 125c. Satisfaction or mrney bzack. FOOT-KOMFORT MFG. CO. 389 Tweed Avenue, Winnipeg Contalning 60 Articles Robes, Gowns, Barrows, Flannels, etc. Eve r t: essarv ,good and durable, and readv fori rastan- use. Sent return Mail. DUTY FREF and Carniage paid for $,10 Britjsh P.Order. Lists Free. Mrs. Franks, 175 Alfred St., Nottingham, Egngland. 9824.* A good aytyle f'%r the \"new frock.\" Girl'. dress, with or without chemisette, and with long or shorter sleeve. A serviceable school drees of dark, olive green cheviot, with trimming of red eponge, could be d'eveloped from this design, or for more dressy wear black velvet would,' be effective, withl trinuning of liglit blue or white faille. Thie de- sign is closed at the «ide under the plait. It is also appropriate for serge, galatea, corduroy, gingham., or percale. The pattern is eut in four Rizes: 4, 6, 8 and 10 years. It requires 4. yards of 40-inch material for a 10 year size. A pattern of this illustration mailed to any address on receipt of 10cin ssu- ver or stamps. 182l. A chic gown for nutlî fi figuires. J)ress for iO-e and 'sniali omn Tlîis echarming f roek w-oc eveloped fr-ont white voile, \" ith ý4wdow lace fui. 'coke and siceve jiiý,hl. The girdIe. an little boîvs whilîiîornatu1ent. the fron t, alIso the' cordeçi pipiîig on waist and skirt front,. is of y vllt, ùcrîpe. The gle- sign is equallY alppriate for charnn- ms, loire, ]nrucades. for sa tinî, sere, i lreeor eivet. 'hie wajst sbow s a dep ahouIltvir' Oke to W fuilfîl por- tioni-tare joined. Il. i-ieut low-ut lte îueuk edge, an fi-îd wjtl ti a tpvl collar. 'Thîe sik it u- Lt,îterqiOer tL Lip il)eau.finlili uýt thîe baiîu'. itl a lugtlîwise belli tue k. 'ihe pattcrui s eut in four sizea: 14, 16, 17 and 18 years. It requires 4%/ayards of 44-inch material for L 16 year eize.' A pattern of this illuetration mailed, to any adîdress on reeeipt of 10c. in sil- ver or stamps. 8971. A unique and~ effective night gtow* Ladies' wglit dress with peasanb yokê. Suitable for aIl lingerie fabries. Tfte yoke is eut vit~h cap sleeves ini one and iv joined to full skirt pinces. Tie nxodel is simiple and easily made. The pat- tern is eut in thrce sizes: small, nmedium and largeP. Tt requires 41/4 yards of 40- inli material for the medium size. A pattern of t1tig illustration inailedî to any address on reoeipt of 10c. in ail- ver or stampa. Lailies' on.e pieue corset cover, in round, t-4îîa re ior \"\"neck cdge. Suiitaltle for aIl over\" enbroidery, for livwni, bati-te, caînlîrie, naînsook, crePe or sillc. Xiw -do aired trimrning niay be iî~d. ue eIn i ey simple, and SiX sizes: :;2~~, ,3,38 0ad42 ieut 'n lisi miiiure, fItrequires 13/s yard Of I ( iat erjurI for a mnedium size. A put n i,11 ou tis illustration n,-ailed ar --* ' on receipt Of 101,. in Su- v er or stanips. Instruiments supplied when needed. Cash or credit.",
         "Wif'\u003c'March, 1914. I Baker's CocoaI lia Sterlig Ment I MADE IN CANADA- From carefully selecteci high- grade cocoa beans, skilfully blendeci, prepared by al perfect mechanical process, without the use of chemnicals or dyes. It contains no addled potash, possesffS a clelicious naturel fIaor, and is of great food -value. Choice Refcipe Ok wd nfrce Walter Baker \u0026 Co. Ltd. Fetabliahed 1780 maaw.I.Caad Doeealo. Mam. * TO EVERY BOY.0 0 FRE AND GIRL *dur lieate ofau l8kaoli a odring and you can gave it engrved with * any. monogr deaire. You can eam thiîs beau * tiful ring in leus than * an. hour. Just .imply 1 ei 24 packagea of Our a-srted Picture Post *carde. Lada package contai-§ 6 carda, wl\u003eich Myou sli for only 10c. A fref coupon givevI * izh each package, will make your friends *bu tbem on sight. Don't wait a minute, but *ordler right now. Yon @end no money until yen *have sold the carde,. Ibm end un the money Oyou have receved (82.40), we aend you thisW *ring, engraved, by return mail. Alk for oui big *catalog of preuiums. Addreuà COLO IALART CO. 0.'OKOTO. ONT. The Western Homte Mont hi \u003e. Thjis design is good- for gingliain, madras, chambrey, crepe, voile, jik, / linen and ail lingerie fabrics, afiso for velvet, flannel and corduroy. The collar may be rolled opén at tuie tiiroet or closedliigb. The steeve-msy bè flnishedi with a simple band or with the pointed cuif added. The pattern is rut in seVpf sizes: 32, 34,1'6, 38, 40, 42 and 44 inches, '- bust imeasure. lirequires 2%YY.- s of 40-incli iaterial. for a 36 inch L. z... 9834. A new and atylish maIel Ladies' shirt waist. A pattern of this illustration xnaiied to any- address on receipt of 10e. in sil- ver or stamps. 9838 9838. A simple,' practical and becOming model. Ladies' bouse dress in raised or normal waistliiie. Percale, lawn, seer,iicker, galatea., cashmere, linens or flannellette are al a1propr-iate for titis style. The fronts are sligh)tly iov at the throat and flisised. witl a neat rolling coilar. The siceve lias a sipcd cuti. The closLig is at thîe side front in skirt ansd maist. and the sinmple gorcd skirt lias a tucked stitchied invcrted plait at the ceuter back. The pattern is eut iii 5eveil sizes: 32, 34, 36, 38, 40, 42 and 44 incelies bust ncasure. Tt require., 61/4 yards of 36- inchi material for a 36 incl i sze. A pattern of this illustration xnailcd te any address on receipt of 10c. la ail- Iver or stamTps. In spite, of its si1»Plici'ýY, this mode' is attractive, and 'seill develop effectivelY in any of the dress materials now in vogue. The fronts are shaped and crossed, the closing being affeeted at the left aide near the armseamn. Deep Gib- son tucks add ta, the apparent width. Tbe skirt in p1aited below a. wide belt.' A fiat collar inishes the neck edge. The pattern is eut in four sizea: 4, 6,8 and 10 years. It requires 31/2 yards of 40-inch mnaterial faiÉ a ix year sîze. A pattern of this illustration lnailed ta any address on receipt of 10c. insail- ver or etampa. The skirý' is graefully drapéd at the aievhreit join shaped back panel. The fronts arc slashed near the Item, and finished -with a samalli insert, Dart tuek.s confine the fulines ver the hip. The model is effective for serge, broad loth, panama, voile, velviet, cor- duroy, satin or silk. Ag here shown gray prunella was used, with trimming of self-covered velvet buttons,' and insert of velvet. The pattern is eut in five szes: 22, 24, 26, 28 and 30 inches waiat measure. It requires 23/ yard%- o 44.. inch material for a 24 inch sime 9809. A unique and stylish design. Ladies' skirt with slaped panel, back and front insert. A pattern of this illustration mnailed to anv address on receipt of 10c. in ail- ver or stamps. Corns crHpple the feet and toake walkin ., trtture, yet sure relief in the shape .1 :oloways Corn Cure is wtl.jn reach of ail, naterial mnailed, in sil. REOUSE SUBSTITUTESI - -~ r' MA~tidto seU me a hOre oc.!es it was a fie horse and had n Ibng the mat- er wlthlt. 1Iwanted afine h but,I1dldfl't know an ythl ngabout horsol much. Ad dicldn't knaw the milvery wcil cithor. Bo 1 toid hlm I wanted ta tr tho rse for a month. rie zaid \"AH -I1gtt~b pay me first, ind1'il give you batik your maney Vf the horse lsn't all rlght.\" Weil, 1 dldn't Bite that. 1 was afrald the. horo was'nt\"aUirghtl andthat 1 mlght have towhlstlefat in maqey if I once pte *weth lt. IdiMttbUy ho=rfftsaugh It wan Mt y ow,th st thinklng, .intMach, 5th '10 '0avlt nasher randfiemld ta m*yseif, lots l ai\u0026ytn about my Washing MahiniIShBo the hors ufd-about the manwli 0f.dt. ButIlneerknaw, bocailsethey niIdGt write and tell me. YoU sme 1I oilm Wasblflg Machines by-mail. I have sold over fal a mil- enaugh ta icI peaple try niy Wasbng Machines for a month, béore they pay for the=, Just aq I wanted ta try the horse. NawI knaw what aur 4\"100Gravlty\" Waahet wIllldo, 1 know 15 will wash the. clotheswlthout wearlng or tearing them, in less than hait the timo they caabe washed byhandot byanyothtr machine. 1 knaw lit vil vash atub ha o f very dlrty clothes lu Six Minutes. 1 know noother machine ever lnvented cafl do th4t, wlthôut Werilng the. clothes. Our \"1900 Gravty' Washer dacs the work soeasy that a child can rua 15t almasi as weli as a strano womar., and lit don't wearthtle elotbles, fray tg1e odges, nar break buttonS, the mayail othot machines d. ùa h g h 15 jus t drives mmaa vaer cer boqbti fibres cf the clothosq~e a force pump mlght. Sol sald 1 ta myeif, I wilU d.wu hmy.\u0026\"190 Gravltv\"l Washer what 1 wanted the* mnta 1 wlth the harse. Only 1 'won't wat for eple ta asic me. lil aMfer firit, and l'il MakepM. te aMfer every time. 1 Lot me send ]jou a 119W0 Gravlty\"l Waubet on a mionth's free trial, l'il psy te frelght out of my owa pocket, aad If you diip't vant the jma- hne after YOU V* Usedt ailoth, \u0026I, it. h. back and ;ýrthe fegt.S O. se Y caaugh 1: nt It. Does't k proe thit the '\"1900 Gravlty\" Washer aut hoailthat 1 say It la P Andou can Pa me aut of vhat It uaves fore yoIL 1t iii save riwhae cot ia fgomonths In wear and tear on the clathes alose. Md then t will save 80 to 75coents a veek over that In washwomaflew ages. If you beep te macuin after the month's trMIallelt yon psy for ltout cf what it saves yott-fIf Itnaves yon 00 cents a week. 1Send me 60ao n# vek 'tilipsifor. 191 Sake that cheqrfiiI. 1n il *iMt for my MmeY until the ma-Ln e earuMO baanc.- Drop me a lUne \u003c\"ay, and *1let0e geûd tau a book abou t the \"IWO Grvty' Waaiir tbut wasi'q clothes In six minutes. Address me personally. 8. U. MORRIS. Manag er. . 1900 Washer Ca., 357 Yonge 8t, Toroato, Ont. The Boat Populer Per urne In DalIy Use INDISPENSABLE ON IVERY DRESIN-TABLEI yokê. . Tte and iv niedel e pat- iedium of 40- round, 7, for crepe ay be ', and ,ut il, inclies rd Olf ze. Il-ailed il sil-",
         "Th WOe,'nHome -Monthly Winnpeg Madi,1914. Thé Homi For \u003eO Ver CmuII.la ChIlih0odý * A eoaulmonor fit, in Ilymti y b n Y.ars oeflon aty eUhgof r= iia toi2 the objt cof.;\"umarticle to tBck fadta regarding th ese seisues -as a ov uroe he =\u0026\u0026thlue\u003ca.teamentcfthe. ââ eàpd\u0026eton n h -o-atta et ~Roem aouldbetmmanain Tiie teudecy te eonvuigive msefrures la StrO\u003ctILofte '!a trongly marked famlly char- ýBitters, ved do tÎhjs, aceristie. lu Buch cases it in. common to rd yjrte \u003eolemam. flud liaI mliglaprovocation le sufelent lest~ aj' uplmmat ta cause msaltack For-erianl., such causes as irnproj\u003eerly placed pins, or P. White. ureteiît string* tlghtly dravu about the, body, \u003e7 bv mmtobe ~limbi or neck, bave eaused convulsions uU~ptIm or»t_ tsate yar; er theeifumaumes eferred te. US 1, Aé*rai doctom ansd ileroe rmiies lun'whom convulius have witaont uoeo appeared duiug ciiildhood lu previousi a4-* u\u0026uu mmuroeeffected pelleratious -shonld -be-more than Ordinar-i ILY qudock Blnd ]Bitters, i decided nly vatciful le avoid undue excilement t'D ta-trial. 1 bave taken, one in young eikfreu, snd *0 correct viieni I b fel that 1 arn cnued et possible any oM the. knwa causes of con. hue. I er uw do tii. mre bard von mimlions. I .U~ eloe Iwas taken ick.\" udokBloed Bitters is manufac- tte\" 00Vby -7:e T. Milbura Co., Pailit Without Oul MUN , àldeD8luve Tb\"t cuft DOM Vw cm O f Paint Deventy- fle Pertt £ 1 m ?aa\u003c1 g êUeXfld ta Evua- A L.- 24p prominent manufacturer of K.a~, NY, hae discovered a procesa of aklig no kid ojalt without the. use fessa \u0026Of a drY Powder and ail that is re- quinsfa cod water 10 maies a paint weather PUIý'fiProfsad a, durable as oil paint. Ittètar ufae ood, atone or .OV about'ono-ourth as mucb. itul Ur. A. L ice, Manufaur,40 N. Y., and ho vini end \u0026Icraaso color card and daouton 9 vngyou boy you can m.yaa goduuy do i~.Write o-day. a u au flEWOI WOR[ DEPENOS t îîua s heiiatr ypoi fe * TUEWORIIIJ 018JIESION Inoos mata itmla vel ta rmenbr liaI w this la one -of the mcml common causes ai Prioîe-theb caplain of luduslry te tic of them. hod umlre-from milady lu the, auto to \u003c)er\u0026Sdinin luyoung children ilaa nol hi Ieo voman viti lthe crubbing buh- uncommon cause, 10 vilci la probably in tie aceompliahimeuhm of every one of us to b. atlrubuted lie popular Iresîrnent of lh depeud absoluheiy on the accompl.*ei- convulsions, uamely, ernetica lunternally de ihents cf our stornacia. Backed by a and bot muslard-water baha exterually. be good digestion, a man eau give lhe beat Tic.. measures, altiough excellent in fa lhi in mhum. Wien hie stomach fails, orne cases, should net b. employed dur- ex hie becomes 'a weakling. iug lie eizure itseif, as in lhe hurry ' h To tifs losa of power no one need of tie moment more barm than good cs, muirnit. Righl babils cf cati ng, drink- is almoal ure le, resuit. of msleeping and exercise, aided by Na. Severe frigil or cther sudden ernotions 'w Dru-Cc Dympepsia Tablets, will restore are not au infrequeut cause cf convul- and maintain the full efficiency cf thc abus, not only during cMhdcd but mi human mind snd body. limougicut adolescence, sîthoughif1 is tc Na-Dru-Cc Dyspepsia Tablels coutain observable that amoug those, people ail the, active principles needed for the where self-control ia cultivated, auci pa digestion of every klud cf focd. Theygo reuts are -net commuon. to lie assistance cf lie ,weakened tri________l stomach, sud enable lie suffemer, right abI from lie mlart, ho assimilaIs aud getEye-Straln Headacheapr lie beneil cf lie food eahen. With t ie assistance, lie digestive organe regain it is not an exaggeraîion te ay tiat their loue, snd Soon tii.use cf lthe lab.: oye-sIraini la more requently lie cause leus la ne longer necesary. . of beadacie Vian- ail otier causes com-. Ifyour ahonaeh le not womking ro- bined, yet it is peniapa. tbe Mont fre- prly y Na-Dru-Cc Dyspepsia Tablets. quîy oemîooied,'. not only by lte il K0e. at your druggistm National Drug muerr themeelves, but-aise by their yoi Mud Chimical Go. cf Canada, Limited, mne\u003cicmIajiavisers. Many and rnany a tax XmtOreBL 145 person viabad been a mnarlyr for years cf Do n't W a rperioalca1 sicir-headaches, bad con- 1 iaddiet',tiken \"headache cures,\" snd fee a Trussl doue everyktig but.hiieTlght thing, bas obe the modem s cien-ti\u003cPf' proper glâssesand tien found the head- -,a inventIin, tie ynder- aches- disippear as -by.a miracle. the fuIine sicovery that The eye-slrain headache is of no ofi cure. ruptur1 vil b. e u ent on trial..N o- pecial typ, adperbaps thi s lawby nomious.pringsorpadl..il is Bome e urrecogu fred. It May be Ciae Hma automatio Aironyanocsnadulptaint.fre ge Cumhilos. Elada andO-Ya ca,1a ulaUithfoe ge -drwn he r dkn iead. or temples, it May b. a general tuei aretther a. pou sorenesa, or it may b. a lirobbing, met c.. mnBOOKS. te isS r No MIvm.N r acking beadache vbici the mightest fui Durable, ohe. a. p ose or a brigit light rmakes unbear- il Sept. I0.,01. IonIen triai t.ovi.Ct-aeIlm ' cnatlmyb e 108» an d moamure blanks mailed fre.Bn m reeoTart-, or ill It May cstant lteMayeu-mef and sddress today. C.0. E O Be'dITus k rrîa rofa rai ayttc ithte .u-o nt-iaraaliMoh laity f amalililattck.Sam m ýe DoctorA. The eonly effective treaitnt là Y- moVal of the mtrainby correction of any, imperfectieL ln the eyes end 'by a re- forrn of bad oeye habita, such ais readiflg very amn priait or reading in a poor lightorWin arailway trin. But . word of ca-tion le moat neces- fary herm. 'The.glamees, muet be fltted b _ À fIfled o Ilis - fter -a careful examination of the. eyeu, for badiy fltted glaffae Wiiloely maire matters, woree, and by Ieading the, patient to think that the eyes are not iu fault, cut off ail hope of a cure by a competent oculiat. Bad EyeS lght__ _ _ _ _ _ _ _ _ _ _ _ _ hYgiene t mvryofe nget Ey.g lasses Not Neoessary to tii. detriment of one'm beh.ah. For- iiteaiice I acrnnnea 0OPl yugtCan lie S-roujt oed aMd MoI th edomwindoiwa, from'thet .eariy Forma. -Of Discased elCu Succeaaffl rn r i g tâli evening, yet \" s precau- T e te0iho t C t7n o r gg sg tienin a f tour eglected, with the. resuit raeWthuCttgorDtan Of aickly face and weak constitutions. Thattbe eyea can b. strengthened s0 tbo eyeglasses can be dispensed with in mu _ny Cases bas been proven beyond a doubt b v t\u00260 testixnony of.hnrd of people who publicly dlaim that theireye-si là has been restored byti * vonderful littie instru. ment called \"«Actinaos \"«Actina\" also relieves Sore a nd Granulated Lids, Iritis, Cataracts, etc., without cutting or :;\u0026.d.rugging. Over o ne hunredthousand \"Ac. tinas\" have been soid; therefore the Actina treatment la not an experiment, but ia reli. ahi. The foliowing letters are but samnples of hundreds we receave: Misa Suie Swartz, Berlin, Ont., writes: soi cannot say enough for what 'Actina' ha. done for My eyesight. When I was eight years old I bad to start to wear giasses. The doctor sid I_ couid neyer eXpect to go wixiiout- glassea. I have used 'Actina' only six montha and can now sew and do ail my work witl'. out glasses. I had worn glasses for seventeen years.\"1 Mr. Fe-Y E. Deitrick. 7124 Idlewilâ Street, E.-E., Pittsburg, Pa., writes: \"MUy eyes were very weako and my vision was ao bad that I could recognize people oon.1t y short distances. Since using Actina' I hae RqmtB. adiscarded -,v giasses, rny headaches are gones Rouet ~and -Y vision. I belleve, is as good as evor it wasy\" It in naturae that people S0 afflicted Mr. J. H. Frankenfield, 522 E 2Oth Street Cheyenne, Wyo., Write.: \"Regarding what eaniiot stand the. atrain of d'aly life, the 'Actina' has donc for me, 1 amn proud to vithout 80orne6tndesirable sitimulation, say that 1 amn not wearing my glassea at aiL which. by degrees. sapa the. brain-power As for my catarrh it, la almost gone and I and leads to f remit complicationk. have been troubled with it for more than , On Ofthe St ommo ouSmesOf ixteen yeara. Ou.~~~~~~~~~~~~~~ f timotcmootomeofAgetnubrofMY railroad. friends hom hoaehld eglotsla ieweaken- are buying 4Actinas' as ý,ou know by the ig of tb. eye, The. rush of modern ordlers You~ have received.' lifélePeraps coducve o tis iso. «Actina can be used with perfect safety ife, enape, odu cve the e besi -by every member of iit faihora beeer, e ihdue cme tjuh. eih may afctoof the eye, ear, thrpat or head.X e peaevd ro ijuy. The chief Free trial of the \"«Actina\" ls given in every Izisth es il ofthesnfantnusst 'ocaSend for our FREE TRIAL offer and valu- ipoe heeye o te ifat strong able FREE 800KÇ Address Actina Ap. Jetl, incandescent or electric, which i _iance Co., Dept. 84N, 811 Walnut St. mlicusted t b min the delicate nerves-as City, Mo. )f the. retins, in the case of a baby, lien even adulte find il a strain. CJildrens'a bedroorna sbould b. unhllu- ninated, .as ùrkneaa à very res.tful I\" '\" OI ,Oyung.eyee. 0o1d water ey-ebatbs s mv 814 JU lm a uW Se vesygood. WallP\u0026per Of 9a garing 6~nau nrn 10 CouTu ltîtera ahOuld bc avoided. W6E1 em s Every Organ Of Our body can cou- Ten a d -iog 20C. 43\u003c rowz83e ,Tiute ita quolta. b good healtir, if flot 33\u003c i 3\u003c ta do .. 33.4X ,%3j4n ireusy ond thi y oe a i. ns.45 cao.POStCrds,.ftados. ecius f hm..Monoyror Poeot Office O)rder toaocompany. romptest delivery guaranteed. N4MANTOA RAIL ýSTUDIO Exorcise 1l0012, 291]4 Portag@ AvM, WINUIP While the. eiderly man baz les. apc L' for smre forma aof exercise thaR the ___ \u003eunger adult, h. has no less need titan e other of lhe general and locai effee\u0026 f te exercise. WA A ' e Il la in lhe carieat period of mature ge t'hatthe ieost characteristie mani- qtations of defects of nutrition- g' md* o «n Nono@@ begitY, gout, and diabe-tes, in whlch BoH-o0Me 0 wk of exercise plays an importt parta I -6e produced; and the lreatmient of Tons aso uuuiyrcitaitirl.yU tho very depths. Our wo derfulIconstruct'on te demanlacimbpetion.ya trin p and *\"Reso\" Vibiuting Soundfnç Board. athe Piaced between a couvi on that exer- asfti C fofulnorto. se i eesry an, a fear Of the dan- Fowler, Piano company \"rO exercise, the mature man glit, u *refore, ho proceed witlî the strictest Cre dino n otg ethod in the application of thus power- C WrnerEmntonganteoa e ilmodifier of nutrition.inieg antb 't is impossible, however, to trace thodially a single rule for ail men h.mreage, for ail do flot offer the We rtn detur baemnif 1\" degme. of preservation . m i, i.Wes tn Hm onh",
         "re,1914. e~ Mai'oh, 1914. -. The Western Home Mosithi y fl I .gehoerai formula for the ib th.i1e * Ies and bones have Aj1, tboir po*er of reoistance, là o1' \u002bho heurt and vesi;èsbegin thei r.%~oté ,\u003eperform their me en ae1ybrave -ail a tbriug n muscular fatigutl, %oseiilt apprbach with great cèare proÏéJà ahortâase of breath. 14! hou\\p atu re's IPedliCne ~1y~iny ,aillc as afoqd for those ,~~n~g frniany formn of rheumitiBnm, fo dSsases of tire\"mervesa nd flervousi Iéttuce for tirose suffering from in- Wetr-ceBSjea remedv for seurvy. ASpOragu e ed to itiduce pers.pira- ~ C7rotefo ~uferer fomastirma. _,turnfipo' for nervous disorders and for Hoùey ile wholegome', etrýengthening, eleaÊsig, healing\u003eand nouriahing. Lemàons for.feverisir thirst in sicknees, f«r biliousness, low fevers, rheumatism, pou tg, cods, lhver conipiaint, etc. MI acizbrries as a tonic. -Toiatoes are a powerful aperient for thé liver, \u0026 eovereBign remedy for dys- pepieana indigestion. 'Tom stoem are rinalbinu ail conditiote of th% 'syetem ,l whieh the use of calomel'is indicated. Fige are aperient and whioew. ¶lley are mid to be valuable as food for tire msffeing froni cancer; tbey are used ex- ternally ase well as internally. Dssary and mon tned so th thir n may loubt b the who publacly ide instru. 50 -relieves Granulated Cataracts, cutting or Over o ne usand \"Ac. the Actina but is reli. but 8sainpis , rites: «'I a' ha. dont eight years The docter go withot six menths wcrk witl'. r seventeen 4 Idlewiiê rites: «U Jicn was so dle ont e ina' 1 ave s are gone, od as ever 2tir Street rding what n proud te osses ait ail one and I more than \u003ead. friends )w by the fect safcty for r bead. 7 n in every r and valu- Lctnia Ap- lainut S. MATS erovnie îj4 and aX\u0026don. pany. IO but the floor is a draughty place aidý the greatest precautjoxi shouid be taken.' For thia reason 1 prefer a pen. on legs, or a large packing-boxÉ whose \u0026ides keep off the draugirts. reeping àe very good «e- mrcse for babies, but let them ilearn to do so of their owvn accord; when they feel 'trong enough, they will niaie the attempt themselves. Some ba6iis cross tirir legs and hitcli along thre flour ini- stead-of creeping; this, is flot ao good an éercise as, the reglar ceeping way;. they should flot.be ellowed to keop their legp crossed for any length. of timeý ho- cause the boues ee oft and eas'lly bot out of shape, tire dild beeoniing bow-iegged before the motirer realizes it. Neither ehould the baby ho urged to stand or walk if he does not want to do so; let hini takeiis timie about it. A baby tenderor walker le excellent o0 use for a short time every day, but do not aliow Mue child to remin lu ià long onougir to get tired. ity; Chiiixm b -lrs:$Îcreeép «d u~one.- ever toucli of a cold -w-aie pi6aucihe~ shiv ng, w-hile tire patient ia over-. taken w-th sudden attacke. of sneezing. Tire cold may begin in. tire -iead, when, unless great pains are taken toe heck it, thre disorder w-i go to thie eheét;- or the infeotiocs may bégn wlth ire chest, uand paws tVu tir eira\u0026 At tins stage onelo t- tw-o tiings ecdums. In tire firet place, if care la taken to ward off increased infection tire cold w-i run ite normtal course of eght tOVwelve days, witirout turtirer injury; or 'n tire second, tire infection\u003e due'*to lôwered vitality, rumaina in tire eyetem and eo depreciates tire vital tone tiret pneumo- nia and other disease germas are able te, develop and produce acute cases'*of the\"e disordere tirt are responsible for such enormous dessti rates. Ib la a notable faet, top, tiret mcet colde eppear lu. winter, WWhn eavilized races are euh jeet t te Ie dpre88ing effectg of artificislireat Now irot is a mnt, pronounced vital deprussant. Under ité influence tirevessela of tire body surface are relaxed, tire huart'a action is enfeebled, tire nervous system is depreseed (particularly tire vaff- motor niervous systein), and- tire alanise covered with moisture. Tirus tire-vital powers of tire body are placod et a dis- advantago. If in tis condition oe e l expos§!d to cold, eipecially a cold draft, a. raOpid ûvapo ration of tire moiStureOon tire sur- faze of tire body rapidlY cols tire kin, and, suddenly cirçclking its action, causes a reteution 'of tire waste -natters whiich aré'commonly eliminated by. tire skin.. Àt thre same tirne tse balance cf tire.ircu- lation îq disturbed, lesseniug tire.apount of blood in the suin àana coetingti- iftterxnal.parts. - 1 A short application of cold V ie, kn on tire other hand, doue not produce a cold, for it is follo-wed by a reaction. It is tire prolonged slow chiriling of ties kin, induced by evaporation of inoisture f rom tire surface, whichi produoc tire distur- bano known as \"a cold.\" Thin s hie common cause of taking eold after a bath, a danger go cctnxronly recognized tiret many persona fear to take a bath in cold -weatirer because et ite possible after effecte. CURI3 VOUR CATARi *Taire t ln baud et once If 70t1 don't Set rid of Catrrh nov, in the early apring, there's certain peril ahead, 'for you'Il meet thé 'txiremel3i trying weatirer coming with your system t trribiy veakened and un4er- * tiie by thistreacherous, possoncus trouble. Rç pemiber-4f you keep- on neglectlbge Cgtbtrb, Jter .on stac ure to mean danger- dideaêe--perhaps* inctrabl iand deadiy dine.. It' e biby loatirsoe dimese-is Ca- tfatir.' It aiakeà ydiuant object -of diÉgust to l yo r.-frtéds-tlk h r-they're ùsually toc knd to tcon 'you sem le:a matter of .fact yoyr hawking sud spitting and constant nose- bfQWhgfll ae te ik hyturn avec auetd yyorfui eath. Su nhrtyutrmnoulfonly at boe~ s ihetlemw thtie 4roul understands aul about Catarrir sud listm% ai Otb-Spouq ».A. (Greduate hiu dIdhqt ,y nSug~nBritishiroEa eu \u003eave S#1 qj over. xe. ii give yen pLd -ADVICE, FREE t: en explain te yen luit boy ye *Ib 0dor Yeats he bam, studli 'citmaa cure cf Catarrir, To-diay ho fila it la unpamcaleled' yot vitir u$9, sud opeèn hemrtedneawof à s as get mass heov e ffem ,feu ts te ail vire need ode X thousanda from Catarrh alter aiu otirer caenta ir#d failed toe r\u0026tiew.Tle lilasaceptical and unseiWg, ho and iheir cures, bave beeu PIU Se, ,il send yenibhéj o Pe opl fu ie as in thit --W lng yeu a Cent l gadi give 7o Most aDRH Spdb.pEGIaW FREE! FRE!TO igh A.t. tli ow# other verdd, itis a lMul 1lid = botlia vo W exion a ROE a mer a OF 'ni pmt lu ots ts Impvng daytMie vho adm aOF U mi 0h.aisud yo 1k powder oSr panle, pad W Wite For free Tffll 051e Blush. pl RosesleAs o Sale by theo T. EATON CO. ITO.9 TORONTO and WINNIPEG \"v t- The Moral Factorln Health With few exceptions every bodily etust en be traced to preceding subjective state or f eelinga. An unceasing struam of.,vital energy, prooeeds friom the sphere of feelings te the spirere of bodily activi- ties through the trarnmitting coirdusits of the min\u0026i Disturbances ini thie stream ame registered in terme of patirological or linical features. Thus cthe distur- bance tirat maýfests in the hypor-acidity of thre gastric *uice bas its ultimate enigin in an M*edified motive. Hence while we readily grant te, ditetie errors tire power to f urnish, thse immnediate mor' ld conditions for a, dyspeptie stomecir, vo- are nevrthelesa obliged to, look for tire origin to tire personal tendency in th4 ciaractor of the mind\u0026 On thbe other irand the power of a eorected diet te xnodify tire 4uality and quantity of tire gastric secrutione is larey to ho f ound in thre influence of tire individual's moral nature tirrougir the sacrifices involved u. dietary retric- tione. Nor je it an 'uncommon exper- lence to a physican, that evon Vire most guarded ditary le powerless te sustaini a cure as long au, the patient continues to. sour hie gastrite secretions by con- tinuing te aidulate is féeeilnge. Por- haps some day medical soience shsil at- tain tire power te demonstrate the changes of vito-psychic chemistry et 'Work between tire moral acid cf an uneiariteible suspicions feeling and ire ;Stïbsequent irritation of the secretoi'y glands involved in tire hydrodhlorid pro- duction. of 'tire gastriceohemistry. 'Tire ancient philosopher wa.s right:\"A snlle mmd for a sane body.\" The Paby Do net forget the, it te natural and rigirt for a bah y te exercise; by exorcise hli- rauscles will develop and grow liard and finm inatead of fi-abby. When ire is only a f ew Weeks old ie may be allolwed te lié in thre centre oft-a large bed with. iis lotiing drawn up o as noVt, tiram- per iis free movements, and kick te iis. Iiirats. content. In winter tire legs shoffld bc coy ered by1 woolenu -tockings,. butt in umm tire litie cotten stockings. or bootèes a ay-ibe removed, whlle tire l)aly is enjoyine this exercise. If a piece of wrapping paper or newspaper s given tire baby te ki, k at ho will often ire amused and' good-natured for a long t i ne. When ire jq old enough to, rol off a bed ho xna-ç h placed on a, thick comforter or irair znaottress on the floor, no? Doethe Mocus dc aoyu ioifo l AD D R E ............ e yen te tructOn ci. a tire ation. may nu, h",
         "fr,~ The Western Home Mon thly i Winnipeg, Marci, 1914. SUPEJRFLUOUS'HAïRý' Moles, Warta and Smafl Birthrnarks are succeeefuily. andepermanentiy removed by Eectrolysis. This ie the onl afe and sure cure for these' blemishe. hck, heavy evebrows ma so be beautifuliy shaped and arched by thie method. 'fere are severa Ipoor methoda 4of performmng this work, butin the hands of an expert. iti may bie done with very littie pain, leavmng noscar. I have made thiework one of myspecialties, and with fifteen years' experience, the very best mnethod in use 'and a determination to make my work a success, 1 can guarantee satisfaction. Write for bookiet and f urther particulars Mus.E. COATES COL EMAN 224 smiTrH srTREET, WINNIPEG PhSne Main 996 SUPERFLUO.U.S -HAIR, Moles and Warts and acne treated. ments. Soft water m ra Cmeh successfully removed. Eczema Facial treatments. Scalp treat- ShaMPOOing Manicuring. sultu 5 cedit Fonoitbe- mUa«., RebàImm. SI bmmk G OUDR~ON ~ Mathieu'SsSyrup _tu I) am only Stops a cough but cures i'Supc a it. Iti tonic and restorative GOD Lm properties enable the uystem to I~-- perxnanently throw off a COIld. 4N2 35c for large borde. SoId everywhere. a. IL. UAIRES CG. Pemol. iSiuiloom ''1 't- I. 4 s t i 1, j' i ~ .1 J Il t, ýCorrespondence IWus Trobled. E ciraWith will bc made to publish ail in- IE amnounit of correspondence which je sent B a k us lias, hitherto, nmade it impossible for Weak back is caused by ekkdcs ever leter o apearlu rint an, ~ and it is hard for a woman tu~ look after future, lettem received frorn subscrib- lier household duties when she is suifer- ers wilI receive first consideration. A ing from a weak and aching back, for friend of the magazine, ofering a kind- n oa a esrn n elwe ly criticisin, writes that the Correspond- the kidneys. are -out of order. ence coiumn hias at times an air of Doan's Kidney Pulls go right to thxe monotony, as one wrifer after another seat of the trouble, cure the weak, acbing follows the same phraseology. We wish back,, and prevent any and ail of the to warn our correspondents against this serions kidney troubles which are hiable common error. A littie independent to become deep rooted into the system tlîought will help inutual deveiopment, if flot attended to at once. and readers of the Montbly wiil find Mrs. Augustus Jinks, Demorestville, *valuabie aid in the study of the inany Ont., writes :-««For severial years 1 instructive articles by eminent men that had been troubled with weak back appear from month to month. and kidneys. I had terrible dizzy heÉLdaches, and could flot sleep at night. A Word of Warming A friend of mine asked me to try Doan's Kidney Pills, and I dia so, and in a short W innipeg, Jan., 1914. time was cured.\" Dear Editor-If tlis letter is consigned Doan's Kidney PiUs are Soc. per box, to the waste paper basket I will flot be 3 boxes for $1.25, at ail dealers, or at ail surprised, although I trust you mnaiied direct on receipt of price by The wil fidaitte pac foit 'Iar no a T. Milburn Co., Limitèd, Toronto, Ont. qubsériber to your v: luable paper, but If ordermng dirh pcf Da'. buy it every month and enjoy reading it imnmensely. '.'The Young Woman and Her ProbleM\" appeals to me, very mnuch, and he *I amn sure al[young women who read it caniiot help', but, bc inspired by the Original beautff'i l ouglit and advice given. - Iis month'sý page I titink is exception- *allyý helpful and interesting. Highland and Jû's word of waruing is very fine, too. If girls only' .realized how perfectly O l ridiculous they, look with painted faces, rouged lipsand pencilled eyebrows 1 feel sure they' would never indulge ini such e un nonsense. They attract a certain class of young manl for a while, but when the- time cornes for him to choose a wife, hie In\u0026mo st cases looks out for the home girl. Girls; it is up to us to raise the standard of womianhood. Men do want good DW R wornen; they do not care a rap for those dresàed-up creatures '.ho think xof noth- O in g hut theatres, muusic halls, dances, M~~. miain ètc., and do not knov'- the first thing Ilain about domestic duties. Oh how tired sold tisey must\"feel when the end of the week hias corne. No wonder they stay on the in bed ail day on Sunday, and get fussed up in time to go out in the evening wbenNier1f ail the beautif ul sunsbinehbas gone. 1Ilike 025t.f to drese nicely myseif, but strictly adhere o to neatness. I also like to see a good LI play once in a while, but certainy can TouC. MIcNARD S find something better to do thart fly around here, there and everywhere every IIMN nght in the week. There are letters to ______________________ write, fancy work to do, reading, etc. Ia the summer I think there is nothing nicer than a good walk and chat. AI- though a city girl, I simply love the country. In the winter a walk is nice. SYNOPSIS 0F DOMINON IAffl then there is tobogganing and skating. REG\u003cJLATIONS AIfter being conflned in an office ail day Any ptrson who s the sole head of a famaily or think it is necessarv for soine health- anymaleover 18 \u003eeasoldmyhomtad a 1-quartersction of availab le Dominion land i fui exercise, and a girl eau get ail tliat Manitoba, Saskatchewan or Alberta. The appli- is needed, and still have tirne for a few caln ust appear in peron lit tte Dominion Lands evenings at home. Then about flirtig.Agency or Sub-Agency for the district. Entry by ing.proxv may be made et any agency, on certain con-. I think it is a great mlistake for girls to - ïHi, ather, mother, son, daughter. brother allw cresesfron nen iîy do îîot in- oraitro i ntending homesteader. tend to marry. VWhat do tiîey thiîk of Duties--Six nionths,'eiec pnadclia lir ftrwrd? Whv, tiîey laurht up t'on o f tEe 1Ia rda each o 1 three ycsrs. A home thei sieves an disusslieraeadegr tuay 1i e within nune miles o f is bonestead thei sleves an dièusshýraiiýoii,-- onfarm ofatLeast 80 acres solely Cwned-and thteir friends. Every girl likes to be ad- occupied by hirn or by hlm father, mother. son. mired; it is in her nature, but let us daughiter, broter or sjster. live £0 that wve shall be wortiîv of ad. . Incertain districts ahomeseaderin gostand - luiration. No doubt the readers w iï 'g may Pie-einpta quarter-section alongaie hie tlîink this is anotiier goody-gov ro hury,tead. Price q.3.0 ict acre. Duties-.Nlu\" . -godv oroldresiie upon the honmestead or pre-empticn six .jnaid, but no, I arn neitiier. 1J uni a bit months i i each o f si x years fromn date of h crre- over twenty-three and like to kick stead.elir3 (including the time required to niv heels seano hoestead Patent) and cultivate fity acres m hessoiretimes, but ivlieu it coules extra. to the marriage quiest ion, the illost A homesteader who has exhausted bis homestead sacred and beautiful thing in the world, rigl ta d cannt obtain a pre-emption mayenter for to bc srions.a kurchased 1Lomcsîead in certain districts. Prce I tinkiL.is eto e srios.Girls, 13.00 per acre. Duties-M.Nust reside six nonths in thit o a be in hurv. Pry eretveech of thre caers, cultivate fifty acres and crect tlîat1 GoiMI ud ou, and if a ouse wortb $300-00. perfect love is in tuehoe te a- W. W. CORY ageer canneer bina il re. \\ihigDePutY of the IMinister of tLe unterior, ail eve y s ccc ii tIi~ ew T rci. ~.f- Unauorized publication of this advettis.. Trxie. 1 ment wiII Oct be paid for. Light BreadFRE afneueaCmC Rie1lale. Tg lYER..BOYAR1914. -r O Per diorI1 s.11 n la reader a send \u003e,,.r lame and addr.,ssen~d YOD oîulv% of late a« 'arib fIalA japer, butf- o i.lin\u0026gaTWmblc:fre. W'hensoid lot ofgood llu Ilt1 lire itand isth I.0ad h amr n eGLOBE Co., Dcpt.g%,GreerwiIIO. Pb",
         "'f VA 4. ,çinnipeg, MaTch, 1914. DROVE HlM MAD . TO \"Fruit--tn idncys, k after suifer- ýk, for 1 when to thse aching of the liable system stville, ýarsI1 back dizzy night. Doans Lshort r box, r, or y The iOnt ly uaine vlgortlng 14,laa8pa n ding and lu- promptly. Griid a N1CSrl. lirs. IL M. Romler, IL a 1o.*ger, Ea., 1ud enlamied veine that Onall broke causiu esldorablo leuoBaoblood. iJned BSORIMN. JR. and ireporte4 Nov. a. 1910 velne entirci! bcaled. swelflng anàdidscoioratlofl gne ana bua lia Do trouble with thom \u0026Ince .lssY \"~0 ABSOgIMIN,JR.Is invaluableas a geflral Douse- balliniment for tbe enta and brulses that thse chil- dren get, croup. deop.scatod colds, stiff-neet. sore- thsrat.. iltomoves fatty bouches. goitre, enlarged glns ens, clsts. weepinsal10ws, te. SlOO ar\u003ci Ris qa\"hdA433D.S.DIN.E md Me»n tacturid enfr by W. F. Yemmg P.D.F, 138 Lm ..ulhaM.SJQ kil iNiLOSSES VIREL? PREVBITE MII EMIE Cutte Blaoklog Plilla. Low- mu mmm prIcec. alwas frasil and reliable. theY uuu.muumare used by over 80 par cent of Cal- SU C[ VeI irnisanmdWetr tce. cae they pretest wlare ther vaseluol la. L E Writefor booket ad'atfolaa 10-doms pkgo Biakise Pillea..1.00 50-dose pkqe. Blaaklyi Pillea... 4.00 Cuttr% B81\"08 Pil Caf.1.50 but Cuteinsuaalmiat strongas and maaoun Use. rea exchange for frasil atar date on package. Do ther) as it affords jasa protection than frasi. %d Disouns- 50dose. 10 p.ci.: 500 doses. 20 .ct IisonCuttar's. If dns st doa't stocr. order rom L.bratrY.givngaddrass piainly. W. arpay eharlU end ship promptly. Send prsonaicbckor hi. 0. YHE GTTERLABORATORY. BRKELEY, CA\u0026. W. Have It. Write u % an -1mention your wants. JNV[RS\u0026L spiUaLTrY W Box 2704. Montreml. BAD LEGS, VARICOSE VEINS, ETC. 3f'Promptly reieved with inexpensive home t *trent. It absoluteiy removel the pain Sý- ingtjredness and disease. Fui particulars Cýreýeeptofstamps. W. F.Young, P.D.F.138 Il nans Building, Montremi, Can - helps te pass away many a loneiy hour. 1 take a great deal of pleasure in read- ing the rorrespondence column, and hope you will find space in it for wbat littje 1 have to say. 1 bave been in Canada four years and think it one of the finest couit ries' in tbe worid. I 1bhae great conlidncgin the future of this country, and we @an look forward st fno distan t dIate to'sec it one of the leading nations of the worid. I was bora under the Stars and Stripes, and, as well- as I love them, I do not hositate- to say that, Can- ada offers -more and better opportuflities tîsan can be found anywhere in the States for tbe young and willing people who are not afraid of work. 1, like a great many others, bave taken up. land here la Alherta and arn improving it as fast as possible. It was pretty dreary work at first, neigbbors scarce, and ixty miles to thse railroad; but ail is changed now. The C.N.R. runs only live miles fromn my farin and we.are bieaBed with a thriving young town witb all its ad- vantages. *Now, what 1 would- like to say, Mr. Editor, is I don't understand why the girls don't try to grab up some of* these fine bachelor farmers around bere as I know nearly ail of them are fine feliows-including myseif. I arn sure if one of them could have -seen me the first term I put in on ny- land they Burns Baya: \"0O h.ýppy1Mved- Whes love like this isf found! O hepxrt-felt raptures! bliss beyond com- pare! I've paced much [bis. eary, mortal .ndround,., Adsage experience bids me thus de- , lare - - ý If Heaven, a draught of heavenly plca-, Oe sure spare, Oec'c;rdial in this melancholy vale, gins plni es jiq jo 1'%î,, pun ,Iladd,, 'Tis when a youtbfu, loving, modest ' pair In otber's arma breathe out the tender tale, Beneabli the milk-wbite thorn that acents the ev'ning gale.\" Longfello*s ays: \"Oh, there is nothixag holier-mi this life.of ours, ' tban the firat conselounsaof,'love.\" \"cNover, marry -but for love! but ae [bat thott loveat what is lovely.\" \"She muast-' lie [bat, which she to be would seem! For ail true lovre is grounded in eateem.\" igPuzned\" B9 aya: 'Re bas traveiled quaitg%, a lot for bis years, and at bouses that ho-w w9rked 4at he has watehed to see* INune No. 2 G.T.P. sure couid not have but pitiéd me, fori instance, I atarted to make \"llight bread\". Yes, that was what it was auppoaed to be. 1 set the yeast at noon and bad1 warm bread for supper. I puýt aoda in1 the yeast aponge to make it rise better, and it made it brown or rather a kind of a blue color instead. Didn't grease the pans and couldn't get the stuf out, so just tore it out in chunks, and tihe dog got most of it that nighit. Poor dog! lie howled ail nTglît. 1 dotored him the best I knew, but he passcd away about noon next day. but 1 aurvived the sbock, s0 you sec we bomesteaders ail bave troubles of our own. Tbanking you, Mr. Editor, for the space 1 have taken, and hoping somne of the readers wil take pity on me and write. I 'will sign myself Ben Hur. One of [he Married Oies Jan. 24th, 1914. Dear Editor-Thia is my firat letter to The Western Home 'Monthiy. It was af- ter reading the letter from \"Puzzled\" in tihe January issue that I decided to write. He wanted married people to answer, to criticize, te use bis own words, \"to tear it to pieces' \" and puhiish tiseir answers. He say'r: \"la tisere, or is tîsere not, such a [bing as love?\" Well, rny first a:m wiil be to convince him tliat there is. If he turns to Genesis, 29tb. chapter,' l8tb verse, he will find it recorded: \"And Jacob loved Raclisc; and. said, I will serve tliee seven years for Rachel, thy younger daughter.\" Solomon says: \"Love is strong as death, many waters cannot quench love, neitlier can tihe floods drown it.\" St. Paul says, 'l.ove is tIse fulfilling of tihe law.\" Kirk ',Vlste says: 'Why should 1 blush to owNv T love? 'lis love that rules thté realtus above.\" if love reigned. Oniy once ia a while was ho aatisfied witb the resuit of his atching1\" Well, my experienCe bas been quite the opposite. I have often thought- when .minglinýg,, with married cugles th3attheéy coulId not have been betèr sýited;' it just seeined they bail been made ,for each other. The eariy married years of any couple, especially if there lie a family,are often strenuous years.- They both have te put their shoulder to thé whecl; but that only banda them doser. And the little ciuil- dren, they, truly, are the flowcrs along iif e's pathway, they soften and purify tIhe heart, [bey enrich the soul, [bey brighten the home and deepen love, they are their mother's joy. What father bas uot felt \"Ris cares are eased with intervals of \"\u003c'lis! Iflittie cildren climbing for a kiss.\" \"PuZzled\"' mentions a case where there is a growsl-up daughter old enough [o marry. . Young men corne to thc bouse. Nothing Wrohg in that. But it is wrong of the mother to talk of moruey and kili tihe germs_ýof love. in her daughter. True love is oftpner'found ia the cottage tisa the mansion. \"It ia not- in -the mountains, Nor the pdlaces of pride, That love *W9H;-.fold bis wings up And rejoicingly abide. But in meek and -humble natures lis home is ever found, As tihe lark that sing3 in Ifi-aven Builds its nst upon tIse ground.\" A littie parental advice is sometimes al right [o give Our boys and girls, but, st the same time, I do flot approve of inter-. fering with their choee; it la often best to ]et thern, as it were, weave their owg~j ý CP4,t\u0026A\u0026 w\u0026 Wlthoi2t lme «nl or I p odg f N \"aY one cmiap ur the ieor ors\" n aones Ho= Vo.iublNew Bgras\" mS Uv- e cib C,1b 0u: t Pl àa note 1I» bg h mamd o PUI in m jwth omde * Muwud\"Ikiai' ImptaSible, 7M B\"l? Lot us prove it st our expens. e.W inlteach jon te Pl\" the piano or organ and vinl not ask one cent untilY051 aa irIny. : A musi;af -'gclu' tram Chicago ham ,nventcd a *onderftÏui aYstem wherebY Sny- one cm jearn to play tho ]Piano or Organ in one h ur. Witli this new method you douat bave to know one note troui anothe' \"et in an bout of practieYou cga lie iplaying youx favorite music wlth aiE the fingers of both bands and playlng it weIL, The Invention la su0 simple that even a ehili ocan nowP master munie wlthout coatiY instruction. Anyone a have 1h18 new inethod on, afréeetrial merel! by aakinig. Simply Write Baying, *Bemkd me theEa »-Sw Muik llethod an annaa04la Thfe Western hiome liontnly FREE TRIAL The compiete systemn together with 100 pieces of music will then be sent to you Free, aIl charges prepaid and absoluteiy flot one cent to pay. You keep it seven day. ta thoroughly prove it ils allbtat is lie ê it, then i f you are aatisfied, aend us $1.50-aUs one dollar a month until $6.50.in aUilsla iaid. If you are flot delighted with it send it 'back' in seven days and you will have risked nothiag and will be under no obligations to us. Be sure to state number of white keys on your pino or organ, aso post office. Ad- dress'Easy Meti'od Music Company, 2S6 Wilson Mlg., Toronto, Canada. Limh: To show our artificial imbs 10 the experienced wearer i s t o make a sale. ' Th\"~ are neat, strong. light, and practical. We orna fit you out at short no- tice with t hle best that money can buy. Wiriteforfurther aformation,aiso state what kind of amputation you have. J.B.ARSON 357 Notre Dame WINNIPE6 MAN. The Western Home Mon thly J. A. CORRIVEAU DsrÂL~ 0r1.,June 15th. 1913 \"ti am a general storekeeper at the above addreàs, and on account of the great good Ibave expexlefCed f rom using \"Fruit.a-tiveS\", I recomnMend them uongly to my customers. -IThey wee ~great boon to me, I can tell you, for about two years ago,% I was laid up ili bed with vomiting and a terriflc pain at the base of My skull. The pain nearlv drove me mn'!. Doctors feared it would turn to inflammiration of the brain but I took \"1?rit-a-tives\" steadily until 1 was cured. I have g'tined fifteen pounds since taking IlFruit-a-tives I and I verily believe they saved me from a disastrous ilness.\"1 J. A. CORRIVEAUI. for Bea*laches, Neuralgia, Rheumna- tism and other diseases arissng fromn an imuecondition of. the blond, \"Fruiit- a.ie\"is invaluable and infallible. 50C. a bhox, 6 for $2.50, trial size, 25c. At ail deaiers or sent on receipt of pic by Fruit-a-tives imiteda ottawa. pc fARE [ions INT i or tfad a ,nd in appi- Lands try by n con-. rother tir- home ested d-and . Bon. §tend - de hie INIu s t ýn aux hctre- Jd to acres Dsted ter f or Preat MIL rý 0 amera ft. plates, sed yOU, 2papers f.he sold vill, Pb. ;-4 -",
         "The Wegtora Home monthly Winhiipeg, Marcb, 1914, I\u003critt 5 k L-?16 Dos Wma aE4g a tre *\"the tasta 0f Moud phmita. somisoldsrlg is oaslly doue with the Paste flux that Simliies Solerinq Ani[Ed JUf vWbklatie .Pluxite the. solder grip e ~ ' geovS on, dlrty metals. BOTEM AutMrs d mechanicu use it in aul pat*of itoswotld. YOU want smre. OiIrm.q.s .dStoe iu laMIlfflge to Vý Fe XT\"SOLDEUMQ 517 oétwa aqoa sala*eSolderins iron, a PofI\u0026t 13o-IaMP, Fluxîte. Solder, e., and a papi S n'oldering Wrk.\" SSobSet Postpid Dbuct *1.32 AuIog\"«r* Go., 268 Vliema Road CANCER diacoveer of Evan'Cao al Who ualei with Caacr ta write ta him. The cures ezternai or internai R. D. Evans musicALT YOUR ROMEFR By. De Oldt end Most Rollable Schooi of Mageo ln Luorlea-Estabîîshd 1895 W*yeklliutetions aezeverrthing plain. Onelpn eaot2oer ay to cover-0oet of poâte and inuajo uaed. Write Or FIE bookiet wMsli ozlaineeverythingi nf uli, webb of 1f.. Hope that uPUzhedn wWin »1\u00264e ï, hapy cWeand -that ho. will s oonb.sinegg «Time doth softly, sweetly Ue when tbee's love athm\" I wil saigu myseif \"Jeminia\" 'a Saak. Req.dr). Gla toGetBa\u0026k 1Â,beta., De., 913 Dear Editor-.I bave read your paper since I was a littie girl of n, and bave always enjoyed it, -but itilias only been in the hast feu' years that I bave.,b.- corneiterested in the correspondence page. I thinkit a nplèndid idea te give people a better knowledge of bow other people (especially bachelors) ]ive. .I have livcd in this country for twelve years and tliink tliere isno place like. it. Th last two years 1 bave been in Wâsh- ington State, but was glad to corne back to Canada again. 0f course, I find it colder than in Washington- and more lonehy, but 1 hope soon ta overcome bath. I find in reading the letters that nearly aIl the correspopdents say they can dance. I cannat dance, but would very rnucb fse te learn bau'. I can play-carris and -arn very fond of skating. I think every girl sliould knou' hou' tesate; it equal it. I arn a baaelall player in 'the sw;nuer. I would sooner play ba8eball than cat my supper, espeoiaiy if I had tà cook it myseif. It seema that every baclielor that write. wants smre of the girls to correspond with tbem, and I' want the smre. My address is wioi the editor, aud j wifl sign myseif Happy Willhie. View aiae the Same Parkhll, Ont., Dec., 1913. Deari Editor-Aithougli an Eastern girl Iamn very much interested in the West as 1 bave rnany friends living in the parie Provinces and in British Colum- bi.Thcy frequently send me copies of The Western Home Monthly and I cnjoy-reading tliem very much. The de- scriptions of Western 111e are vcry in- teresting to one who knows nothing of farrnhife Bave in Ontario. 1 have had a number of impressions of homestead life correctcd through. your correspondence column. I would ike to correspond with \u003c'Pippen» and \"Bachelor Bill\" as 1 arn sure frarn their letters in the August number that their views on many lies resemble mY own. The editor bas my addreass andj I arn, yours truly, Maple Bud. - SoeitbBay~NewOateri is suen nealtny amusement. In summer' A Camp Cook I spend my spare time ini borseback rid- ing, of whiich I arn very. fond. Nearly Ont., Dec., 1913. ail girls abject ta men smoking. I do Dear Editor-Here goes for my first not, because I believe if a man ean find etter ta Tih. Western Home Monthly, pheasure in smoking, a woman sbould not whieh I find great pleasure in reading. I rab hirn of that. I quite agree with \"Sea have been iu Ontario for the rnast of my Pea Are\" that a busband appreciates the life, and have had very little experience few things a wife éau do for -hirn eut- in the Western provinces-that is wcst side, and I tbink it is the duty of a wife of Manitoba. In reading the letters 1 ta lielp lier liusGand as mnuch as she eau, fin~d a number from Ionely bachelors. both in the liouse and outside. I think Well, 1 would like ta encourage themn on everyone will agree with \"Scotch Blue- in the work they have undertaken ta' bell\" when she says \"make the home ta- open Up the great Western country. I gethier.\" I think when bath work was raised an a -farm and I think it no *together tbey feel tbey have equal in- disgrace te ha called a hay-seed, for the terest iu the home, and that bath bav-e farmers are the men who are the back- a made the home. Iu the June issue some- banc of aur great Canada. Now, boys, 1 ane introdueed the tapie: \"la the theatre know there are sarne difficulties on the a harm ta the cammunity?\" -Tthink this hamestead, and one thing is the cooking. is a very good tapie for discussion, as 1 1 amn a camp caok, and 1 arn caoking foi- rwas once in a debating saciety, and *e ane bundred and fifteen men now, and r agreed that the theatre «%as a decided have been at it for a number of years. harinita the comnîunity. If you print As I have not killed anyone yet it will this 1 hope that many wiIh write ta 'me be a pleasure ta me to help those 1 eau. as 1 arn au onIy child and very louely. I eau give you ail kinds of plain recipes Yau will find my address with the for cookinýg bread, cakes, puddings, 1editar and I1'will aigu myself biscuits, or anything yau ivish for with- Prairie Sunshine. ont eggs or milk. 1 suppose saine of the readers know whiat the lumber camps are like. I îvould like to give you sorne Just a Time Kiuer recipes here,,but 1 don't like to ask the Sasktchean, ecemer, 913 editor for sa mucli space in bis valuable Veaskdo-chanv ee er, 1913.f 'coîumns. I would ilzie ta tel you how Ifler Eito-I ave eena rade aito cook camîp beans aud pork, and if -%ou yaur magazine for a nuniher of years, will drap me a flue I1ivili gladly do'so. but just a new subseriber. Lt is cer- If3oping 1 will be able to lielp s;01eone. tainly an interesting paper for yaunig or Mjy ad(rs is with the editor. aId. I arn a young Canadian hoinçsteader s Camp Cook. used ta living close ta the city, and it seemis very lonesome sametirnes. 1 arnhud eLckdu tiot far froini tawn, but a fellow mnigitSoudeLckdp just as well stay at borne and read as go Killarnev, M-%an., Januari-, 1914. 'fo one af these new tows-you will sec Dear Editor _Lai- 01e tvilo lias- neyer just as much. For iinter sport 1 enjoy before wrîtten to these colutnus 'have a dancing, skating and card playing, alnd littie space to state her op)inions? We think there 15 1no harm in any aof them blav-e taken The Western fHoine Monthhl- naless yau, or'sameone else. wants to1 for years. but it is anîv latel '-y\"-e have make harm; but take a littieecotiitr.-%, takeýn anv lntere.st in tilic nîtyîeroîs let -dance and there ia no spart that cati ters printed every xnonth,. Sonle letters co ughed- Ahmost Ail Nighl With That Dry Tièk.. IIng sensation ln' teThmoat, A bad couagh, accornpanied by dtla distrmssmg, tickling sensation inth tbroat is rnost aggravating. Dr. Woods Norway Pin. Syrup heais the mucous surfaces. reieves oppression and tightness of the cbest, rernoves accurnulated iriucous or phlegrn, quites even the rnost obstinate and distresoing coughs, securing sleep- and rest at night, flot only ta the sufferer, but ta othea wbose rest would otherwise be broken Mrs. Duel -Marshall, Basswood Uidge, N.B., writes-\"'Just a. feu' uncs to lêt you know what Dt. Woad's Norwv~ Pine Syrup did for ie. I took a géleme cold, coughed alniast ail night. _4 that dry, tickling sensation in rny throat The first bottie did me so rnuck-.\u0026d, Ithought'I would try a.second oneotihýà ~.mpheased ta say resulted ini a comnple 5ýCure. 1 can -strongly recomrnend,. t any one sufferlng frorn a cough oraamy throat irritation.\" The price of Dr. Wood's -Nôr*U Pine Syrup is 2,5c. a battie;, thet at. family size, 50c. Itr is put up in a- yeiloiw' wrinp three pine trees the trade umTi.4) manufacturéd only by Thç , 'È' 1~ Ca.. Limited. Toronto. Ot àAn riff v Bdor. sna Ait., Usine. Restores Grey Hafr to origitaI color. Two mugt u1e from msme bottie. hafr of one becomes black. the other blond or other color as they were lie YOuth. Stops FaJiing Raîr. Dandruff, Itching. Cures ail Scalp Diseases, Produces New Growth. Satisfaction guaranteed or money back. PriS 75 coula or tas for O..Dollar (potas Ii. Not sold in stores. address Canadian liaIr Restent Co., WIMUno.. oNi- Do You Leve lFLOWERS-i If so. see my dainty 1914 eatalog. A posteard request wiil brlng IL Andff You send the addresme of two other flower grwers who mlght b. interested. 1 wAtt Include a Coupon Good For 10c fi n flower seeds on y ur irt lsc order. OodSeeS Reasonable Pices. Prompt Servic\u0026 mis i»ma V. Wiut., SeSdsman. 3037 Al drvtc làA ve nu S o.. Minneapolls. Min. TUE 1DRINK lHABIT GAN DE CURED Those wlio are sincorely desirous of curing thcemscli es or to have friends cured should comimunjcate with heKeeley Institute Corner Hugo and Jessie WINNIPEG, Man. ro hafim. 1» -. w f L:~ ki 'VýPe9, March, 1914. BRANDON MAN",
         "Tch, 194\u0026 ied-. Nigh. 'on IR led by uta ion lu the SYrup has 3 eppressien st, remeves legm, quites 1 distresaing est at night Lit te othea ýe broken. wood Uldge, fincs to lêt d'e Norwv~ n)ok a \u0026teme night -I4 iMy thrôït d one, wh4chh ia acouq*$e mmnendUt ,Two mlh =cmes black. they wese le ruf, Itchlng. 'w Growth. k. sou1. on.,- ,nuit And if c othr flower 1 wiInclude a ic order. ompt Service naman ED us of iends ith Mte t tmi mir . =Ca. nu le.= R ~.ui~~gMarch, 1914. W 1puîbead-a person c tenjoy ~Igthern;,others, in my opinion, are but sensible. I have ouly seen oce Iciier from bere before, and whén I mathe lttér from «Louely\" iu the nImyiumber I muet nay it mnade me ~Mddycurions. - Now, 1 thought I j~walthé young,4armers itounil here. am 8farm's daughter uxyself, al-~ I am living lu town at prèsnt. ofe one who muet be'almost on ugl \u003cily playiiig a violià instead cfaharp I feit that at leant theré *as not thé I o not beliéve iu homénhavhe vote. Théir placé la ,hOiMelook1ng afiez' the houte, and I .tbiuk if they do that the way A should bedone ibére will not b. any time spént la.worrying as te whéther they 'will 'ét the 'vote or net. Militant suffragties hould hé loéked up and fed on bread \u0026s'd water until théy corne te their right- sesei-if they have any. I was greatly Interested in the lettér by \"Puzzled.\" In soe thin1s e may be right, but in ma IMink, hé is wrong. I do not tht:an couple evér get marred with- out a pretty good ides of wlîst each ether le like. .Anyway, I amn quit. sure that if I waa keeping company with a young mai I would try bis patience - iough te kuow whether h6 was a sant The western Home, monthly liquor; a D'an of refinement and wbo la Dot \u0026£fraid to offer a band to raine the fallen, and ha\u0026 a cheery word for every- one. We do not think it neceasary for anYone to bc a church member aud take much intereat in the work; we think there -should. bc more. Endeavor and Young Ptople's Sbocietied for the, youang people to attend iuitêad of the dauce' hakT foi sÔme people are more eaaily in- fluenced than others. We should try. and bc\u003e happy and look on the 1bright aide al- ways. We will leave ouriaddreas wW the editor, and if anyone .wishes to cor- respond with us we will answee al let- ters sand carda with pleasure., Kate and Duplicate. To Set Rld of a Double ChIn By Maria 8Sti Coneer One of thé mou eobjectionablé featurea la the double chun. Thie eau be reme- died lu one meuth by the followlng exer- cie: Firet soap the under prt of the chia with pure soap, aid pen ty 'of it. Thén throw thé héad back tili the face looks uto thé oiling. Théii préas frmly th imder chiniwih the thuinb ntSancele»Ad DmnIda»o or a asin er aud what kind of a tempér wblle ai same tinté maké thé lower Chuut he ha\u0026. Really I think hé must hé a move back and forth agats the minister; ho can give such an excellent thumbe. ht will také somne priétice »but lecture. Now, msybé some of you who 1 jrou wil nsoon mid the way t ecausé the read this ltter-if i is evér printd- movèmept of thé fat. part cf the chia. weuld like to know whsi sort of as-per- This wifl trengthen ail thé Musacles, a.i son is writing it. Wcll, te bégin -with, I the same tintéfit will eliminate the fatty amn. a, \"Goed Mthodist,\" but not oue of cella. -The map aida lu thieby ciating the saints at ail. To live Up te thé re- the fat .from théekn putation of Methodiste I would lift The exercise eau be endixed and evén MY han ds in holy terrer if card, playing éujoed if yeu have a graphophene and or dancing is mentiouéd. Now, 1 hope take theé exércise by thée . i1 set ne oue takes me for a cranky old inaid, my graphophonéeout inu-thé rear gardén rfer I assure you I amrnont. Will be very sud talc. my physical culture euti thé -Pléased te hear £rom any eue who carés open air., Beaides thé exércisés I had te write, sud will îry te auswer al lu thé collége classes I havé diaçoyeré'd favors. Topsy. many uew ones. Wherever thére Je ex- - ceas fat juet keep on Uin you find a me- A Great Country tien thai '*will cause a movément cf ihai \u003cJariais, Ata. Jan, 114. fat, ihen work. Carsair, Ata.,Jan, 114. Theré are soeé city mcnansd women- Dear Editor-To-dey starta un with te-day who neyer kuew thé déhight of the New Year, which wé hope will bring baréfoot days. They neyer veutured happinessa sud prosperity te yourself forth lu thé morniug, te fe! thé déwy aud readers. Wé are subscribers cf your coiéao h otpn. Te ee valuable paper, although we havé neyer ckone fth suprltve joy cf dea nçud writteu beforé te 1he Western Home oong th upeltveé déofghted tes.Th Monthly. We lived iu thé city until neyýer éxperiénced the satisfaction cf lass spring when we nioved te the coun- gaining thé harduess of hoof réquiréd try, which we dearly lové, as Wé are two or ruuflJng over gravél patha or stubhle hsppy «\"old maids\" liking quietness. We fieé1lde. And 110w they . re probably are fond cf outdoor sports and love rid- uourishig every coucivable variety cf ing and driving immensély. Wé havé a bunion and twistéd.tee. piano and twe violins which afford much Técutycidhsagéi.e~ éljoyment. We havé ouly ivéd iu Can- Tadvcntry évébaswa over tpcaldf ada onei yrear i tk uc nérs nthé city. - But the wise inother, who thé api prgres -hat Canada is mak- takea littie Charles sud littie Gracié ou iug in becoming a nation cf gréai ciés, an cutiug, ne matter hcw brief it may and we think thé farmérs should hé be, indicatés at thé outsei théunudeair- grateful for the opprtunitiés it cférs abflity of foctwéar. The childréu with thern. As thé topic cf an ideal per- théir instinct for gettiug near te nature sOIn is now beiug discusséd and « Western' will do thé resi. Sun\"- wishes a -picture of an idéal man, We will give thé description which ap. Pels te us. We do net think bis age or the color cf lis hair (although we pré- fer dark hair) has anythiug te do with the person. A tail, wll-buill maly man 'With dark hair, a good charscer, ambi- tious, free from thé use of tobseco and An Ofl Without AlcohoL-Some cils and inany niedicines have alcehol as a prominent ingredient. A judicicyns mingling of six essentiai cils compose the fanious Dr. Thomas' Eclecrdc Oil, and there is ne alcohol in it, sthat its effects are Iasting. There is ne medicinal oil compounded that can equal this cil in its preventive and heaing power. Or. PIercs, helps weak stomaha te strog, heathyactio-1 hoete .dgs he M oidthatmkehego. n,redblood wbieh nourinhes boenir bd M voeU e medy. te a p«t« ut. the lvivntoaetlvty-oibstbemahi et ibe huma. sysUssino Qat tho.ewho uadth- oelghor Atâd* behlud the counter, «rlaths hem.e ruaune ito vlgio ei b« am 1 k MM o m \" *Dbd. u. nho\".,ha ua~hSb uet mie ta*k te' you abut Nervre Troubles.', 0= nerves ar E 1k nitnct e rk ci te1egraph wires. They are controlied andi nourished by a portion of the. brain known as the. nerve centres. The. condition of thp. nerve centrer-depends upoz the. conditicoq M of the. bodily healtii. When the. bodily' iiealth is lowered the. nerves suifer in sympatiiy. Thon it is that we are tor- mented with \"nerves,\" headaches neuralgi,. -~~ nervous diity.- In sc ae hzru nothinç to equal 'Wincarnis, tb Wmneo Life. , Wincaruis 'lu a powerful nerve foodi *hich acte directly upon the nerve centres and gives* them uw Jhfe and néw vitality. Tiie resuit 15 wonderful. Will'you try i ' Begin te get Weil FYE Send for a iberal fre. tiW bottle of \" Wincarnls. Enclose sixcents skmps for poOtU5O. COLÉ1IAN ........... ..\u0026 Co., Ltd., Wincamni Works. Nor*\". R ngiad. You caa obtain rogula-Su e qsfom in lg li iuat jU Lecmmenâ byover 10,000Dotr\\ 9~Freln 1 ihGE AEtidea eelle o ruat2.eeh TOU.ke ht O=es.WB TRUST .7 g aed ui.!:',8.and w ia ~.premiunM6. ~ e b. WESTERN HOME SPECLALTY col P.O.'Box 440 VANCOUVER, B.C. Whenever you feel a hcadache comlug on tako- I. ~.\u003eNA-DRU-CO Headache Walers 4 They stop headaches promptly and surely. Do flot ogatafa opium. morphine, phenacetin, acetauilid or other dangerous c' drugs. 25c. a box at your Druggist's. 126 NATIONAL DRUQ AND CHEMICAL -CO. OF CANAA urMIT. When writing advertisers pleate mention The WWLiern Home MonthtÏ.- -'-----1.-i--i. i MMM I Il t. t - t. 1 - ý'",
         "I Wlna~~~q~ IIkoeoh~ 1914 - M ~ I ê4 ~ 2 EU-U I~. ,~*, ~* maîmorbid min -,ata'Wedlaugh. miri ~~~~~~l hl*rpneaier ofiml- repeuibilîlos, an ai a her ov ory vor plitmil and lter i mo nt, s ud v i! i u h e. n ilo Te ne ca0,s.@Cruel ÂvaMo.maunt of unhappinesin oauW dby simip'le theughtlessness. Thon. are people w ho nover step te consider vbat the cooumeqmses of any action mr b. An ldes ooceurs te them, and Vtij4a they aet on it vitheut uhIekIn ift May cause inconvenience on datrem t others. If they use an article whieh is common househoid propety they de net netura it te lits. propen place, and ethers must. sp.nd inucli time and patience looking it up. Jarey are often late at meala and irregu- in keeping appointments, and genoral- iy net te hi depended on. They are fuil of apologies and -seem centritely serry, but it never occurs te hem te tiiink canefully beforehand se as te hi in time fer engagements, or te avoid deihg that which\u003e*will cause 'trouble te others. One or tva persens of that character vi Il keep a vhole. household in hot waten a large part of the time, and wear eut the energy and vitality ef those respen- sibie for the. smoeth running ef the househoid affairs more than al l te burden of their neesàsary duties. Il je diffleuit te resent the conduet of these irreponsible persane, but their treat- 1us vIk worntbq doninl Tuat ea..de o- tndy ag oy. bu onaidoration tfer ~mcovenceof otkers ~~ofheTl w\"e bavé b.uiom fumeinlatheii. vod'm Ieoyb\" , et the m. ut pummins thybve hï8emfrd, hl»ve been wotuo vhobý ver.f Ut b.autifla Io e e gom of th1 to em, -but vomon viio -tom \"alIMég I. oa wouiui, f via isetuqutu.bsim la e 41ai la V» tbat rive1f. te, and kipti ail?, the tï\"It naplred. Tii. churni of. hysial bautyla imlte\u0026. ,bàt~ fyhoglcml AttraotiQus are -inmxit nd:othe ,wove nded hr o begtitud:\u0026 Biesed are thé' plain ý *d imperfeot, for, theiru le the, klngom of love. A young, friend of:mine reoe*tly lent a ehild through net knowmng vhat te do when the ciiild wuasescfrd vith violent convulsions. -8h. was alone and with no e enorteeaU, and when iioip arnvod it vas tee late. On.eof the; neighbons cime la and upon her broastý tiie young woman se6bed eut lier Houehuld uggstions-Western Home monthly Recipes n.àiatwm qusW o -« ouà ihsn? n ai iES. aMmp booc POTATO 8O1P1 14otoes 1talspô ugour ipt.. mflk or' 1 teaspoonful Saltj 1 pt4 milk and water Y4 easpoonful white pepper 2 teasWonfuls chopped 2 teaspoonfuls chopped parsley OfliO4,Cery aalt 1 tablea'pooafulbotter Cook the potatoca until soft and drain; cook the milk and. onion in a doublè boiler; beat the- potatoes with a wire .potato m=asher, add the hôt milk, strain and use as a liquid to make a white.sauce. Cook 5 minutes and add the chopped .parsley just before serving. - STEAK AND HAM SHAPE 1 lb. steak / teacupful water 4 lb. hamx A littie nutmeg 1 eng Sait and pepper .1 cupful I4read crumbs Mlhce steak. and -ham together; add crumbs anid season- ing; beat ujp egg and mix with water; stir in until ail is used up; greéase a bowl and put in mixture. Cover with buttered paper,and- steam for 4 hours. AIlow' it to cool before turning.out. MAPLE CREAM I 2 cupfuls brown sugar Butter size of egg 5/a cupfui miik i teaspQonful vanilla Boi 20 minutes, stirring constantly-it is done when it hardens on the edge of the dish or drops in hairs from spoon; add vanila and beat until it begins to stiffen, then spread on buttered dishes a nd cut in squares. Chopped walnuts or almonds may be added if desired. learaed thip subtle secret, ti. harm which is something mere than physicai. ARl ef them, vere vomen who could grip men's moula, and hiold thein with a tenaity 9#shkeable. A\u0026nd it lias aie beon remIsrked that the, fameus beauties of hstery have almeat always had un- happy endings la their love affaire. NO veman, bevever plain in features, need ever lead an unloved or levelese life. She bas eniy ho exercise that, vomanly tact and wisdom which is the nahural inheitance of her sex, te win ail the love she desires. And love thus von through pleasing graces and tender sympathies she viii find far more lasting and satisfying than any won by even the higiiest physical charms. The hElhest glory of a woeman is net that her charms have made ber admired and brought men. captive te her feet,j but that Me has made ber very defects te be loved. Beauty, ini fact, is some- 'I didn't knov what te do,!' se sobbed, 'I didn't know.\" \"My dear,\" said the eider voman, I don't knov' neyer saved a f e yet.'\" It vas a trifie cruel of her I thought at thie lime, but afterwards 1 decided she vas quite right. No woman who bas a child bas any right net ta ho pre- pared for an emergency. Taking lhe rebuke te myseif I immediatèly beugt a blank boek and in il 1 have recerded every hint I read or hear fromf a neliable source upon the subject of emergencies of ail kinds. But I decided that Ibis vas flot eneugh -what if the book itself should meet with an accident or bc misiaid Y Even thie lime consumed in lurning lhe pages and hunting for the proper remedy is sometimes preciolla and under sitreng excitement one is Iikeiy te read in- correetly. Se each day I decided te give a haif iîour's study te .the contents of the book until nov I amn prepared for bu th b ïr\u003eý tle Ti iÎp0411, ectie 118 notice. vsdI. ii bath before I« oVen' te4*i »-d what I -w\" do- ps #An hl.st«Uni body ê sutad the , vsplratioiwfrIoke out, «, I.laid hin badk' upontheb 1Ithane God that ne one oould u yte me, ' dôn't k n nver omatlmd a 1f.'. There ie ne 'quleker, suror relief in eldld'a aiments thmiü thé 'hot or wana bath. Nothlng viiinsequiekly break up a foer eif any klid, and\u003e»i need have ne fear ef scarlot foyer or an y oùseh dimaae if the kettie lmaialaysbeiir4g Evenin l the little everyay illiesses, of tii. ehild the bath in inv*'luable. )Ly'littie-boy was sick. vith teethUq-- and iay listiesa and fev liiih ail day, re. fusing toest or notice'lnyone. Ini the middle of the. aftenoon ýI .-inged un1 in a tub of nearly hot vaýter rubing hie back and sa=h and ackoss hie boy.!. vigoroualy. Hê-alept souidly for an heur or more, vher4 he -oxpresmda desire for food. 1 fed hum' lightly upea tométéd-orackers and MM-byya ingý ho vawu p sdmm\u0026 l~~i the firut, tua iien h thu* l181% ~ the. clogginipurtie\" rmh.p m-no mÎtté if -h. bas hiehmbah*a ,aY-7» give I~r ha. Ss penbape, by a ~e of morne splt cathartie, and a gret maaiy mo1m\" nommes vwilb. pre*tmted. As te preventatives, aPro-o. tien of the. accidents -eh \" r -emergeney troatment coul pmevatod. Quit. ofton vo hear of,,* id tippl oer in its hlgh chair entea Jd o steve.. What cia b. thý caumo of tis~ exeet criminal carelessnýP? Ne mothe shoùld place hon ehid irithin four, er Aive feet of thie steve, nr là it m*-as way necessay.u uc;edxmittao hot steve can net but. lie InjUnious 6*4~ disoomforting te -the ildand the change front the heateportlon Of thil room te a plac of ioveq4temporatute 14 [ikely te cause a serioiWoid. There is no safe..guaim aalnt acl dents by bumulng nie teaohlnga.chud a wholesome fear of Olre. Wiien the child is placed at the. table and reaches fer overything lin sighti allow hua te grasp. a hot bit of food, or potate. The. bur will soon heai but the lesson wiii lng be remembered and uponý saylng' \"bura, burn» as he approaches the steve he will leani te avoid piaying near to it. The Chlldren's Evonsong \u003cBy Richard La Gallienne.) The sun is weary, for he ran Sa far and fast to-day;' The birds are -weary, for whe sang So many songs as they. The beesa and butterflies at Iast Are tired out, fQr just think, teo, Their littie wings have Ilutt#e .through. How many gardens threugli the day And se, as al'tired people do, They've gone -to lay their sleepy heade Deep, deep inwarm and happy beds. The Sun has shut hie gçlden eye And gone te sleep 'beneath the sky. The. birds and butterfiies and bees Have ail crept into flowers and trees. And ail lie quiet, stili as mice. Till mornilg comes-like .father's voloel. Se Geoffrey, Owen, Phyllis, you Must sieep away till morningtee. Close littie eyes, down littie eade, And aleep-sleep-aleep in happy beds. --Selected. Spare the. chiidren from suffering froni worms by using Miler's Worm Powders, the xnost effective vermifuge that can be got with which to comb~at these insidious foes of the young and helpless. There is notldng that excels this preparation as a Worm destroyer, and when its qualities become known in a kousehold no other wili be used. The medicine acts by itself, requiring no purgative to assist it, and so thoroughiy that nothing more is desired. lou - 1 1 1",
         "IGHTINC FOR FRE ga instlCombineMeftodsi brie ligit ized with in a W 1t Lat I wu body - w - te out, U, 1 thanke\u0026 I mae, ~i relief ixi or warra break up leed bave liesss of. e. teetUq---- 1day, nr- for arn med a tly upoIn inz. \u0026% tha ou ,14. ither reahe a hilit ». The ion vill Le steve tr to it. The Manitoba- Grain Grower's Association-The -Saskatchewan---ý-' Grain Grower's Association-The United Farmers of Alberta-and The Dominion, Grange Have passed strong resolutions to give every assistance possible to the Sarnia Fence Co. and to purchase Sarnia Fence in preference to i others. We-hope with their assistance to be successful ep our fight with the large interests. It is no longer our fight, but youze s auwol., If you are not already a supporter of our Independent Poicy, you should b\u0026-start to-day-we need*your assistance. Four years ago we startod marketing Sarnia Pence Direct to the Farmers of Canada, at prices 80 muchlower thaï they hai prevlouu!ysoai\u0026 that the great percentage of those who read our advertisements were skeptical as to its quality. They bai been used to buying through theiraet a4hl ers as much as 20 cents per rod more than we'asked them to pay Direct from our Factory, Freight Pai to their station. lu four yeara we ba.ave galuui the confidence of the Canadian Farmers and in returu for our efforts, every farm ergamization in the Dominion of Canada, have -enioruel ot pocy and promised us every assistance. In returu we wish- every farmer ýin Canada to -know that we are doing- everythlng in our powerte make ont connec-\u003e tien more close with them, s0 that it will be impossible for the, combine to again force you to pay the high prices you *ave in the past. We\u003ce ak your personal assistance, net only by Uthe piacing of your orders with us, but by the use of your personal influence you have wlth your neiglIboru inuyoi\u0026r local- lty. In returu we guarantee te soUl you the best dollar for dollar value in wire fence you have ever receved. By the Sarnia way of selliug fence you have nothing to pay for but quallty. You will recelve a roll of Sarnila Pence -that w9i l My«uM\u0026u4. faction that ait will be remembered long after the price has been forgotten, and make you a permanent customer and strong support« e .»#,\"et i)hiot 4II. Guarantee-If you find for any reason that the fence received of us iu net of the best hard steel wlre the bot galvanlzlug, tUe Mot PWOectly wove fence yeu ever purchased at any price, you are at liberty te returu ,it te us. We will pay frelght both waysa ad refund 'umie.~ WIIICJi WILL YOU B3UY-SARNIA FENCE OR COMBINE F WE SET THE PRICE. DEVOTE THEIR ENERGY TO MEET OUR PRICES. OTHERS TO TRY r d ~E. Co \u003eAU a.. d o) si M,- P.4 cn s.cO , *C2 .: P-4. c, u 1 - 1 - 1 W4 à - 1- - Il 1 5-00HORSE AND CATTLE! 5-00 FENCE. Ras 5 line wires, 40i În. igli, 9 stays to the rod, ail No. 9 Hard Steel wire, spacing 10, 10, 10, 10. Weight per rod, 6$/ Ibs. Price per rod, freight prepaid .............................. H~.IJ ORSE AND CATTLE 6-40- FENCE. Bas 6 line wires, 40 in. high, 9 stays ta the rod, ail No. 9 Hard Steel wire, spacing 7, 7, 8, ,9 Weigbt per rod, 73/2lbs. Prica par rod.- freight prepaid...................... 7-0H ORSE, C A T T L E AND) 7-00 SHEEP FENCE. Bas 7 line wires, 40 in. high, 9 stays ta the rod, al No. 9 Bard Steel wire, spacing 5, 6, 6, 7, 7%, 8V.. Weight par rod, 8$ lIbs. Price per rod. freight prapaid............... 7 .4~0 HORSE AND CATTLE in. high, 9 stays ta the rod, ail No. 9 Bard Steel wire, spacing 5, 6, 7, 9, 10, Il. Weight per rod, 9 1bs. Price par rod,ý freight prapaid....................... 8-40 GNEA SO P ENCE. Ha, -4 8 ine wres,40 in. high. 12 stays ta the rod, ail No. 9 Hard Steel wire, «spacing 3, 4, 5, , 7, 7, 8. Weght .per rod, 10$, lbs. iPrice par rod, freight pre- paid .......................... M...... 48GENERAL STOCK PENCE Ras \u00264 8lne wiras, 48 in. high, 12 stays ta the rod, ail No. 9 liard Steel wire, spacing 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 7, 9. Wight per, rod, il lbs. Price par rod, frexght pre- paid............ ..................... 9-O84GEFERÀr-STOCX PENCE. 9-48 Has9 lne wres 48in. igh, 9 stays to the rod, ail No. 9 liard Steel wire, spacing 3, 4, 5, 5, 6, 8, 8, 9. Weight per rod, Il lbs. Price par rod, fright prapaid. 22C 35C 36C 36e 24e 24e 1290 33e 330 39C 34 1 40C M4 1 40c 1 36e 23e 28e 35e 1 32C S35c 43e 430 NOTE-Prices on other Styles of Fence SBarb Wire will be given-on application. 320 37C and CASH WITH TE ORDER, BAVES EENSE AND YOU ET THE BEX.NP ITOH THE SAVINO IN THEE 9-48 GENERAL STOCK PENCE. Ras 9 lina wires, 48 in. high. 12 stays to the rod, ail No. 9 Hard Steel wire, spacing 3,4, 5 5, 6, 8, 8, 9. Weight per rod, 12 Ibs.' Wrce per rod, freigh t pre- paid ................................ low5 HOSECATTLE, SHEXP ADHOG PENCE. Has 10 inewires, 50Oin. high, 12 stays to the rod; ail No. 9 Hard Steel wire, spacing 3, 3y4, 35/2, 4 4, 53,2, 6, 8. 8 8. Weight.pr rod 13Y4 1. Per rod, ireight prepaid.. 7-6MEDIUM HOG PENCE. Ras .7 72 lina wires, 26in high, 30 stays to the rd o and bottom No. 9, filling No. 12 , rd Steel wire, spacing 3 3y4, 3 2 4 ri 546. Weight per rod 634 W-1 Price per rod, freight paid ............. 15_5 _p SOCK AND POULTRY PENCE. Has 15 line vires 50 in. high, 24 stays to, the rod, top mic bottom No. 9, filling No. 12 Hard Steel wire, spacing 1;j, 1;j, 1%, 1IX, 2, 2, 2$4, 3, 4_5, 5, 61 6, 7. Weight 12 lbs. Priez per rod, fraight paid................. WALK GATE. 33$x4g. Freight-paid.... PARM GATE. 12x48. Freight prseald.. PARU GATE. 13x48. Fraight pad .... PARU GATE. 14x48. Freight p.id .... FARM GATE. 16x48. Fraight pald .... STAPLES GALVANIZED. 1 Y4 in. Par box of 25 ibs. Fraiglit paid.......... BRACE WIRE. No. 9 SQf t. Par coul of 25 ibs. Freight paid.................. STRETCHER. Ail iron top and boto draw very heavy testad chain, extra inge wira stretcher and eplicar, te bs stratchar made at any price. lreight p d me t oe' 39C 43e 23C $3»0 4.50 4.75' 5.00 5.25 s. ,\u003e.o e o iS *c .~ 37e 410 1 Q. CI 44C 390 470. 2101I270 1 m4 1 m9 410 $2.90 4.50 4.75 8.001 4U0 $3,10 4.i5 5.00 525 t.00O 4ft $3.00 4.W0 4J75 5.251 \u003e8.75.1 510 9.00 Mo « SZ PLEASE NOTE-The above prices are for shiPment via, Lake and Rail. We p'repay freight in leu' than carload% on shipmente of 300 pounde or over, m4 carload paiices on 24,#,90 pounds or over. These prices may be raised shortly. Send your order to-duy. Remit by P. 0. Ordier or Bank Money Ordier. The, Sarnia Fence Co., Limited, Sarnila, Ont. Pence Put Up ini 20,'90, 40 Rod Rolis only Sarnia Fence Wins.- uttý?d lay Eeada du. ky. :rees. voloe. beds. cted. ,froni -rs, the Dt with of the g that ;troyer, Sin a The rgative tothiar 1 .1 1 1 . _- 1 _- 1 1 il 1 1 1 1 él .- di",
         "1 R ~ Ji EM \\ j .; s."
      ],
      "note" : [
         "Monthly"
      ],
      "published" : [
         "Winnipeg, Canada : Home Publishing Co., [1914]"
      ],
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ]
   },
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06912_171/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1"
}
{
   "doc" : {
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "Monthly"
      ],
      "published" : [
         "Winnipeg, Canada : Home Publishing Co., [1915]"
      ],
